NUCLEAR  FUEL  REPROCESSING

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JUNE  16,  2005

Serial No. 109–18

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

21–711PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2005

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE

HON.  SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York,  Chairman
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
SHEILA  JACKSON  LEE,  Texas
BRAD  SHERMAN,  California
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
JIM  COSTA,  California
AL  GREEN,  Texas
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
DENNIS  MOORE,  Kansas

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
WAYNE  T.  GILCHREST,  Maryland
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
J.  RANDY  FORBES,  Virginia
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
JOHN  J.H.  ‘‘JOE’’  SCHWARZ,  Michigan
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
VACANCY
VACANCY

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY

JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois,  Chair

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
JOHN  J.H.  ‘‘JOE’’  SCHWARZ,  Michigan
VACANCY
SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York

MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
SHEILA  JACKSON  LEE,  Texas
BRAD  SHERMAN,  California
AL  GREEN,  Texas

BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

KEVIN  CARROLL  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

DAHLIA  SOKOLOV  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member
CHARLES  COOKE  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

COLIN  HUBBELL  Staff  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

June  16,  2005

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Judy  Biggert,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  En-
ergy, Committee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ...........................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Michael  M.  Honda,  Minority  Ranking  Member,
Subcommittee on Energy, Committee on Science, U.S. House of Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Jerry  F.  Costello,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Energy,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson, Member, Sub-
committee  on  Energy,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................

Witnesses:

Mr.  Robert  Shane  Johnson,  Acting  Director,  Office  of  Nuclear  Energy,
Science, and Technology; Deputy Director for Technology, U.S. Department
of Energy

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  Matthew  Bunn,  Senior  Research  Associate,  Project  on  Managing  the

Atom, Harvard University, John F. Kennedy School of Government

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Roger  Hagengruber,  Director,  Office  for  Policy,  Security,  and  Technology;
Director,  Institute  for  Public  Policy;  Professor  of  Political  Science,  Univer-
sity of New Mexico

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Phillip  J.  Finck,  Deputy  Associate  Laboratory  Director,  Applied  Science

and Technology and National Security, Argonne National Laboratory

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Page
2
3

8
9

10
12

13

14

14
16
19

19
22
28

29
31
66

66
68
80
81
82

(III)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Appendix:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Mr.  Robert  Shane  Johnson,  Acting  Director  of  the  Office  of  Nuclear  Energy,
Science, and Technology; Deputy Director for Technology, U.S. Department
of Energy ...............................................................................................................
Mr.  Matthew  Bunn,  Senior  Research  Associate,  Project  on  Managing  the
Atom, Harvard University, John F. Kennedy School of Government ..............
Dr.  Roger  Hagengruber,  Director,  Office  for  Policy,  Security,  and  Technology;
Director,  Institute  for  Public  Policy;  Professor  of  Political  Science,  Univer-
sity of New Mexico ...............................................................................................
Dr.  Phillip  J.  Finck,  Deputy  Associate  Laboratory  Director,  Applied  Science
and Technology and National Security, Argonne National Laboratory ...........

Page

138

142

145

147

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

NUCLEAR  FUEL  REPROCESSING

THURSDAY,  JUNE  16,  2005

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:05  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Judy  Biggert
[Chairwoman of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Nuclear Fuel Reprocessing

THURSDAY, JUNE 16, 2005

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On  Thursday,  June  16,  the  Energy  Subcommittee  of  the  House  Committee  on
Science will hold a hearing to examine the status of nuclear fuel reprocessing tech-
nologies in the United States.

Report  language  accompanying  the  House-passed  H.R.  2419,  the  Energy  and
Water Development Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 2006, directs the Department
of  Energy  (DOE)  to  accelerate  efforts  to  develop  reprocessing  technologies  and  to
recommend a specific technology by September 2007.

The  hearing  will  examine  the  status  of  reprocessing  technologies  and  the  impact
reprocessing would have on energy efficiency, nuclear waste management and weap-
ons proliferation.
2. Witnesses
Mr. Robert Shane Johnson is the Acting Director of the Office of Nuclear Energy,
Science and Technology and the Deputy Director for Technology at the Department
of Energy.
Dr. Phillip J. Finck is the Deputy Associate Laboratory Director, Applied Science
and Technology and National Security at Argonne National Laboratory.
Dr. Roger Hagengruber serves at the University of New Mexico as Director of the
Office for Policy, Security and Technology; Director of the Institute for Public Policy;
and  Professor  of  Political  Science.  He  also  chairs  the  Nuclear  Energy  Study  Group
of  the  American  Physical  Society,  which  issued  a  May  2005  report,  Nuclear  Power
and Proliferation Resistance: Securing Benefits, Limiting Risk.
Mr. Matthew Bunn is a Senior Research Associate in the Project on Managing the
Atom at Harvard University’s John F. Kennedy School of Government.

3. Overarching Questions

• What are the advantages and disadvantages of nuclear reprocessing in terms
of efficiency of fuel use, disposal of nuclear waste, and proliferation of nuclear
weapons?
• What  is  the  current  state  of  reprocessing  technologies?  What  criteria  should
be  used  to  choose  a  technology?  What  do  we  still  need  to  know  to  make  this
decision?  Would  choosing  a  reprocessing  technology  in  2007  limit  future
choices regarding other nuclear technologies, such as reactor designs?

4. Brief Overview

• Nuclear reactors generate about 20 percent of the electricity used in the U.S.
No  new  nuclear  plants  have  been  ordered  in  the  U.S.  since  1973,  but  there
is  renewed  interest  in  nuclear  energy  both  because  it  could  reduce  U.S.  de-
pendence on foreign oil and because it produces no greenhouse gas emissions.
• One  of  the  barriers  to  increased  use  of  nuclear  energy  is  concern  about  nu-
clear  waste.  Every  nuclear  power  reactor  produces  approximately  20  tons  of
highly  radioactive  nuclear  waste  every  year.  Today,  that  waste  is  stored  on-
site at the nuclear reactors in water-filled cooling pools, or at some sites, after
sufficient  cooling,  in  dry  casks  above  ground.  About  50,000  metric  tons  of
commercial spent fuel is being stored at 73 sites in 33 states. A recent report
issued by the National Academy of Sciences concluded that this stored waste
could be vulnerable to terrorist attacks.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

• Under  the  current  plan  for  long-term  disposal  of  nuclear  waste,  the  waste
from around the country would be moved to a permanent repository at Yucca
Mountain  in  Nevada,  which  is  now  scheduled  to  open  around  2012.  Yucca
continues to be a subject of controversy. But even if it opened and functioned
as  planned,  it  would  have  only  enough  space  to  store  the  nuclear  waste  the
U.S. is expected to generate by about 2010.

• Consequently,  there  is  growing  interest  in  finding  ways  to  reduce  the  quan-
tity  of  nuclear  waste.  A  number  of  other  nations,  most  notably  France  and
Japan,  ‘‘reprocess’’  their  nuclear  waste.  Reprocessing  involves  separating  out
the  various  components  of  nuclear  waste  so  that  a  portion  of  the  waste  can
be  recycled  and  used  again  as  nuclear  fuel  (instead  of  disposing  of  all  of  it).
In addition to reducing the quantity of nuclear waste, reprocessing allows nu-
clear fuel to be used more efficiently. With reprocessing, the same amount of
nuclear fuel can generate more electricity because some components of it can
be used as fuel more than once.

• The  greatest  drawback  of  reprocessing  is  that  current  reprocessing  tech-
nologies  produce  weapons-grade  plutonium  (which  is  one  of  the  components
of the spent fuel). Any activity that increases the availability of plutonium in-
creases the risk of nuclear weapons proliferation.

• Because of proliferation concerns, the U.S. decided in the 1970s not to engage
in  reprocessing.  (The  policy  decision  was  reversed  the  following  decade,  but
the  U.S.  still  did  not  move  toward  reprocessing.)  But  the  Department  of  En-
ergy  (DOE)  has  continued  to  fund  research  and  development  (R&D)  on  nu-
clear  reprocessing  technologies,  including  new  technologies  that  their  pro-
ponents claim would reduce the risk of proliferation from reprocessing.

• The  report  accompanying  H.R.  2419,  the  Energy  and  Water  Development  Ap-
propriations  Act  for  Fiscal  Year  2006,  which  the  House  passed  in  May,  di-
rected  DOE  to  focus  research  in  its  Advanced  Fuel  Cycle  Initiative  program
on  improving  nuclear  reprocessing  technologies.  The  report  went  on  to  state,
‘‘The  Department  shall  accelerate  this  research  in  order  to  make  a  specific
technology recommendation, not later than the end of fiscal year 2007, to the
President  and  Congress  on  a  particular  reprocessing  technology  that  should
be  implemented  in  the  United  States.  In  addition,  the  Department  shall  pre-
pare  an  integrated  spent  fuel  recycling  plan  for  implementation  beginning  in
fiscal year 2007, including recommendation of an advanced reprocessing tech-
nology  and  a  competitive  process  to  select  one  or  more  sites  to  develop  inte-
grated spent fuel recycling facilities.’’

• During  Floor  debate  on  H.R.  2419,  the  House  defeated  an  amendment  that
would  have  cut  funding  for  research  on  reprocessing.  In  arguing  for  the
amendment,  its  sponsor,  Mr.  Markey,  explicitly  raised  the  risks  of  weapons
proliferation. Specifically, the amendment would have cut funding for reproc-
essing  activities  and  interim  storage  programs  by  $15.5  million  and  shifted
the funds to energy efficiency activities, effectively repudiating the report lan-
guage. The amendment was defeated by a vote of 110–312.
• But  nuclear  reprocessing  remains  controversial,  even  within  the  scientific
community. In May 2005, the American Physical Society (APS) Panel on Pub-
lic Affairs, issued a report, Nuclear Power and Proliferation Resistance: Secur-
ing Benefits, Limiting Risk. APS, which is the leading organization of the Na-
tion’s  physicists,  is  on  record  as  strongly  supporting  nuclear  power.  But  the
APS  report  takes  the  opposite  tack  of  the  Appropriations  report,  stating,
‘‘There  is  no  urgent  need  for  the  U.S.  to  initiate  reprocessing  or  to  develop
additional national repositories. DOE programs should be aligned accordingly:
shift  the  Advanced  Fuel  Cycle  Initiative  R&D  away  from  an  objective  of  lay-
ing  the  basis  for  a  near-term  reprocessing  decision;  increase  support  for  pro-
liferation-resistance R&D and technical support for institutional measures for
the entire fuel cycle.’’
• Technological as well as policy questions remain regarding reprocessing. It is
not clear whether the new reprocessing technologies that DOE is funding will
be  developed  sufficiently  by  2007  to  allow  the  U.S.  to  select  a  technology  to
pursue.  There  is  also  debate  about  the  extent  to  which  new  technologies  can
truly reduce the risks of proliferation.
• It  is  also  unclear  how  selecting  a  reprocessing  technology  might  relate  to
other  pending  technology  decisions  regarding  nuclear  energy.  For  example,
the U.S. is in the midst of developing new designs for nuclear reactors under
DOE’s  Generation  IV  program.  Some  of  the  potential  new  reactors  would

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

produce  types  of  nuclear  waste  that  could  not  be  reprocessed  using  some  of
the technologies now being developed with DOE funding.

• Finally,  the  economics  of  nuclear  reprocessing  are  unclear.  (The  Committee
intends  to  examine  the  economic  questions  in  a  later  hearing.)  The  U.S.  nu-
clear  industry  has  not  been  interested  in  moving  to  reprocessing  because
today it is cheaper to mine uranium and turn it into fresh fuel (through ‘‘ura-
nium enrichment’’) than it is to reprocess and recycle spent fuel.

5. Background
Current U.S. Practice: The open fuel cycle

Current  U.S.  nuclear  technology  uses  what  is  called  an  ‘‘open  fuel  cycle,’’  also
known as a ‘‘once-through cycle’’ because the nuclear fuel only goes through the re-
actor  one  time  before  disposal,  leaving  most  of  the  energy  content  of  the  uranium
ore  unused.  In  an  open  cycle,  the  uranium  is  mined  and  processed,  enriched,  and
packaged into fuel rods, which are then loaded into the reactor. In the reactor, some
of  the  uranium  atoms  in  the  fuel  undergo  fission,  or  splitting,  releasing  energy  in
the form of heat, which in turn is used to generate electricity. Once the fission effi-
ciency  of  the  uranium  fuel  drops  below  a  certain  level,  the  fuel  rods  are  removed
from  the  reactor  as  spent  fuel.  Spent  fuel  contains  95  percent  uranium  by  weight,
one  percent  plutonium,  with  the  remaining  four  percent  consisting  of  fission  prod-
ucts  (Strontium,  Cesium,  Iodine,  Technetium)  and  a  class  of  elements  known  as
actinides (Neptunium, Americium and Curium).

Actinides are a class of radioactive metals that are major contributors to the long-
term  radioactivity  of  nuclear  waste.  The  fission  products  and  actinides  have  half-
lives1 ranging from a few days to millions of years. The ongoing radioactivity of the
spent  fuel  means  that  it  still  generates  a  lot  of  heat,  so  after  removal,  the  spent
fuel rods are cooled in deep, water-filled pools. After sufficient cooling, the fuel rods
may be transferred to dry cask storage pending ultimate disposal at a geologic waste
repository  such  as  Yucca  Mountain.  Often  they  are  just  left  in  the  cooling  pools
while awaiting disposal.

A  recent  National  Academy  of  Sciences  study  examined  the  vulnerability  of  in-
terim  spent  fuel  storage  to  terrorist  attack.  After  a  dispute  with  the  Nuclear  Regu-
latory  Commission,  the  Academy  released  a  declassified  version  of  the  study  in
April,  titled  Safety  and  Security  of  Commercial  Spent  Nuclear  Fuel  Storage.2 That
report concluded that the pools, under certain conditions, could be vulnerable to at-
tack, resulting in a large release of radioactivity, and recommended steps to reduce
the risk of such an incident. Dry cask storage has inherent security advantages, ac-
cording to the study, but can be used only after the fuel has cooled for at least five
years in a water-filled pool.

If  the  licenses  for  most  currently  operational  nuclear  power  plants  are  extended
to  allow  a  60-year  operational  lifetime  as  anticipated,  the  U.S.  will  need  to  make
a choice: increase the statutory storage capacity of Yucca, build a second repository,
close  the  fuel  cycle,  or  change  the  Nuclear  Waste  Policy  Act  to  allow  indefinite
above-ground  dry  storage  until  another  solution  is  found.  Some  suggest  that  such
a  decision  is  a  necessary  prerequisite  to  any  expansion  of  the  nuclear  industry  in
this  country,  in  large  part  because  the  public  needs  to  be  convinced  that  the  U.S.
has  a  long-term  strategy  for  waste  disposal.  In  addition,  by  law,  the  Nuclear  Regu-
latory  Commission  must  make  a  ‘‘waste  confidence  determination’’—that  the  waste
created can be safely disposed of—in order to continue issuing facility licenses.
Closing the fuel cycle: Reprocessing and Recycling

The  ‘‘closed’’  fuel  cycle  requires  the  same  mining,  processing  and  fuel  fabrication
as the open cycle, prior to initial loading of the fresh fuel rods into the reactor. How-
ever,  in  the  closed  cycle,  the  cooled  spent  fuel  is  reprocessed,  or  separated  into  its
individual  components.  In  this  approach,  some  components  of  the  spent  fuel  can  be
used  to  fabricate  new  fuel  for  the  reactor.  The  unusable  waste  is  either  safely  en-
cased  and  disposed  of  as  is  (which  means  it  is  still  very  hot  and  radioactive),  or
‘‘burned’’ in a different type of reactor to reduce the heat and radioactivity and then
disposed  of.  In  theory,  the  fuel  can  go  around  this  cycle  many  times  until  most  of

1 The ‘‘half-life’’ of a radioactive substance is the period of time required for one-half of a given
quantity  of  that  substance  (e.g.,  plutonium)  to  decay  either  to  another  isotope  of  the  same  ele-
ment, or to another element altogether. The substances with shorter half-lives tend to generate
more heat.

2 Board  on  Radioactive  Waste  Management,  National  Research  Council  of  the  National  Acad-

emies, Safety and Security of Commercial Spent Nuclear Fuel Storage, April 2005

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

the  energy  content  is  converted  into  electricity  and  only  unusable  products  remain
for disposal.

Several  countries  around  the  world,  including  Japan,  Russia  and  France,  cur-
rently  reprocess  their  spent  fuel  with  a  process  known  as  PUREX,  short  for  pluto-
nium-uranium  extraction,  in  which  plutonium  and  uranium  streams  are  isolated
from  the  remaining  waste  products.  The  fission  products  and  minor  actinides  are
cooled  and  then  vitrified,  or  encased  in  glass,  for  long-term  disposal.  The  uranium
separated  through  PUREX  is  impure  and  can’t  be  fabricated  into  fuel  without  fur-
ther  processing.  As  a  result,  the  separated  uranium  is  disposed  of  as  low-level
waste. The plutonium, on the other hand, can be mixed with freshly mined and en-
riched  uranium  to  fabricate  a  mixed-oxide  fuel  known  as  MOX,  which  is  recycled
into reactors to generate more power. Plutonium can also be used to make weapons.
Current  practice  in  these  countries  is  to  reuse  the  plutonium  only  once  and  then
dispose  of  the  remaining  waste  rather  than  reprocessing  and  recycling  a  second
time.
The Advanced Fuel Cycle Initiative at DOE

The  Administration’s  May  2001  National  Energy  Policy  recommended  that  the
United States ‘‘develop reprocessing and fuel treatment technologies that are clean-
er,  more  efficient,  less  waste-intensive,  and  more  proliferation-resistant.’’  The  Ad-
vanced Fuel Cycle Initiative (AFCI) in the Nuclear Energy, Science and Technology
Office at DOE has existed in various forms for many years, but adjusted its mission
in  response  to  the  President’s  call  for  a  return  to  reprocessing.  The  primary  goals
of  the  AFCI  program  are  to:  ‘‘develop  technologies  that  will  reduce  the  cost  of  geo-
logic  disposal  of  high-level  waste  from  spent  nuclear  fuel,  enhancing  the  repository
performance  [and]  develop  reactor  fuel  and  fuel  cycle  technologies  to  support  Gen-
eration IV nuclear energy systems.’’

Scientists working on AFCI are developing at least two reprocessing technologies,
UREX+ and pyroprocessing, while continuing research on a new generation of tech-
nologies. The Department claims that both UREX+ and pyroprocessing have the po-
tential  to  reduce  U.S.  nuclear  waste  problems  while  effectively  managing  prolifera-
tion  and  safety  concerns.  In  UREX+,  plutonium  is  never  extracted  in  a  pure
stream—it  remains  mixed  with  neptunium  and  americium,  two  long-lived  actinides
that  may  act  as  proliferation  deterrents  by  making  the  plutonium  too  toxic  to  han-
dle  without  special  equipment.  In  pyroprocessing,  also  known  as  ‘‘electro-metallur-
gical’’  processing,  spent  fuel  rods  are  mechanically  chopped,  and  the  fuel  is  elec-
trically separated into constituent products. This isolates the uranium while leaving
the  plutonium  and  other  actinides  mixed  together.  UREX+  is  closer  technologically
to  PUREX  and  is  better  suited  than  pyroprocessing  for  reprocessing  the  spent  fuel
from the current type of U.S. nuclear reactors, known as light water reactors.
Optimizing the fuel cycle

Reprocessing  is  only  one  of  several  steps  that  could  be  used  to  address  nuclear
waste  problems.  After  actinides  are  separated  from  the  waste  stream,  they  can  be
further processed—‘‘burned’’—through a process called ‘‘transmutation.’’ Transmuta-
tion, which requires a different type of nuclear reactor (such as a ‘‘fast reactor’’), can
generate  electricity  while  reducing  the  toxicity  of  the  actinides.  Transmutation  re-
duces the temperature of the waste products (radioactive materials are literally hot).
This  is  significant  because  disposal  sites,  such  as  Yucca  Mountain,  can  be  limited
in  terms  of  the  heat  content  they  can  accept  as  well  as  in  terms  of  volume.  Trans-
mutation  technologies  have  not  yet  been  developed  for  other  components  of  the  nu-
clear waste stream.

Unless  the  U.S.  also  put  into  use  transmutation  technologies,  reprocessing  might
be of less use. Reprocessing could increase the efficiency of nuclear fuel use and re-
duce  the  volume  of  waste,  but  without  transmutation,  it  could  not  reduce  the  tem-
perature  (‘‘heat  load’’)  of  the  waste  sufficiently  to  allow  Yucca  Mountain  to  store
more years of byproducts from nuclear generation.

In addition to pursuing reprocessing technologies, DOE has a program to develop
the next generation of nuclear plants, known as Generation IV reactor designs that
would  be  more  energy  efficient,  proliferation-resistant  and  safer  than  the  current
fleet of reactors. Once DOE settles on a particular Generation IV design, it intends
to  sponsor  a  demonstration  project,  known  as  the  Next  Generation  Nuclear  Plant
(NGNP)  in  Idaho.  The  NGNP  also  has  the  potential  to  make  more  efficient  use  of
recycled  plutonium  as  well  as  the  other  actinides  to  produce  more  electricity,  pos-
sibly reducing the need for separate transmutation facilities in the future. However,
spent fuel from some of the kinds of reactors being considered for the NGNP might
not be able to be reprocessed using UREX+.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6. Witness Questions
Mr. Johnson

7

• What are the advantages and disadvantages of using reprocessing to address
efficiency  of  fuel  use,  waste  management  and  non-proliferation?  How  would
you  assess  the  advantages  and  disadvantages,  and  how  might  the  disadvan-
tages be mitigated?

• What  are  the  greatest  technological  hurdles  in  developing  and  commer-
cializing advanced reprocessing technologies? Is it feasible for the government
to select a technology by 2007?

• To what extent will the Department have to modify its plans in order to com-
ply with the report language accompanying the House-passed fiscal year 2006
Energy and Water Appropriations bill?

• What  reprocessing  technologies  are  currently  under  consideration?  Is  there

one particular technology that is considered more promising than others?

• How  should  technology  and  policy  decisions  about  other  components  of  the

fuel cycle influence the selection of a reprocessing technology?

Dr. Finck

• What are the advantages and disadvantages of using reprocessing to address
efficiency  of  fuel  use,  waste  management  and  non-proliferation?  How  would
you  assess  the  advantages  and  disadvantages,  and  how  might  the  disadvan-
tages be mitigated?

• What  are  the  greatest  technological  hurdles  in  developing  and  commer-
cializing advanced reprocessing technologies? Is it feasible for the government
to select a technology by 2007?

• What  reprocessing  technologies  currently  are  being  developed  at  Argonne  or

at other National Labs? What technical questions must be answered?

• What reprocessing technologies are still in the basic research stage, what ad-
vantages  might  they  offer,  and  what  is  the  estimated  timeline  for  develop-
ment of laboratory-scale models?

• How  would  you  contrast  what  is  being  done  internationally  with  U.S.  plans
for reprocessing, recycling and associated waste management? What countries
recycle  now?  What  components  of  the  waste  fuel  are  or  can  be  used  to  make
new reactor fuel?

Dr. Hagengruber

• What are the advantages and disadvantages of using reprocessing to address
efficiency  of  fuel  use,  waste  management  and  non-proliferation?  How  would
you  assess  the  advantages  and  disadvantages,  and  how  might  the  disadvan-
tages be mitigated?

• What  are  the  greatest  technological  hurdles  in  developing  and  commer-
cializing advanced reprocessing technologies? Is it feasible for the government
to select a technology by 2007?

• What  kinds  of  research  and  development  should  the  Department  of  Energy
fund to ensure the proliferation resistance of future reprocessing technologies?

Mr. Bunn

• What are the advantages and disadvantages of using reprocessing to address
efficiency  of  fuel  use,  waste  management  and  non-proliferation?  How  would
you  assess  the  advantages  and  disadvantages,  and  how  might  the  disadvan-
tages be mitigated?

• What  are  the  greatest  technological  hurdles  in  developing  and  commer-
cializing advanced reprocessing technologies? Is it feasible for the government
to select a technology by 2007?

• How  should  technology  and  policy  decisions  about  other  components  of  the
fuel cycle influence the selection of a reprocessing technology? From your per-
spective,  is  the  Department  of  Energy  conducting  the  systems  analysis  re-
quired to make sound near-term technology decisions and guide long-term re-
search and development?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  The  hearing  of  the  Subcommittee  on  En-

ergy of the Committee on Science will come to order.

Good  morning  to  you  all.  I  want  to  welcome  everyone  to  this
hearing on nuclear fuel cycle and the potential for reprocessing and
recycling  to  help  us  better  manage  the  Nation’s  growing  inventory
of spent nuclear fuel.

To start, I want to quickly review our current situation to put to-
day’s hearing into some context. Twenty years from now, electricity
demand in the United States is expected to increase by 50 percent.
If we are to meet this incredible growth in demand without signifi-
cantly increasing emissions of greenhouse gases, we must maintain
a  diverse  supply  of  electricity,  and  nuclear  power  must  be  part  of
that  mix.  Nuclear  energy  is  the  only  carbon-free  source  of  elec-
tricity  that  is  currently  operating  on  a  commercial  scale  nation-
wide.  We  know  how  to  use  nuclear  energy,  and  we  know  how  to
use  it  safely.  But  if  we  are  to  continue  to  benefit  from  safe,  emis-
sions-free  nuclear  power  for  at  least  20  percent  of  our  electricity,
there is at least one more issue that must be resolved: what do we
do with the growing inventories of spent nuclear fuel?

Yucca  Mountain  was  to  be  the  solution.  However,  its  intended
opening  slipped  from  1998  to  2010,  and  now  it  is  likely  to  slip
again to 2012 or 2014, according to the Department of Energy. This
failure to open Yucca Mountain as scheduled or deal with the spent
fuel  accumulating  at  our  nuclear  power  plants  in  other  ways  may
soon cost the Federal Government up to $1 billion annually in legal
liability  and  interim  storage  costs.  And  when  it  does  finally  open,
Yucca  Mountain  will  be  full.  It  is  limited  by  statute  to  store  only
as much spent fuel as will have been created by 2010.

That Yucca Mountain, for all its intents and purposes, already is
full  should  come  to  no  surprise.  If  you  think  of  nuclear  fuel  like  a
log,  we  currently  burn  only  three  percent  of  that  log  at  both  ends
and  then  pull  it  out  of  the  fire  to  bury  it  in  a  mountain.  The  bulk
of  what  we  call  nuclear  ‘‘waste’’  is  actually  nuclear  ‘‘fuel’’  that  still
contains  over  90  percent  of  its  original  energy  content.  Does  that
make  any  sense?  No,  but  that  is  our  current  policy,  and  it  is  just
plain  wasteful.  Unless  we  do  something  different  or  take  another
approach,  a  second  repository,  or  an  expanded  Yucca  Mountain,
will be required. Politically, fiscally, and logistically, this will be no
easy task, and could preclude greater use of emissions-free nuclear
power.

For  years  now,  scientists  at  DOE  and  a  number  of  its  national
laboratories  have  been  working  on  ‘‘new  approaches’’  to  dealing
with  commercial  spent  nuclear  fuel  and  solving  the  long-term
Yucca  Mountain  problem.  More  specifically,  they  have  developed
technologies and processes to do something with spent nuclear fuel
besides  bury  it  all  in  a  mountain,  like  reprocess  and  then  recycle
parts of it into new fuel for reactors.

There  are  many  advantages  to  these  technologies,  which  have
names  like  UREX+  and  pyroprocessing.  Let  me  just  name  a  few.
First,  they  are  proliferation  resistant  unlike  the  30-  to  40-year-

old technologies already in use.

Second,  they  reduce  the  volume  of  our  nuclear  waste,  which

could render another Yucca Mountain unnecessary.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

And  third,  they  could  reduce  the  toxicity,  the  heat  and  radioac-

9

tivity, of the waste.

To  fully  realize  these  benefits  and  deal  with  the  growing  inven-
tory  of  spent  fuel,  the  fiscal  year  2006  Energy  and  Water  Appro-
priations bill, passed by the House last month, requires the Depart-
ment  of  Energy  to  develop  an  integrated  spent  fuel  recycling  plan
by  the  start  of  fiscal  year  2007,  and  select  a  reprocessing  tech-
nology by the end of fiscal year 2007. I am pleased, timing was per-
fect,  that  my  colleague  and  author  of  that  bill,  Chairman  Hobson,
has joined us here today.

These  activities  could  be  the  key  to  better  managing  our  spent
fuel.  Reprocessing  is  just  one  step  in  the  entire  fuel  cycle,  the  cra-
dle-to-grave  path  of  nuclear  fuel.  However,  it  is  the  first  step  to
better  managing  our  waste.  We  can  learn  lessons  from  what  the
French  and  Japanese  have  done  with  reprocessing.  I  know  I  did
after  visiting  the  French  reprocessing  facilities  with  Chairman
Hobson in early April. We can continue to improve upon their tech-
nologies, processes, and monitoring capabilities.

But we almost certainly won’t achieve these improvements with-
out first doing a comprehensive systems analysis. Technology deci-
sions for reprocessing must take into account technology and policy
decisions  for  the  entire  fuel  cycle.  For  example,  we  need  to  know
if  the  reprocessing  technologies  under  discussion  here  today  are
compatible  with  designs  for  the  next  generation  nuclear  plant.
Through  modeling  that  incorporates  the  relevant  technical,  eco-
nomic,  and  policy  considerations,  this  ‘‘systems  approach’’  will
allow  us  to  optimize  the  fuel  cell  and  make  an  informed  decision
about reprocessing.

Finally,  how  much  could  all  of  this  cost?  And  that  is  a  good  and
important  question,  which  is  why  it  will  be  the  subject  of  another
hearing at a later date.

This  is  a  complex  topic  and  one  that  involves  many  interrelated
technical  and  policy  issues.  Yet  the  technologies  and  policies  we
will discuss today could help determine whether nuclear energy be-
comes  an  even  more  significant  source  of  emissions-free  electricity
when we need it most in the years to come.

And  so  to  conclude,  I  want  to  thank  the  witnesses  for  agreeing
to share their knowledge and insight with us today. I look forward
to an open and spirited debate on this very important subject.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Biggert follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN JUDY BIGGERT

I want to welcome everyone to this hearing on the nuclear fuel cycle, and the po-
tential for reprocessing and recycling to help us better manage the Nation’s growing
inventory of spent nuclear fuel.

To start, I want to quickly review our current situation to put today’s hearing into
some  context.  Twenty  years  from  now,  electricity  demand  in  the  United  States  is
expected  to  increase  by  50  percent.  If  we  are  to  meet  this  incredible  growth  in  de-
mand  without  significantly  increasing  emissions  of  greenhouse  gases,  we  must
maintain a diverse supply of electricity, and nuclear power must be part of that mix.
Nuclear  energy  is  the  only  carbon-free  source  of  electricity  that  is  currently  oper-
ating  on  a  commercial  scale  nation-wide.  We  know  how  to  use  nuclear  energy,  and
we  know  how  to  use  it  safely.  But  if  we  are  to  continue  to  benefit  from  safe,  emis-
sions-free nuclear power for at least 20 percent of our electricity, there is one more
issue that must be resolved—what we do with growing inventories of spent nuclear
fuel.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

Yucca  Mountain  was  to  be  the  solution.  However,  its  intended  opening  slipped
from 1998 to 2010, and is now likely to slip again to 2012 or 2014 according to the
Department  of  Energy  (DOE).  This  failure  to  open  Yucca  Mountain  as  scheduled—
or  deal  with  the  spent  fuel  accumulating  at  our  nuclear  power  plants  in  other
ways—may  soon  cost  the  Federal  Government  up  to  $1  billion  annually  in  legal  li-
ability  and  interim  storage  costs.  And  when  it  does  finally  open,  Yucca  Mountain
will  be  full.  It  is  limited  by  statute  to  store  only  as  much  spent  fuel  as  will  have
been created by 2010.

That  Yucca  Mountain,  for  all  intents  and  purposes,  already  is  full  should  come
as  no  surprise.  If  you  think  of  nuclear  fuel  like  a  log,  we  currently  burn  only  three
percent of that log at both ends, and then pull it out of the fire to bury it in a moun-
tain.  The  bulk  of  what  we  call  nuclear  ‘‘waste’’  is  actually  nuclear  ‘‘fuel’’  that  still
contains  over  90  percent  of  its  original  energy  content.  Does  that  make  any  sense?
No,  but  that’s  our  current  policy,  and  it’s  just  plain  wasteful.  Unless  we  do  some-
thing different or take another approach, a second repository, or an expanded Yucca
Mountain, will be required. Politically, fiscally, and logistically, this will be no easy
task, and could preclude greater use of emissions-free nuclear power.

For  years  now,  scientists  at  DOE  and  a  number  of  its  national  laboratories  have
been  working  on  ‘‘new  approaches’’  to  dealing  with  commercial  spent  nuclear  fuel
and solving the long-term Yucca Mountain problem. More specifically, they have de-
veloped  technologies  and  processes  to  do  something  with  spent  nuclear  fuel  besides
bury  it  all  in  a  mountain,  like  reprocess  and  then  recycle  parts  of  it  into  new  fuel
for reactors.

There are many advantages to these technologies, which have names like UREX+

and pyroprocessing. Let me just name a few.

First.  They  are  proliferation  resistant  unlike  the  30-  to  40-year-old  technologies

Second. They reduce the volume of our nuclear waste, which could render another

Third. They also could reduce the toxicity—the heat and the radioactivity—of the

already in use.

Yucca Mountain unnecessary.

waste.

To  fully  realize  these  benefits  and  deal  with  the  growing  inventory  of  spent  fuel,
the  Fiscal  Year  2006  Energy  and  Water  Appropriations  bill,  passed  by  the  House
last month, requires the DOE to develop an integrated spent fuel recycling plan by
the start of fiscal year 2007, and select a reprocessing technology by the end of fiscal
year  2007.  I  am  pleased  that  my  colleague  and  the  author  of  that  bill,  Chairman
Hobson, has joined us here today.

These activities could be the key to better managing our spent fuel. Reprocessing
is  just  one  step  in  the  entire  fuel  cycle—the  cradle-to-grave  path  of  nuclear  fuel.
However,  it  is  the  first  step  to  better  managing  our  waste.  We  can  learn  lessons
from  what  the  French  and  the  Japanese  have  done  with  reprocessing.  I  know  I  did
after  visiting  French  reprocessing  facilities  with  Chairman  Hobson  in  early  April.
We  can  continue  to  improve  upon  their  technologies,  processes,  and  monitoring  ca-
pabilities.

But  we  almost  certainly  won’t  achieve  these  improvements  without  first  doing  a
comprehensive  systems  analysis.  Technology  decisions  for  reprocessing  must  take
into  account  technology  and  policy  decisions  for  the  entire  fuel  cycle.  For  example,
we  need  to  know  if  the  reprocessing  technologies  under  discussion  here  today  are
compatible  with  designs  for  the  next  generation  nuclear  plant  (NGNP).  Through
modeling  that  incorporates  the  relevant  technical,  economic,  and  policy  consider-
ations,  this  ‘‘systems  approach’’  will  allow  us  to  optimize  the  fuel  cycle  and  make
an informed decision about reprocessing.

Finally,  how  much  could  all  this  cost?  That’s  a  good  and  important  question,

which is why it will be the subject of another hearing at a later date.

This  is  a  complex  topic,  and  one  that  involves  many  interrelated  technical  and
policy  issues.  Yet  the  technologies  and  policies  we  will  discuss  today  could  help  de-
termine  whether  nuclear  energy  becomes  and  even  more  significant  source  of  emis-
sions-free electricity when we need it most in the years to come. And so to conclude,
I  want  to  thank  the  witnesses  for  agreeing  to  share  their  knowledge  and  insight
with us today, and I look forward to an open and spirited debate on this very impor-
tant subject.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  And  with  that,  I  now  recognize  the—Mr.
Honda, the Ranking Minority Member of the Subcommittee, for an
opening statement.

Mr.  HONDA.  Thank  you,  Madame  Chairwoman,  and  thank  you

for holding this very important hearing today.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

From early on in the Nation’s nuclear energy program, the ‘‘plan’’
to recycle, reprocess is the technical term, the fuel used in the reac-
tor, to reduce the amount of material defined as waste and stretch
the  supply  of  available  material  needed  for  the  generation  of  elec-
tricity.

Indeed,  scattered  across  America  are  facilities  that  were  built  in
anticipation of a ‘‘closed’’ back end fuel cycle, such as those at West
Valley,  New  York,  Morris,  Illinois,  and  Barnwell,  South  Carolina.
These  facilities  never  fulfilled  their  mission,  however,  because  of

two principal factors.

First,  the  Carter  Administration’s  decision  to  abandon  the  re-
processing  in  the  1970s  based  on  concerns  raised  about  the  pro-
liferation of nuclear weapons, and second, economics.

The  Reagan  Administration  reversed  course  on  the  issue  of
whether  domestic  reprocessing  should  serve  as  a  tool  in  our  non-
proliferation policy, but even then no reprocessing began.

Then, as now, it didn’t make economic sense to develop a domes-
tic  recycling  capacity,  partly  because  of  the  stagnation  that  devel-
oped in the U.S. nuclear energy construction program.

Also,  the  so-called  ‘‘megatons  to  megawatts’’  program  that  takes
Russian  weapons-grade  uranium  and  down-blends  it  to  the  lower
concentrations  needed  for  nuclear  power  reactors  has  helped  to
keep  down  the  cost  of  reactor  fuel,  making  reprocessing  uneco-
nomical.

Whether we like it or not, it seems clear that this Administration
is leading us to a new era in the use of nuclear energy for the pro-
duction of electricity over the next several decades.

This  will  create  new  demand  for  fuel,  and  the  changing  condi-
tions  may  well  make  the  economics  of  reprocessing  as  a  means  of
supplying material for fuel more favorable.

Additionally,  our  nation  is  left  with  50,000  metric  tons  of  com-
mercial  spent  fuel  currently  being  stored  at  73  sites  in  33  states,
and  each  nuclear  power  reactor  continues  to  produce  20  tons  of
highly radioactive waste every year.

Even  if  a  waste  repository  at  Yucca  Mountain  opens  and  func-
tions as planned, it would have only enough space to store the nu-
clear waste the United States is expected to generate by 2010.

If reprocessing can facilitate either a reduction in ultimate waste
volumes  or  positively  affect  the  challenge  of  isolating  the  ultimate
waste  form  from  the  accessible  environment,  then  perhaps  we
should assign some ‘‘value’’ to those societal goods, further affecting
the economic balance.

In short, we may need to take a long-term approach to this issue
and  see  if,  indeed,  it  is  not  time  to  reexamine  some  fundamental
tenets of U.S. fuel cycle policy.

But in doing so, we must be sure to be mindful of the threat any

changes might pose in terms of nuclear proliferation.

At a time when the United States is seeking to discourage other
nations from acquiring technologies that would produce weapon-us-
able plutonium, we do not want to send the signal that the United
States is seeking to commercialize those very technologies.

I  look  forward  to  learning  more  from  the  witnesses  about  the
state of the technology today, the economics surrounding that tech-
nology, and its nonproliferation implications.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

Thank  you  again,  Madame  Chairwoman,  and  I  yield  back  the

balance of my time.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Honda follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE MICHAEL M. HONDA

Madam Chairwoman, thank you for holding this important hearing today.
From early on in the Nation’s nuclear energy program, the ‘‘plan’’ was to recycle,
reprocess  is  the  technical  term,  the  fuel  used  in  the  reactor,  to  reduce  the  amount
of material defined as waste and stretch the supply of available material needed for
the generation of electricity.

Indeed,  scattered  across  America  are  facilities  that  were  built  in  anticipation  of
a  ‘‘closed’’  back  end  fuel  cycle,  such  as  those  at  West  Valley,  NY,  Morris,  IL,  and
Barnwell, SC.

These facilities never fulfilled their mission, however, because of two principal fac-

tors:

First,  the  Carter  Administration’s  decision  to  abandon  reprocessing  in  the  1970’s
based on concerns raised about the proliferation of nuclear weapons; and second, ec-
onomics.

The  Reagan  Administration  reversed  course  on  the  issue  of  whether  domestic  re-
processing  should  serve  as  a  tool  in  our  non-proliferation  policy,  but  even  then  no
reprocessing began.

Then,  as  now,  it  didn’t  make  economic  sense  to  develop  a  domestic  recycling  ca-
pacity,  partly  because  of  the  stagnation  that  developed  in  the  U.S.  nuclear  energy
construction program.

Also, the so-called ‘‘megatons to megawatts’’ program that takes Russian weapons-
grade  uranium  and  down-blends  it  to  the  lower  concentrations  needed  for  nuclear
power  reactors  has  helped  to  keep  down  the  cost  of  reactor  fuel,  making  reprocess-
ing uneconomical.

Whether  we  like  it  or  not,  it  seems  clear  that  this  Administration  is  leading  us
to  a  new  era  in  the  use  of  nuclear  energy  for  the  production  of  electricity  over  the
next several decades.

This will create new demand for fuel, and the changing conditions may well make
the economics of reprocessing as a means of supplying material for fuel more favor-
able.

Additionally,  our  nation  is  left  with  50,000  metric  tons  of  commercial  spent  fuel
currently being stored at 73 sites in 33 states, and each nuclear power reactor con-
tinues to produce 20 tons of highly radioactive waste every year.

Even  if  a  waste  repository  at  Yucca  Mountain  opens  and  functions  as  planned,
it  would  have  only  enough  space  to  store  the  nuclear  waste  the  U.S.  is  expected  to
generate by about 2010.

If reprocessing can facilitate either a reduction in ultimate waste volumes or posi-
tively  affect  the  challenge  of  isolating  the  ultimate  waste  form  from  the  accessible
environment, then perhaps we should assign some ‘‘value’’ to those societal goods—
further affecting the economic balance.

In short, we may need to take a long-term approach to this issue and see if indeed

it is not time to re-examine some fundamental tenets of U.S. fuel cycle policy.

But  in  doing  so,  we  must  be  sure  to  be  mindful  of  the  threat  any  changes  might

pose in terms of nuclear proliferation.

At a time when the United States is seeking to discourage other nations from ac-
quiring  technologies  that  would  produce  weapon-usable  plutonium,  we  do  not  want
to send the signal that the U.S. is seeking to commercialize those very technologies.
I  look  forward  to  learning  more  from  the  witnesses  about  the  state  of  the  tech-
nology  today,  the  economics  surrounding  that  technology,  and  its  non-proliferation
implications.

Thank  you  again  Madam  Chairwoman,  and  I  yield  back  the  balance  of  my  time.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
At  this  time,  I  would  like  to  extend  a  warm  welcome  to  my  col-
league from Ohio, Mr. Hobson, Chairman of the Energy and Water
Development Appropriations Subcommittee. And I would ask unan-
imous consent that Chairman Hobson be allowed to sit in with the
Committee and participate in today’s hearing. Without objection, so
ordered.

Chairman Hobson, would you like to say a few words?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

Mr.  HOBSON.  Well,  it  is  hard  to  say  a  few  words  when  you  are

a Congressman, but I will try.

I want to thank the Chairwoman for allowing me to be here with
all of you today, and I am really here to listen for a few moments.
I do have to leave, but I want to demonstrate our support together
with  this  committee  and  my  Committee  for  the  work  that  you  are
doing.

I think this is most important to the future of our country. Recy-
cling, or reprocessing, is something that I think we need to do. Re-
cently,  we  sent  some  material  to  France,  and  it  was  recycled  and
returned to this country where it is going to be burned in a nuclear
power  plant  in  this  country.  There  aren’t  any  dire  consequences  of
doing  all  of  that.  It  is  too  bad  we  couldn’t  do  it  here.  This  has  a
lot  of  economic  benefit  to  this  country  in  the  future,  and  what  we
are  trying  to  do  is  get  the  dialogue  going  and  to  get  some  real  ac-
tion.

I  know  that  what  we  did  in  our  bill  is  a  little  controversial,  but
it is a way to kick the can over to try to start people to talk about
things  and  to  get  some  new  processes,  if  necessary.  This  is  being
done in the rest of the world. We need to relook at our policies that
were  determined  probably  50  years  or  so  ago.  But  I  want  to  also
say that I am very supportive of Yucca Mountain. I just don’t want
to get the Yucca Mountain II any sooner than we have to, and this
is a way of not doing that.

But  I  want  to  thank  you  for  the  courage  that  you  have  taken  to
step forward, Madame Chairwoman, to raise this issue and to look
at  it  from  your  Committee’s  standpoint,  and  I  commend  you  for
that. And thank you for allowing me to be here.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Thank  you  very  much  for  coming  today.
And  let  us  see.  Any  additional  opening  statements  submitted  by

the Members may be added to the record.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Costello follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE JERRY F. COSTELLO

Good morning. I want to thank the witnesses for appearing before our committee
to examine the status of nuclear fuel reprocessing technologies in the United States.
Every  nuclear  power  reactor  produces  approximately  20  tons  of  highly  radioactive
nuclear waste every year. Today, the waste is stored on-site at the nuclear reactors
in  water-filled  cooling  pools,  or  at  some  sites,  after  sufficient  cooling,  in  dry  casks
above  ground.  It  is  important  to  note  that  a  recent  report  issued  by  the  National
Academy of Sciences concluded this stored waste could be vulnerable to terrorist at-
tacks.  Therefore,  it  is  critical  we  begin  to  review  our  current  nuclear  waste  policies
and  access  possible  policy  options  that  may  come  before  the  Congress  in  the  next
few years.

Today’s hearing marks the beginning of an important policy discussion on reproc-
essing  technologies  and  the  impact  it  will  have  on  energy  efficiency,  nuclear  waste
management  and  weapons  proliferation.  I  believe  we  should  carefully  examine  the
advantages and disadvantages of using reprocessing, and evaluate the policy options
before making any decisions. At the same time, we cannot back away or retract from
addressing  critical  national  security  concerns,  such  as  nuclear  waste  management
and weapons proliferation just because nuclear reprocessing is a controversial issue.
Within  my  home  State  of  Illinois,  the  only  nuclear  engineering  department  is  at
the University of Illinois. This is particularly alarming because our state has 11 op-
erating  nuclear  power  reactors,  Argonne  National  Laboratory,  where  Dr.  Phillip
Finck  is  from,  and  other  nuclear  facilities.  Illinois  residents  have  paid  more  than
$2.4  billion  on  the  federal  Nuclear  Waste  Fund.  My  state  has  a  large  stake  in  nu-
clear power and technology and under-supported programs and initiatives that could
improve upon our nuclear capabilities are quite troubling.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

I  am  interested  in  hearing  from  our  witnesses  about  the  feasibility  of  selecting
a  reprocessing  technology  by  2007.  Over  time,  technology  will  develop,  interest  will
continue to grow, and economic circumstances may change in ways that point clear-
ly  in  one  direction.  I  believe  we  have  an  obligation  to  set  aside  sufficient  funds  so
that we are not passing unfunded obligations on to our children and grandchildren,
but not at the risk of implementing decisions prematurely, thereby depriving future
generations of what might turn out to be better options developed later.

I welcome our witnesses and look forward to their testimony.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Johnson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE EDDIE BERNICE JOHNSON

Examining nuclear fuel reprocessing technologies is a vital step in developing en-
ergy  policy  for  the  United  States.  Currently,  this  country  relies  on  nuclear  reactors
for  roughly  20  percent  of  our  total  energy.  While  nuclear  energy  provides  less  reli-
ance  on  foreign  oil  and  produces  no  greenhouse  gas  emissions,  there  is  the  per-
sistent  concern  about  nuclear  waste.  Today,  this  waste  is  stored  on-site  at  the  nu-
clear  reactors  power  facilities.  This  is  not  only  a  safety  concern,  but  also  makes
these  facilities  prime  targets  to  terrorist  attack.  In  order  to  move  towards  the  fu-
ture,  we  must  examine  the  best  methods  to  deal  with  this  waste—whether  it’s
through  reprocessing  or  moving  it  to  another  location.  This  hearing  is  a  key  step
in beginning this dialogue for the future.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  And  with  that,  we  will  turn  to  our  wit-

nesses.

And I thank you all for coming this morning. And first of all, we
have  Mr.  Shane  Johnson,  who  is  the  Acting  Director  of  the  Office
of Nuclear Energy, Science, and Technology and the Deputy Direc-
tor  for  Technology  at  the  Department  of  Energy.  Next  is  Mr.  Mat-
thew  Bunn,  who  is  a  Senior  Research  Associate  in  the  Project  on
Managing  the  Atom  at  Harvard  University’s  John  F.  Kennedy
School  of  Government.  Thank  you  for  coming.  And  then  Dr.  Roger
Hagengruber.  I  am  going  to  stumble  over  that  all  day  long.
Hagengruber. He serves at the University of New Mexico as Direc-
tor  of  the  Office  for  Policy,  Security,  and  Technology,  Director  of
the  Institute  for  Public  Policy,  and  professor  of  political  science,
and  he  chairs  the  Nuclear  Energy  Study  Group  of  the  American
Physical  Society,  which  issued  a  May  2005  report:  ‘‘Nuclear  Power
and  Proliferation  Resistance:  Securing  Benefits,  Limiting  Risks.’’
And last, but not least, is Dr. Phillip Finck, who is the Deputy As-
sociate  Laboratory  Director,  Applied  Science  and  Technology  and
National  Security  at  Argonne  National  Laboratory  right  in  Illinois
in my District. Welcome. And welcome to you all.

As  the  witnesses  know,  spoken  testimony  will  be  limited  to  five
minutes each, after which the members will have five minutes each
to ask questions.

And we will begin with Mr. Johnson. You are recognized for five

minutes.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  ROBERT  SHANE  JOHNSON,  ACTING  DI-
RECTOR,  OFFICE  OF  NUCLEAR  ENERGY,  SCIENCE  AND
TECHNOLOGY;  DEPUTY  DIRECTOR  FOR  TECHNOLOGY,  U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY
Mr. JOHNSON. Chairman Biggert, Congressman Honda, Members
of the Committee, and Chairman Hobson, I would like to thank you
for  the  opportunity  to  speak  today  on  the  Department  of  Energy’s
efforts to develop and demonstrate advanced spent fuel separations
and recycling technologies.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

I  have  submitted  a  written  statement  for  the  record,  but  would

15

like to provide a few summary remarks.

As  you  know,  the  President’s  National  Energy  Policy  rec-
ommended  the  expansion  of  nuclear  energy  in  the  United  States.
To do this, we must also develop and apply advanced technologies,
including  advanced  proliferation  resistance,  spent  fuel  treatment
technologies, and next generation reactor technologies.

These  fuel  treatment  technologies  are  aimed  at  safely  and  se-
curely reducing the amount of commercial spent fuel requiring dis-
posal  in  a  geologic  repository.  These  technologies,  in  combination
with Generation IV reactors, hold the promise of deferring, perhaps
indefinitely, the need for a second repository while reducing the in-
ventory of civilian plutonium.

While  the  United  States  is  a  leader  in  the  development  of  these
technologies, it is important to note that other nations with domes-
tic nuclear programs are also investigating similar technologies.

The  policy  underpinnings  of  our  Advanced  Fuel  Cycle  Initiative
and  our  international  cooperation  is  found  in  the  May  2001  Na-
tional  Energy  Policy,  which  states  that  the  United  States  should
consider  technologies  in  collaboration  with  international  partners
with  highly-developed  fuel  cycles  and  a  record  of  close  cooperation
to  develop  fuel  treatment  technologies  that  are  cleaner,  more  effi-
cient, less waste-intensive, and more proliferation-resistant.

The  technologies  being  developed  in  our  Advanced  Fuel  Cycle
program present a significant advantage in proliferation resistance
over  separation  technologies  currently  being  used  in  other  parts  of
the  world  and  which  were  previously  used  in  the  United  States,
namely  the  Plutonium-Uranium  Extraction  process,  or  PUREX.
PUREX is an aqueous separations process that was deployed in the
United  States  in  the  mid-1950s  to  separate  high-purity  plutonium
and uranium from fission products and minor transuranic elements
in irradiated nuclear fuels.

Over  the  last  several  years,  our  Advanced  Fuel  Cycle  program
has made significant progress in the development of advanced sep-
aration  processes.  We  have  successfully  demonstrated  the  feasi-
bility  of  the  Uranium  Extraction  Plus,  or  UREX+,  process  at  lab-
oratory scale using actual spent nuclear fuel and are planning inte-
grated  experiments  at  larger  scale.  The  UREX+  process  is  an  ad-
vanced  process  that  separates  uranium  from  spent  nuclear  fuel  at
a  very  high  level  of  purity.  Unlike  the  PUREX  process,  UREX+
does not produce a separated plutonium product and thus provides
a considerable advantage in reducing proliferation risks.

The  Department  is  also  investigating  alternative  separations
technology,  called  pyroprocessing.  Pyroprocessing  technology  em-
ploys high-temperature operations that use selective reduction and
oxidation steps in molten salts and metals to recover nuclear mate-
rials.

The  scale-up  of  these  technologies  from  laboratory-scale  to  engi-
neering-scale  is  possible  with  minimal  technical  risk.  Using  exist-
ing  facilities,  engineering-scale  verification  experiments  could  be
underway  in  five  to  six  years  with  possible  commercial-scale  oper-
ations  possible  in  10  to  12  years.  Fuel  fabrication  experiments,  as
well  as  commercial-scale  operations,  would  lag  the  demonstration
of the separations technology by two to four years. However, modi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

fying  existing  structures  presents  numerous  technical  and  regu-
latory challenges.

An option to existing facilities is a greenfield approach for the en-
gineering-scale  demonstration.  If  such  an  engineering-scale  oper-
ation  were  conducted  in  a  new  facility,  the  demonstration  experi-
ments  could  begin  in  approximately  nine  years,  and  it  is  antici-
pated  that  commercial—that  would—that  the  technology  would  be
commercially  available  within  about  20  years.  Again,  fuel  fabrica-
tion  would  lag,  the  separations  work  by  about  two  to  four  years.
The  Administration  is  currently  examining  recommendations  of
the Congress contained in the U.S. House of Representatives report
accompanying  the  Energy  and  Water  Development  Appropriations
bill for fiscal year 2006 specifically that the Department should in-
form a decision by fiscal year 2007 on a preferred separations tech-
nology  and  develop  an  integrated  spent  fuel  management  plan  by
that time that will ensure safe, secure, and efficient deployment of
nuclear power around the globe.

We  look  forward  to  working  closely  with  the  Congress  on  what
is a key issue to spent nuclear fuel management today and into the
future.

Madame Chairman, this completes my statement, and I would be

pleased to answer any questions you might have. Thank you.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Johnson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROBERT SHANE JOHNSON

Chairman  Biggert,  Ranking  Member  Honda,  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I
would  like  to  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  before  the  Committee  on
Science, Subcommittee on Energy concerning United States and international efforts
to  develop  and  demonstrate  advanced  spent  fuel  separations  and  recycling  tech-
nologies.  Also,  I  thank  you  for  your  leadership  in  the  area  of  nuclear  energy  tech-
nologies  and  for  your  interest  in  pursuing  solutions  to  the  Nation’s  challenges  with
the disposition of commercial spent nuclear fuel.

As  you  know,  the  President’s  2001  National  Energy  Policy  recommended  the  ex-
pansion  of  nuclear  energy  in  this  country  to  reduce  our  dependence  on  imported
fuels needed for electricity generation and to reduce emissions. To meet these chal-
lenges,  we  must  develop  and  apply  advanced  technologies,  including  advanced  nu-
clear  fuel  cycles  and  next  generation  reactor  technologies,  and  development  of  ad-
vanced  fuel  treatment  technologies.  These  efforts  are  aimed  at  developing  new  ad-
vanced  proliferation-resistant  spent  fuel  treatment  technologies  to  reduce  the
amount  of  commercial  high  level  waste  and  spent  fuel  requiring  storage  in  a  geo-
logic repository. If successful, these efforts could substantially improve repository ca-
pacity.  In  the  longer-term  future,  these  technologies  in  combination  with  advanced
nuclear reactor technologies hold the promise of deferring, perhaps indefinitely, the
need for a second repository, while reducing the inventory of civilian plutonium.

My  testimony  today  focuses  on  U.S.  efforts  to  develop  new  advanced  separations
technologies technologies that are more efficient, less waste intensive and more pro-
liferation  resistant—our  progress  in  developing  these  technologies,  and  additional
work that is needed to demonstrate commercial viability of these technologies. While
the  United  States  is  a  leader  in  development  of  these  technologies,  it  is  important
to  recognize  that  other  nations  (e.g.,  France,  Japan,  the  United  Kingdom,  China,
India,  and  Russia)  with  domestic  nuclear  programs  are  also  investigating  these
technologies.  Collaborations  are  also  underway  between  the  United  States  and  sev-
eral  of  these  countries.  A  fundamental  objective  of  U.S.  collaborations  is  develop-
ment  of  advanced  proliferation  resistant  fuel  cycle  technologies  that  will  set  the
standard for future international deployment of fuel cycle facilities.
BACKGROUND

The policy underpinnings of the Department of Energy’s Advanced Fuel Cycle Ini-
tiative  and  its  program  for  international  cooperation  with  other  countries  is  con-
tained in the May 2001 National Energy Policy, which states that:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

‘‘. . .in the context of developing advanced nuclear fuel cycles and next genera-
tion  technologies  for  nuclear  energy,  the  United  States  should  re-examine  its
policies  to  allow  for  research,  development  and  deployment  of  fuel  conditioning
methods  that  reduce  waste  streams  and  enhance  proliferation  resistance.  In
doing so, the United States will continue to discourage the accumulation of sep-
arated plutonium, worldwide.’’

The  policy  further  states  that  the  United  States  should  consider  technologies,  in
collaboration  with  international  partners  with  highly-developed  fuel  cycles  and  a
record  of  close  cooperation,  to  develop  fuel  treatment  technologies  that  are  cleaner,
more efficient, less waste-intensive, and more proliferation-resistant.

Inherent  in  this  recommendation  is  the  recognition  that  regardless  of  anticipated
growth in nuclear generation, the Nation needs to establish a permanent geological
repository  for  spent  nuclear  fuel  from  the  operation  of  our  existing  commercial  nu-
clear  power  plants.  Further,  growth  in  nuclear  energy  in  the  United  States  using
the  current  spent  fuel  management  approach  would  require  construction  of  addi-
tional  geologic  repositories  to  address  spent  nuclear  fuel  inventories  generated  by
the operation of additional nuclear power plants. However, development of advanced
separations technologies present a potential alternative to building new repositories,
optimizing the current geologic repository, and enabling more efficient use of our nu-
clear fuel resources.

As such, separations technologies are under development in the United States and
by  other  countries  to  reduce  the  volume,  toxicity,  and  fissile  material  content  of
spent  nuclear  fuel  requiring  the  disposal  in  a  permanent  geologic  repository.  These
advanced technologies are aimed at avoiding the proliferation issues associated with
separated plutonium while resulting in significantly smaller quantities of high-level
radioactive waste, enabling optimization of the geological repository.

These new technologies present a significant advantage in proliferation resistance
over  existing  separations  technologies  being  used  in  other  parts  of  the  world  today
and which were used previously in the United States—the Plutonium-Uranium Ex-
traction  (PURER)  technology.  PURER  is  an  aqueous  separations  process  that  was
deployed  initially  in  the  mid-1950s  to  recover  high  purity  plutonium  and  uranium
from  fission  products  and  minor  transuranic  elements  (elements  heavier  than  ura-
nium).  PURER  has  been  deployed  commercially  in  several  countries—principally
France, the United Kingdom, Japan and Russia.

In  the  future,  we  believe  that  advanced  separations  technologies,  such  as  URa-
nium EXtraction Plus (UREX+), could enable us to further extend the useful life of
any  geologic  repository  and  reduce  the  radiotoxicity  of  the  waste  it  contains  such
that it would decay to the toxicity of natural uranium ore in less than 1,000 years—
instead  of  over  100,000  years  as  is  the  case  with  our  current,  untreated  spent  nu-
clear  fuel.  This  technology  could  also  allow  our  nuclear  plants  to  use  a  far  higher
fraction  of  the  energy  contained  in  uranium  ore,  potentially  expanding  the  lifetime
of the world’s nuclear fuel resources from around 100 years up to 1,000 years.
DEVELOPMENT OF INNOVATIVE SEPARATIONS TECHNOLOGIES

Over the last several years, the Department’s Advanced Fuel Cycle Initiative has
made  significant  progress  in  the  development  of  new  fuel  treatment  technologies,
particularly  as  applied  to  the  development  of  the  UREX+  technology,  a  technology
that separates uranium from spent nuclear fuel at a very high level of purity. This
is important because it demonstrates the feasibility of greatly reducing the mass of
material that would require disposal in a geologic repository. The research has also
successfully  demonstrated  the  ability  to  separate  the  short-term  heat  generating
constituents  of  spent  fuel  and  the  partitioning  of  the  transuranic  elements.  Unlike
the  PUREX  process,  the  UREX+  process  does  not  produce  a  separated  plutonium
product which provides a considerable advantage in reducing proliferation risk.

Presently, the Department has demonstrated the feasibility of the UREX+ process
based  on  laboratory-scale  tests  using  actual  spent  nuclear  fuel.  While  the  results
from  our  laboratory-scale  tests  coupled  with  general  industrial-scale  experience
could  provide  a  high  level  of  confidence  that  the  general  direction  being  rec-
ommended is technically feasible, integrated processing experiments carried out suc-
cessfully at a larger engineering-scale would be needed before there is sufficient in-
formation  to  design  and  build  new  facilities  or  make  needed  major  modifications  to
existing facilities for commercial-scale operations.

While the UREX+ process has great potential to address the spent fuel challenges
associated  with  today’s  commercial  light  water  reactors,  the  Department  has  also
been  investigating  an  alternative  separations  technology  called  pyroprocessing,
which  is  more  appropriate  for  treating  advanced  fuels  from  fast  reactors  like  those
under  investigation  in  the  Department’s  Generation  IV  reactor  program  that  may
be  developed  and  deployed  in  the  long-term  future.  The  pyroprocessing  technology

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

employs  high-temperature  operations  that  use  selective  reduction  and  oxidation  in
molten  salts  and  metals  to  recover  nuclear  materials.  The  pyrochemical  processing
technology is also supportive of nonproliferation objectives in that the resulting sep-
arated  fuel  material  is  adequate  for  use  in  fueling  advanced  fast-neutron  spectrum
reactors but represents a significant reduction in proliferation risk as the plutonium
remains  mixed  with  the  other  transuranic  elements  and  fission  products.  The  larg-
est  scale  application  of  this  technology  is  found  at  the  Idaho  National  Laboratory
where  engineering-scale  treatment  of  sodium-bonded  spent  nuclear  fuel  from  the
shutdown  Experimental  Breeder  Reactor  II  has  provided  several  years  of  research
and operations data. At maximum capacity, this engineering-scale demonstration is
capable of processing up to three metric tons of spent nuclear fuel annually.
DEVELOPMENT OF ADVANCED FUEL CYCLE TECHNOLOGIES

The United States presently employs a once-through fuel cycle—that is, the spent
fuel  is  not  recycled  but  rather  discharged  from  the  reactor  and  maintained  in  in-
terim  storage  at  the  reactor  site  pending  future  shipment  to  a  geologic  repository.
However,  as  discussed  previously,  a  number  of  countries  operate  a  partially  closed
fuel  cycle  in  that  the  plutonium  is  removed  from  the  spent  fuel  at  a  reprocessing
facility  and  is  sent  to  a  fuel  fabrication  facility  to  be  blended  with  fresh  uranium
and  re-fabricated  into  mixed  oxide  (MOX)  fuel  pellets.  The  pellets  are  placed  into
cladding  material  and  bundled  into  fuel  assemblies  for  subsequent  return  to  light
water  reactors  capable  of  using  MOX  as  fuel.  The  other  spent  fuel  constituents  are
immobilized  in  glass  for  storage  in  a  geologic  repository.  The  Department  is  pur-
suing  an  approach  similar  to  this  one  used  by  other  countries  to  create  MOX  from
surplus weapons grade plutonium.

The Department’s Advanced Fuel Cycle Initiative fuels development includes pro-
liferation-resistant  fuels  for  light  water  reactors,  fuels  that  will  enable  transmuta-
tion  of  transuranics  in  Generation  IV  reactors,  and  all  fuels  for  the  fast  reactor
group of Generation IV reactors. The objective of these technologies is to avoid sepa-
rating plutonium in a pure form. The resultant mixed oxide fuel would contain some
or  all  of  the  minor  actinides  (neptunium,  americium  and  curium)  contained  in  the
spent  fuel  to  enhance  its  proliferation  resistance  and  allow  for  further  reductions
in  the  volume  and  radiotoxicity  of  the  resulting  high-level  wastes.  In  each  of  these
technologies, the benign residual fission products would be sent to a geologic reposi-
tory with the exception of iodine-129 and strontium/cesium which would be disposed
by  means  other  than  a  geologic  repository.  These  approaches  are  anticipated  to  in-
crease the effective capacity of a geologic repository by a factor of 50 to 100.

In  fast  reactor  scenarios,  actinides  from  spent  fuel  can  be  processed  to  separate
them  from  the  bulk  of  the  fission  products  and  uranium.  The  actinide  stream  can
then be used to manufacture fuel for use in fast reactors. Because the fuel is highly
radioactive, the fuel fabrication process must be conducted in shielded facilities, con-
ferring an additional degree of proliferation resistance.

Commercial  scale-up  of  these  spent  fuel  technologies  can,  based  on  our  recent
analysis, be performed relatively rapidly, if existing domestic facilities could be sub-
stantially  modified  and  utilized.  Using  existing 
facilities,  engineering-scale
verification  experiments  for  a  chosen  separation  technology  could  be  underway  in
five to six years and commercial-scale operations could begin in ten to twelve years.
Fuel  fabrication  experiments  and  commercial-scale  operations  would  lag  the  dem-
onstration  of  the  separations  technology  by  two  to  four  years.  However,  retrofitting
existing structures to demonstrate commercial viability of spent fuel treatment pre-
sents  numerous  technical  and  regulatory  challenges  and  may  not  be  the  most  rea-
sonable approach. For example, a down-side to retrofitting existing structures would
be the current age of the structure and inherent inflexibilities such as the introduc-
tion  and  testing  of  modern  instrumentation  for  process  control,  accountability  and
proliferation resistance.

An  alternate  scenario  could  be  to  build  a  ‘‘greenfield’’  engineering-scale  dem-
onstration  facility  that  could  provide  assurance  of  the  commercial  viability  of  spent
fuel  treatment  and  fuel  fabrication  technologies.  If  both  the  engineering-scale  and
commercial-scale  operations  were  conducted  in  new  facilities  designed  from  the
ground  up,  engineering-scale  experiments  of  a  selected  separations  process  could
begin  in  approximately  nine  years  and  commercial  operation,  in  about  twenty.
Again, fuel fabrication would lag by two to four years.
CONCLUSION

Over  the  last  few  years,  the  Department  has  successfully  demonstrated  the  tech-
nical feasibility of advanced, proliferation-resistant fuel cycle technologies. Engineer-
ing-scale  demonstrations,  however,  are  needed  to  demonstrate  with  reasonable  con-
fidence the commercial feasibility of these technologies. We look forward to working

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

closely with the Congress on the key issue of spent nuclear fuel management today
and in the future.

I would be pleased to answer any questions you may have.

BIOGRAPHY FOR ROBERT SHANE JOHNSON

Shane  Johnson  is  the  Acting  Director  of  DOE’s  Office  of  Nuclear  Energy,  Science
and  Technology.  He  was  appointed  to  this  position  in  May  2005,  upon  the  resigna-
tion of the prior Director.

In  this  capacity,  Mr.  Johnson  leads  the  Department’s  nuclear  energy  enterprise,
including nuclear technology research and development; management of the Depart-
ment’s  nuclear  technology  infrastructure;  and  support  to  nuclear  education  in  the
United States. Mr. Johnson also serves as the Lead Program Secretarial Officer for
the  Idaho  National  Laboratory,  the  Department’s  lead  laboratory  for  nuclear  tech-
nology research, development and demonstration.

Since  2000,  Mr.  Johnson  has  led  the  Office’s  nuclear  technology  initiatives,  serv-
ing  a  key  leadership  role  in  the  initiation  and  management  of  all  of  the  Office’s
major  research  and  development  initiatives,  including  the  Generation  IV  Nuclear
Energy Systems Initiative, the Advanced Fuel Cycle Initiative, and the Nuclear Hy-
drogen Initiative. In 2004, Mr. Johnson was promoted to the position of Deputy Di-
rector for Technology, where his responsibilities also include management of the Nu-
clear Power 2010 program and initiatives aimed at strengthening university nuclear
science and engineering programs in the United States.

Mr.  Johnson  serves  a  central  role  in  the  Department’s  efforts  to  reassert  U.S.
leadership  in  nuclear  technology  development.  He  led  the  formation  of  the  Genera-
tion IV International Forum (GIF), an international collective of ten leading nations
and  the  European  Union’s  Euratom,  dedicated  to  developing  advanced  reactor  and
fuel cycle technologies. He leads the Office’s international cooperation activities, in-
cluding  establishment  of  cooperative  research  agreements  with  other  countries  and
the  development  by  the  GIF  of  the  Generation  IV  technology  roadmap,  which  re-
sulted  in  the  selection  of  six  promising  reactor  and  fuel  cycle  technologies  by  the
GIF  for  future  development  efforts.  Mr.  Johnson  currently  serves  as  the  acting
chairman of the GIF, pending election of a permanent chairman, and has served as
the U.S. representative to the policy committee since 2001.

Mr.  Johnson  has  over  twenty  years  of  relevant  management  and  engineering  ex-
perience  within  Government  and  industry.  Prior  to  joining  DOE,  Mr.  Johnson  was
employed for five years by Duke Power Company and Stoner Associates, Inc. where
he was responsible for performing engineering studies for nuclear, natural gas, and
water utilities.

Mr. Johnson received his B.S. degree in Nuclear Engineering from North Carolina
State University and his M.S. degree in Mechanical Engineering from Pennsylvania
State University. He is a licensed professional engineer.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much, Mr. Johnson.
And now Mr. Bunn, you are recognized for five minutes.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  MATTHEW  BUNN,  SENIOR  RESEARCH  AS-
SOCIATE,  PROJECT  ON  MANAGING  THE  ATOM,  HARVARD
UNIVERSITY,  JOHN  F.  KENNEDY  SCHOOL  OF  GOVERNMENT
Mr.  BUNN.  Madame  Chairwoman  and  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee,  it  is  an  honor  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  a  subject  that  is
very  important  to  the  future  of  nuclear  energy  and  efforts  to  stem
the  spread  of  nuclear  weapons,  that  is  reprocessing  of  spent  nu-
clear fuel.

I support limited continued R&D on advanced fuel cycle concepts
that may offer promise for the future, but I believe a near-term de-
cision  to  reprocess  U.S.  commercial  spent  nuclear  fuel  would  be  a
serious  mistake,  with  costs  and  risks  far  outweighing  its  potential
benefits.

Let me make seven points to support that view.
First,  reprocessing,  by  itself,  does  not  make  any  of  the  nuclear
waste  go  away.  It  simply  separates—it  is  a  chemical  process  that
separates the radioactive materials into different components. Only

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

if  the  added  complexity  of  recycling  or  transmutation  follows  re-
processing is there a potential, not yet demonstrated, for destroying
many  of  the  long-lived  radioactive  materials.  Whatever  course  we
choose, we will still need nuclear waste repositories, such as Yucca
Mountain.

As  we  heard,  in  the  traditional  process,  known  as  PUREX,  the
spent  fuel  is  separated  into  plutonium,  which  is  weapons-usable,
recovered uranium, and high-level waste. More advanced processes,
like  UREX+  and  pyroprocessing,  attempt  to  address  some  of  the
problems  of  PUREX,  but  whether  they  will  do  so  successfully  re-
mains to be seen.

Second,  reprocessing  using  current  technologies  or  technologies
available  in  the  near-term  would  substantially  increase,  not  de-
crease,  the  costs  of  nuclear  waste  management.  In  a  recent  Har-
vard  study,  we  found,  making  assumptions  quite  favorable  to  re-
processing,  that  the  costs  of  reprocessing  and  recycling  would  be
about  80  percent  higher  than  those  of  direct  disposal,  and  other
studies,  including  government  studies  in  countries  that  are  enthu-
siastic  about  reprocessing,  such  as  France  and  Japan,  have  come
to similar conclusions.

The one mill per kilowatt-hour nuclear waste fee would no longer
be  sufficient.  Either  the  fee  would  have  to  be  substantially  in-
creased,  or  tens  of  billions  of  dollars  in  taxpayer  subsidies  would
have  to  be  provided,  or  onerous  regulations  would  have  to  be  im-
posed  to  force  the  industry  to  build  and  operate  the  needed  facili-
ties itself.

The  UREX+  technology  now  being  researched  adds  a  number  of
complex  separation  steps  to  the  traditional  PUREX  approach  and
appears  likely  to  further  increase  costs.  Other  processes  might
some  day  reduce  costs,  but  this  remains  to  be  demonstrated.  Offi-
cial studies in recent years have predicted that the advanced proc-
essing  and  transmutation  technologies  being  pursued  would  be
more expensive than traditional approaches, not less.

Third,  reprocessing  and  recycling  using  the  technologies  now
commercially  available  means  separating,  fabricating,  and  trans-
porting tons of weapons-usable plutonium every year, when even a
few kilograms is enough for a bomb, inevitably raising proliferation
risks  not  posed  by  direct  disposal.  It  is  crucial  to  understand  that
any state or group that could make a bomb from weapon-grade plu-
tonium  would  also  be  able  to  make  a  bomb  from  the  reactor-grade
plutonium separated by reprocessing.

Moreover,  a  near-term  U.S.  return  to  reprocessing  would  make
it  more  difficult  to  achieve  President  Bush’s  goal  of  convincing
other  countries  not  to  build  their  own  reprocessing  facilities.  The
new  approaches,  as  Mr.  Johnson  mentioned,  are  designed  not  to
separate pure plutonium, but the plutonium-bearing materials that
would  be  separated 
in  either  the  UREX+  process  or  by
pyroprocessing  would  not  be  radioactive  enough  to  meet  inter-
national  standards  for  being  very  difficult  to  steal.  And  if  these
technologies  were  widely  deployed  in  the  developing  world  where
most of the future growth in electricity demand will be, that would
contribute to the spread of expertise, experience, and facilities that
could be readily turned to a nuclear weapons program.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

Fourth,  while  unfortunately  no  complete  life  cycle  comparison  of
the  safety  and  terrorism  risks  of  reprocessing  and  direct  disposal
has  yet  been  done,  it  seems  clear  that  extensive  processing  of  in-
tensely radioactive fuel in the presence of highly volatile chemicals
presents  more  opportunities  for  radioactive  releases  than  simply
leaving the fuel untouched in large casks.

Fifth,  the  waste  management  benefits  that  might  be  derived  are
quite  limited.  While  the  new  technologies  have,  as  their  goal,  re-
ducing  both  the  volume  of  waste  to  be  disposed  and  its  long-term
hazard, the reality is that the projected radiological doses from geo-
logic  repositories  are  already  quite  low,  and  there  are  a  variety  of
approaches  to  providing  additional  disposal  capacity  at  Yucca
Mountain  or  elsewhere  without  recycling,  and  these  have  not  yet
been adequately examined.

Sixth, the potential energy benefits are also quite limited. There
is, indeed, quite a lot of energy in spent fuel, but in today’s market,
it is like oil shale: there is a lot of energy in it, but the cost of get-
ting  that  energy  out  is  much  more  than  that  energy  is  worth.
World  resources  of  uranium  recoverable  at  prices  far  below  those
at  which  reprocessing  would  make  sense  are  sufficient  to  fuel  a
growing  global  nuclear  enterprise  for  many  decades  without  recy-
cling.

Seventh,  and  perhaps  most  important,  there  is  no  need  to  rush
to make this decision. We have today a proven, commercially-avail-
able technology that will manage spent fuel cheaply, safely, and se-
curely for decades, and that is dry casks, which utilities around the
country are buying today. We can, and should, allow time for tech-
nology  to  develop  further  and  for  this  decision  to  be  made  with
care.  Our  generation  does  have  an  obligation  to  set  aside  enough
funds so that future generations are not left with an unfunded obli-
gation, but we have no obligation to rush to judgment. Our grand-
children will not thank us for implementing a technology today and
depriving them of options that might be better that might be devel-
oped later.

Indeed,  because  the  repository  will  remain  open  for  50  to  100
years,  with  spent  fuel  readily  retrievable,  proceeding  forward  with
direct  disposal  would  leave  all  options  open  for  the  future.  It  is  a
good  thing  that  there  is  no  need  to  rush,  because  the  technologies
available  are  at  a  very  early  stage  of  development.  Only  the  most
limited,  as  we  heard,  laboratory-scale  experiments  have  been  com-
pleted to date, and serious systems analysis of the costs of the dif-
ferent options, their safety and terrorism resistance, their prolifera-
tion  impacts,  prospects  for  licensing,  and  public  acceptance  have
not yet been done.

I recommend that we follow the bipartisan advice of the National
Commission  on  Energy  Policy,  which  concluded  that  the  United
States  should  continue  its  moratorium  on  reprocessing,  should  ex-
pand  interim  spent  fuel  storage  capacities,  should  proceed  with  all
deliberate speed toward opening a permanent geologic waste repos-
itory, and should continue R&D on advanced fuel cycle approaches.
At  the  same  time,  the  U.S.  Government  should  redouble  its  ef-
forts:  to  limit  the  spread  of  reprocessing  and  enrichment  tech-
nologies around the world, as a critical element of President Bush’s
efforts to stem the spread of nuclear weapons; to ensure that every

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

nuclear warhead and every kilogram of both plutonium and highly-
enriched  uranium  worldwide  is  secure  and  accounted  for,  as  a  key
element of our efforts to prevent nuclear terrorism; and to convince
other  countries  to  end  the  accumulation  of  plutonium  stockpiles
while  working  to  reduce  stockpiles  of  both  plutonium  and  highly-
enriched uranium around the world.

Some  day,  approaches  to  reprocessing  and  recycling  may  be  de-
veloped that make sense. Research and development should explore
such  possibilities,  but  we  should  not  rush  to  judgment  now.  If  we
want  nuclear  energy  to  grow  enough  to  make  a  significant  con-
tribution to meeting the climate change challenge, that will require
building  support  from  governments,  publics,  and  utilities  around
the  world,  and  doing  that  means  making  nuclear  energy  as  cheap,
as simple, as safe, as proliferation-resistant, and as terrorism-proof
as  possible.  Reprocessing  using  any  of  the  technologies  we  have
now or will have in the near-term points in the wrong direction on
every  count.  And  therefore,  those  who  hope  for  a  bright  future  for
nuclear energy ought to oppose near-term reprocessing of spent nu-
clear fuel.

I would be happy to take your questions.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Bunn follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MATTHEW BUNN

The Case Against a Near-Term Decision to Reprocess Spent

Nuclear Fuel in the United States

Madam  Chairwoman  and  Members  of  the  Committee:  It  is  an  honor  to  be  here
today to discuss a subject that is very important to the future of nuclear energy and
efforts  to  stem  the  spread  of  nuclear  weapons—reprocessing  of  spent  nuclear  fuel.
I  believe  that,  while  research  and  development  (R&D)  on  advanced  concepts  that
may  offer  promise  for  the  future  should  continue,  a  near-term  decision  to  reprocess
U.S. commercial spent nuclear fuel would be a serious mistake, with costs and risks
far  outweighing  its  potential  benefits.  Let  me  make  seven  points  to  support  that
view.

First,  reprocessing  by  itself  does  not  make  any  of  the  nuclear  waste  go  away.
Whatever  course  we  choose,  we  will  still  need  a  nuclear  waste  repository  such  as
Yucca  Mountain.1 Reprocessing  is  simply  a  chemical  process  that  separates  the  ra-
dioactive  materials  in  spent  fuel  into  different  components.  In  the  traditional  proc-
ess,  known  as  PUREX,  reprocessing  produces  separated  plutonium  (which  is  weap-
ons-usable), recovered uranium, and high-level waste (containing all the other trans-
uranic  elements  and  fission  products).  In  the  process,  intermediate  and  low-level
wastes  are  also  generated.  More  advanced  processes  now  being  examined,  such  as
UREX+ and pyroprocessing, attempt to address some of the problems of the PUREX
process, but whether they will do so successfully remains to be seen. Once the spent
fuel  has  been  reprocessed,  the  plutonium  and  uranium  separated  from  the  spent
fuel can in principle be recycled into new fuel; in the more advanced processes, some
other  long-lived  species  would  also  be  irradiated  in  reactors  (or  accelerator-driven
assemblies) to transmute them into shorter-lived species.
More Expensive

Second, reprocessing and recycling using current or near-term technologies would
substantially  increase  the  cost  of  nuclear  waste  management,  even  if  the  cost  of
both  uranium  and  geologic  repositories  increase  significantly.  In  a  recent  Harvard
study,  we  concluded,  even  making  a  number  of  assumptions  that  were  quite  favor-

1 Some  residents  of  Nevada  seem  to  see  reprocessing,  incorrectly,  as  an  alternative  to  Yucca
Mountain,  but  none  of  the  strategies  now  proposed  would  eliminate  the  need  for  a  repository
for  highly  toxic  nuclear  waste.  Indeed,  it  might  surprise  Nevadans  to  know  that  a  stated  pur-
pose of the Advanced Fuel Cycle Initiative is to make it possible to bury the nuclear waste from
a much larger quantity of electricity generation in Yucca Mountain—albeit after transmutation
that, it is hoped, would reduce the long-term radioactive dangers posed by this waste.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

able  to  reprocessing,  that  shifting  to  reprocessing  and  recycling  would  increase  the
costs  of  spent  fuel  management  by  more  than  80%  (after  taking  account  of  appro-
priate  credits  or  charges  for  recovered  plutonium  and  uranium  from  reprocessing).2
Reprocessing  (at  an  optimistic  reprocessing  price)  would  not  become  economic  until
uranium  reached  a  price  of  over  $360  per  kilogram—a  price  not  likely  to  be  seen
for many decades, if then. Government studies even in countries such as France and
Japan have reached similar conclusions.3 The UREX+ technology now being pursued
adds  a  number  of  complex  separation  steps  to  the  traditional  PUREX  process,  in
order  to  separate  important  radioactive  isotopes  for  storage  or  transmutation,4 and
there  is  little  doubt  that  reprocessing  and  transmutation  using  this  process  would
be  even  more  expensive.  Other  processes  might  someday  reduce  the  costs,  but  this
remains to be demonstrated, and a number of recent official studies have estimated
costs for reprocessing and transmutation that are far higher than the costs of tradi-
tional reprocessing and recycling, not lower.5

To  follow  this  course,  either  the  current  one  mill/kilowatt-hour  nuclear  waste  fee
would  have  to  be  substantially  increased,  or  billions  of  dollars  in  tax  money  would
have to be used to subsidize the effort. Since facilities required for reprocessing and
transmutation would not be economically attractive for private industry to build, the
U.S.  Government  would  either  have  to  build  and  operate  these  facilities  itself,  give
private  industry  large  subsidies  to  do  so,  or  impose  onerous  regulations  requiring
private  industry  to  do  so  with  its  own  funds.  All  of  these  options  would  represent
dramatic government intrusions into the nuclear fuel industry, and the implications

2 See Matthew Bunn, Steve Fetter, John P. Holdren, and Bob van der Zwaan, The Economics
of Reprocessing vs. Direct Disposal of Spent Nuclear Fuel (Cambridge, MA: Project on Managing
the  Atom,  Belfer  Center  for  Science  and  International  Affairs,  John  F.  Kennedy  School  of  Gov-
ernment,  Harvard  University,  December  2003,  available  as  of  June  9,  2005  at  http://
bcsia.ksg.harvard.edu/BCSIA¥content/documents/repro-report.pdf).  For  quite  similar  conclu-
sions,  see  John  Deutch  and  Ernest  J.  Moniz,  co-chairs,  The  Future  of  Nuclear  Power:  An  Inter-
disciplinary MIT Study (Cambridge, MA: Massachusetts Institute of Technology, 2003, available
as  of  June  9,  2005  at  http://web.mit.edu/nuclearpower/).  The  MIT  study  presents  the  results  of
its fuel cycle cost calculations differently, comparing the cost of a new low-enriched uranium fuel
element to those of a new plutonium fuel element, assigning all the costs of reprocessing to the
plutonium  incorporated  in  the  new  fuel  element,  rather  than  considering  reprocessing  as  part
of  the  cost  of  spent  fuel  management  and  comparing  the  cost  of  managing  a  fuel  element  by
direct disposal to those of managing it by reprocessing and recycling, as the Harvard study does.
But  these  are  differences  of  presentation,  which  have  no  effect  on  the  estimated  per-kilowatt-
hour  costs  of  the  two  fuel  cycles;  with  the  exception  of  a  few  differences  in  assumptions  (more
favorable  to  reprocessing  in  the  case  of  the  Harvard  study),  the  conclusions  of  the  two  studies
on the economics are very similar.

3 France  and  Japan  have  been  two  of  the  countries  most  dedicated  to  reprocessing  spent  nu-
clear fuel; in both countries, and in the U.K., reprocessing continues not because it is economic
but  because  of  the  inertia  of  past  decisions  and  investments,  the  lack  of  available  space  for
multi-decade interim storage of spent fuel, and arguments that the process will eventually have
environmental and energy-security benefits. The French study compared a scenario in which all
of the low-enriched uranium fuel produced in French reactors was reprocessed to a hypothetical
scenario in which reprocessing and recycling had never been introduced, and found that not re-
processing  would  have  saved  tens  of  billions  of  dollars  compared  to  the  all-reprocessing  case,
and  would  have  reduced  total  electricity  generation  costs  by  more  than  five  percent.  See  Jean-
Michel  Charpin,  Benjamin  Dessus,  and  Rene´ Pellat,  Economic  Forecast  Study  of  the  Nuclear
Power  Option  (Paris,  France:  Office  of  the  Prime  Minister,  July  2000,  available  as  of  December
16, 2003 at http://fire.pppl.gov/eu¥fr¥fission¥plan.pdf), Appendix 1. In Japan, the official esti-
mate  is  that  reprocessing  and  recycling  will  cost  more  than  $100  billion  over  the  next  several
decades.  Studies  performed  by  both  the  government  and  the  utilities  a  decade  ago  concluded
that direct disposal of spent fuel would be much less costly; new analyses performed for an advi-
sory  committee  to  the  Japan  Atomic  Energy  Commission  in  2004  came  to  similar  conclusions.
See,  for  example,  Mark  Hibbs,  ‘‘AEC  Advisory  Panel  Clears  Japan’s  Rokkashomura  for  Reproc-
essing,’’  Nuclear  Fuel,  November  8,  2004;  and  Mark  Hibbs,  ‘‘Japan’s  Look  at  Long-Term  Policy
May  Solve  Rokkashomura  Puzzle,’’  Nuclear  Fuel,  July  19,  2004.  The  government’s  withholding
of  the  data  on  these  past  studies  caused  a  scandal  in  Japan.  In  France,  the  electric  utility  is
state-owned,  and  so  can  be  directed  to  pursue  reprocessing  even  if  it  is  the  more  expensive  ap-
proach; in Japan, the utilities are seeking legislation that would subsidize the costs of reprocess-
ing with a government-imposed charge to all electricity users.

4 George  F.  Vandegrift  et  al.,  ‘‘Designing  and  Demonstration  of  the  UREX+  Process  Using
Spent  Nuclear  Fuel,’’  paper  presented  at  ‘‘ATALANTE  2004:  Advances  for  Future  Nuclear  Fuel
Cycles,’’  Nimes,  France,  June  21–24,  2004,  available  as  of  June  10,  2005  at  http://
www.cmt.anl.gov/science-technology/processchem/Publications/Atalante04.pdf.

5 See, for example, Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, Nuclear Energy
Agency, Accelerator-Driven Systems (ADS) and Fast Reactors (FR) in Advanced Nuclear Fuel Cy-
cles:  A  Comparative  Study  (Paris,  France:  NEA,  2002,  available  as  of  December  16,  2003  at
http://www.nea.fr/html/ndd/reports/2002/nea3109-ads.pdf),  p.  211  and  p.  216;  U.S.  Depart-
ment  of  Energy,  Office  of  Nuclear  Energy,  Generation  IV  Roadmap:  Report  of  the  Fuel  Cycle
Crosscut Group (Washington, DC: DOE, March 18, 2001, available as of July 25, 2003 at http:/
/www.ne.doe.gov/reports/GenIVRoadmapFCCG.pdf.), p. A2–6 and p. A2–8.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

of  such  intrusions  have  not  been  appropriately  examined.  I  am  pleased  that  the
Subcommittee plans a later hearing with representatives from the nuclear industry
to discuss these economic and institutional issues.
Unnecessary proliferation risks

Third,  traditional  approaches  to  reprocessing  and  recycling  pose  significant  and
unnecessary  proliferation  risks,  and  even  proposed  new  approaches  are  not  as  pro-
liferation-resistant  as  they  should  be.  It  is  crucial  to  understand  that  any  state  or
group  that  could  make  a  bomb  from  weapon-grade  plutonium  could  make  a  bomb
from  the  reactor-grade  plutonium  separated  by  reprocessing.6 Despite  the  remark-
able progress of safeguards and security technology over the last few decades, proc-
essing,  fabricating,  and  transporting  tons  of  weapons-usable  separated  plutonium
every  year—when  even  a  few  kilograms  is  enough  for  a  bomb—inevitably  raises
greater  risks  than  not  doing  so.  The  dangers  posed  by  these  operations  can  be  re-
duced with sufficient investment in security and safeguards, but they cannot be re-
duced to zero, and these additional risks are unnecessary.

Indeed,  contrary  to  the  assertion  in  the  Energy  and  Water  appropriations  sub-
committee report that plutonium reprocessing in other countries poses little risk be-
cause the plutonium is immediately recycled as fresh fuel—a conclusion that would
not be correct even if the underlying assertion were true—the fact is that reprocess-
ing is far outpacing the use of the resulting plutonium as fuel, with the result that
over  240  tons  of  separated,  weapons-usable  civilian  plutonium  now  exists  in  the
world,  a  figure  that  will  soon  surpass  the  amount  of  plutonium  in  all  the  world’s
nuclear  weapons  arsenals  combined.  The  British  Royal  Society,  in  a  1998  report,
warned that even in an advanced industrial state like the United Kingdom, the pos-
sibility  that  plutonium  stocks  might  be  ‘‘accessed  for  illicit  weapons  production  is
of extreme concern.’’ 7

Moreover,  a  near-term  U.S.  return  to  reprocessing  could  significantly  undermine
broader U.S. nuclear nonproliferation policies. President Bush has announced an ef-
fort  to  convince  countries  around  the  world  to  forego  reprocessing  and  enrichment
capabilities  of  their  own;  has  continued  the  efforts  of  past  administrations  to  con-
vince  other  states  to  avoid  the  further  accumulation  of  separated  plutonium,  be-
cause  of  the  proliferation  hazards  it  poses;  and  has  continued  to  press  states  in  re-
gions  of  proliferation  concern  not  to  reprocess  (including  not  only  states  such  as
North  Korea  and  Iran,  but  also  U.S.  allies  such  South  Korea  and  Taiwan,  both  of
which had secret nuclear weapons programs closely associated with reprocessing ef-
forts  in  the  past).  A  U.S.  decision  to  move  toward  reprocessing  itself  would  make
it more difficult to convince other states not to do the same.

Advocates argue that the more advanced approaches now being pursued would be
more  proliferation-resistant.  Technologies  such  as  pyroprocessing  are  undoubtedly
better than PUREX in this respect. But the plutonium-bearing materials that would
be separated in either the UREX+ process or by pyroprocessing would not be radio-
active  enough  to  meet  international  standards  for  being  ‘‘self-protecting’’  against
possible  theft.8 Moreover,  if  these  technologies  were  deployed  widely  in  the  devel-
oping  world,  where  most  of  the  future  growth  in  electricity  demand  will  be,  this
would  contribute  to  potential  proliferating  states  building  up  expertise,  real-world
experience,  and  facilities  that  could  be  readily  turned  to  support  a  weapons  pro-
gram.9

Proponents  of  reprocessing  and  recycling  often  argue  that  this  approach  will  pro-
vide  a  nonproliferation  benefit,  by  consuming  the  plutonium  in  spent  fuel,  which
would  otherwise  turn  geologic  repositories  into  potential  plutonium  mines  in  the
long-term. But the proliferation risk posed by spent fuel buried in a safeguarded re-
pository  is  already  modest;  if  the  world  could  be  brought  to  a  state  in  which  such
repositories  were  the  most  significant  remaining  proliferation  risk,  that  would  be
cause  for  great  celebration.  Moreover,  this  risk  will  be  occurring  a  century  or  more

6 For  an  authoritative  unclassified  discussion,  see  Nonproliferation  and  Arms  Control  Assess-
ment of Weapons-Usable Fissile Material Storage and Excess Plutonium Disposition Alternatives,
DOE/NN–0007 (Washington DC: U.S. Department of Energy, January 1997), pp. 38–39.

7 The Royal Society, Management of Separated Plutonium (London: Royal Society, 1998, sum-

mary available at http://www.royalsoc.ac.uk/displaypagedoc.asp?id=11407 as of June 10, 2005.

8 See  Jungmin  Kang  and  Frank  von  Hippel,  ‘‘Limited  Proliferation-Resistance  Benefits  From
Recycling  Unseparated  Transuranics  and  Lanthanides  From  Light-Water  Reactor  Spent  Fuel,’’
Science & Global Security, forthcoming.

9 For a discussion of the importance of these elements of proliferation resistance, see Matthew
Bunn, ‘‘Proliferation Resistance (and Terror-Resistance) of Nuclear Energy Systems,’’ lecture for
‘‘Nuclear  Energy  Economics  and  Policy  Analysis,’’  Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology,  April
12,  2004,  available  as  of  June  10,  2005  at  http://bcsia.ksg.harvard.edu/BCSIA¥content/docu-
ments/prolif-resist-lecture04.pdf.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

from  now,  and  if  there  is  one  thing  we  know  about  the  nuclear  world  a  century
hence, it is that its shape and contours are highly uncertain. We should not increase
significant proliferation risks in the near-term in order to reduce already small and
highly uncertain proliferation risks in the distant future.10
As-yet-unexamined safety and terrorism risks

Fourth,  reprocessing  and  recycling  using  technologies  available  in  the  near-term
would  be  likely  to  raise  additional  safety  and  terrorism  risks.  Until  Chernobyl,  the
world’s  worst  nuclear  accident  had  been  the  explosion  at  the  reprocessing  plant  at
Khystym in 1957, and significant accidents at both Russian and Japanese reprocess-
ing plants occurred as recently as the 1990s. No complete life-cycle study of the safe-
ty and terrorism risks of reprocessing and recycling compared to those of direct dis-
posal  has  yet  been  done  by  disinterested  parties.  But  it  seems  clear  that  extensive
processing of intensely radioactive spent fuel using volatile chemicals presents more
opportunities for release of radionuclides than does leaving spent fuel untouched in
thick metal or concrete casks.
Limited waste management benefits

Fifth,  the  waste  management  benefits  that  might  be  derived  from  reprocessing
and  transmutation  are  quite  limited.  Two  such  benefits  are  usually  claimed:  de-
creasing the repository volume needed per kilowatt-hour of electricity generated (po-
tentially  eliminating  the  need  for  a  second  repository  after  Yucca  Mountain);  and
greatly reducing the radioactive dangers of the material to be disposed.

It is important to recognize that reprocessing and recycling as currently practiced
(with only one round of recycling the plutonium as uranium-plutonium mixed oxide
(MOX)  fuel)  does  not  have  either  of  these  benefits.  The  size  of  a  repository  needed
for  a  given  amount  of  waste  is  determined  not  by  the  volume  of  the  waste  but  by
its heat output. Because of the build-up of heat-emitting higher actinides when plu-
tonium  is  recycled,  the  total  heat  output  of  the  waste  per  kilowatt-hour  generated
is  actually  higher—and  therefore  the  needed  repositories  larger  and  more  expen-
sive—with  one  round  of  reprocessing  and  recycling  than  it  is  for  direct  disposal.11
And the estimated long-term doses to humans and the environment from the reposi-
tory are not noticeably reduced.12

Newer  approaches  that  might  provide  a  substantial  reduction  in  radiotoxic  haz-
ards  and  in  repository  volume  are  complex,  likely  to  be  expensive,  and  still  in  an
early  stage  of  development.  Most  important,  even  if  they  achieved  their  goals,  the
benefits  would  not  be  large.  The  projected  long-term  radioactive  doses  from  a  geo-
logic repository are already low. No credible study has yet been done comparing the
risk  of  increased  doses  in  the  near-term  from  the  extensive  processing  and  oper-
ations  required  for  reprocessing  and  transmutation  to  the  reduction  in  doses  thou-
sands  to  hundreds  of  thousands  of  years  in  the  future  that  might  be  achieved  by
this method.

With  respect  to  reducing  repository  volume,  while  the  Department  of  Energy
(DOE)  has  not  yet  performed  any  detailed  study  of  the  maximum  amount  of  spent
fuel that could be emplaced at Yucca Mountain, there is little doubt that even with-
out  reprocessing,  the  mountain  could  hold  far  more  than  the  current  legislative
limit.  There  are  a  variety  of  approaches  to  providing  additional  capacity  at  Yucca
Mountain or elsewhere without recycling. Indeed, as a recent American Physical So-
ciety  report  noted,  it  is  possible  that  even  if  all  existing  reactors  receive  license  ex-
tensions allowing them to operate for 60 years, Yucca Mountain will be able to hold
all the spent fuel they will generate in their lifetimes, without reprocessing.13 While
proponents of reprocessing and transmutation point to the likely difficulty of licens-
ing  a  second  repository  in  the  United  States  after  Yucca  Mountain’s  capacity  is
filled,  it  is  likely  to  be  at  least  as  difficult  to  gain  public  acceptance  and  licenses
for the facilities needed for reprocessing and transmutation—particularly as such fa-

10 For  a  discussion,  see  John  P.  Holdren,  ‘‘Nonproliferation  Aspects  of  Geologic  Repositories,’’
presented  at  the  ‘‘International  Conference  on  Geologic  Repositories,’’  October  31–November  3,
1999,  Denver,  Colorado;  available  as  of  June  10,  1995  at  http://bcsia.ksg.harvard.edu/publica-
tion.cfm?program=CORE&ctype=presentation&item¥id=1.

11 See, for example, Brian G. Chow and Gregory S. Jones, Managing Wastes With and Without

Plutonium Separation, Report P–8035 (Santa Monica, CA: RAND Corporation, 1999).

12 This  is  because  the  uranium  and  plutonium  separated  by  the  traditional  PUREX  process,
not  being  very  mobile  in  the  geologic  environment,  are  not  significant  contributors  in  models
of the long-term radiation releases from a geologic repository.

13 Nuclear  Energy  Study  Group,  American  Physical  Society  Panel  on  Public  Affairs,  Nuclear
Power  and  Proliferation  Resistance:  Securing  Benefits,  Limiting  Risk  (Washington,  D.C.:  Amer-
ican  Physical  Society,  May  2005,  available  as  of  June  9,  2005  at  http://www.aps.org/pub-
lic¥affairs/proliferation-resistance), p. 17.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

cilities  will  likely  pose  more  genuine  hazards  to  their  neighbors  than  would  a  nu-
clear waste repository.14
Limited energy benefits

Sixth, the energy benefits of reprocessing and recycling would also be limited. Ad-
ditional  energy  can  indeed  be  generated  from  the  plutonium  and  uranium  in  spent
fuel.  But  in  today’s  market,  spent  fuel  is  like  oil  shale:  getting  the  energy  out  of
it  costs  far  more  than  the  energy  is  worth.  In  the  only  approach  to  recycling  that
is commercially practiced today—which involves a single round of recycling as MOX
fuel in existing light-water reactors—the amount of energy generated from each ton
of  uranium  mined  is  increased  by  less  than  20  percent.15 In  principle,  if,  in  the  fu-
ture, fast-neutron breeder reactors become economic, so that the 99.3 percent of nat-
ural  uranium  that  is  U–238  could  be  turned  to  plutonium  and  burned,  the  amount
of energy that could be derived from each ton of uranium mined might be increased
50-fold.

But there is no near-term need for this extension of the uranium resource. World
resources  of  uranium  likely  to  be  economically  recoverable  in  future  decades  at
prices  far  below  the  price  at  which  reprocessing  would  be  economic  are  sufficient
to  fuel  a  growing  global  nuclear  enterprise  for  many  decades,  relying  on  direct  dis-
posal without recycling.16

Nor  does  reprocessing  serve  the  goal  of  energy  security,  even  for  countries  such
as  Japan,  which  have  very  limited  domestic  energy  resources.  If  energy  security
means anything, it means that a country’s energy supplies will not be disrupted by
events beyond that country’s control. Yet events completely out of the control of any
individual  country—such  as  a  theft  of  poorly  guarded  plutonium  on  the  other  side
of  the  world—could  transform  the  politics  of  plutonium  overnight  and  make  major
planned programs virtually impossible to carry out. Japan’s experience following the
scandal over BNFL’s falsification of safety data on MOX fuel, and following the acci-
dents  at  Monju  and  Tokai,  all  of  which  have  delayed  Japan’s  plutonium  programs
by  many  years,  makes  this  point  clear.  If  anything,  plutonium  recycling  is  much
more  vulnerable  to  external  events  than  reliance  on  once-through  use  of  uranium,
whose supplies are diverse, plentiful, and difficult to cut off.
Premature to decide—and no need to rush

Seventh,  there  is  no  need  to  rush  to  make  this  decision  in  2007,  or  in  fact  any
time  in  the  next  few  decades.  Dry  storage  casks  offer  the  option  of  storing  spent
fuel  cheaply,  safely,  and  securely  for  decades.  During  that  time,  technology  will  de-
velop; interest will accumulate on fuel management funds set aside today, reducing
the  cost  of  whatever  we  choose  to  do  in  the  long  run;  political  and  economic  cir-
cumstances may change in ways that point clearly in one direction or the other; and
the  radioactivity  of  the  spent  fuel  will  decay,  making  it  cheaper  to  process  in  the
future,  if  need  be.  Our  generation  has  an  obligation  to  set  aside  sufficient  funds  so
that we are not passing unfunded obligations on to our children and grandchildren,
but it is not our responsibility to make and implement decisions prematurely, there-
by  depriving  future  generations  of  what  might  turn  out  to  be  better  options  devel-
oped  later.  Indeed,  because  the  repository  will  remain  open  for  50–100  years,  with
the  spent  fuel  readily  retrievable,  moving  forward  with  direct  disposal  will  still
leave all options open for decades to come.

Similarly,  there  is  no  need  to  rush  to  set  up  new  interim  storage  sites  on  DOE
or  military  sites,  and  no  possibility  of  performing  the  needed  reviews  and  getting
the  needed  licenses  to  do  so  by  2006,  as  the  Energy  and  Water  appropriations  sub-
committee proposed.17 There is a legitimate debate as to whether such interim spent
fuel  storage  prior  to  emplacement  in  a  geologic  repository  should  be  centralized  at
one  or  two  sites,  or  whether  in  most  cases  the  fuel  should  continue  to  be  stored  at
existing  reactor  sites.  In  any  case,  the  government  should  fulfill  its  obligations  to
the  utilities  by  taking  title  to  the  fuel  and  paying  the  cost  of  storage.  At  the  same

14 For  an  initial  discussion  of  these  points,  see  Bunn,  Fetter,  Holdren,  and  van  der  Zwaan,

The Economics of Reprocessing vs. Direct Disposal of Spent Nuclear Fuel, pp. 64–66.

15 John Deutch and Ernest J. Moniz, co-chairs, The Future of Nuclear Power: An Interdiscipli-
nary  MIT  Study  (Cambridge,  MA:  Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology,  2003,  available  as  of
June 9, 2005 at http://web.mit.edu/nuclearpower/), p. 123. They present this result as uranium
consumption per kilowatt-hour being 15 percent less for the recycling case; equivalently, if ura-
nium  consumption  is  fixed,  then  electricity  generation  is  18  percent  higher  for  the  recycling
case.

16 For discussion, see ‘‘Appendix B: World Uranium Resources,’’ in Bunn, Fetter, Holdren, and

van der Zwaan, The Economics of Reprocessing vs. Direct Disposal of Spent Nuclear Fuel.

17 See,  for  example,  Allison  Macfarlane,  ‘‘Don’t  Put  Waste  on  Military  Bases,’’  Boston  Globe,

June 4, 2005.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

time,  we  should  continue  to  move  toward  opening  a  permanent  geologic  repository
as quickly as we responsibly can—in part because public acceptance of interim spent
fuel  storage  facilities  is  only  likely  to  be  forthcoming  if  the  public  is  convinced  that
they will not become permanent waste dumps.

Nor is there any need to rush on deciding whether a second nuclear waste reposi-
tory  will  be  needed.  While  existing  nuclear  power  plants  will  have  discharged
enough  fuel  to  fill  the  current  legislated  capacity  limit  within  a  few  years,  the  re-
ality  is  that  it  will  be  decades  before  sufficient  fuel  to  fill  Yucca  Mountain  has  in
fact been emplaced. We can and should defer this decision, and take the time to con-
sider the options in detail. Congress should consider amending current law and giv-
ing  the  Secretary  of  Energy  another  decade  or  more  before  reporting  on  the  need
for a second repository.

Proponents  of  deciding  quickly  on  reprocessing  sometimes  argue  that  such  deci-
sions are necessary because no new nuclear reactors will be purchased unless suffi-
cient geologic repository capacity for all the spent fuel they will generate throughout
their  lifetimes  has  already  been  provided.  I  do  not  believe  this  is  correct.  I  believe
that  if  the  government  is  fulfilling  its  obligation  to  take  title  to  spent  fuel  and  pay
the costs of managing it, and clear progress is being made toward opening and oper-
ating  a  nuclear  waste  repository,  investors  will  have  sufficient  confidence  that  they
will not be saddled with unexpected spent fuel obligations to move forward. By con-
trast,  if  the  government  were  seriously  considering  drastic  changes  in  spent  fuel
management  approaches  which  might  major  increases  in  the  nuclear  waste  fee,  in-
vestors might well wish to wait to see the outcome of those decisions before invest-
ing in new nuclear plants.

It is a good thing there is no need to rush, as we simply do not have the informa-
tion that would be needed to make a decision on reprocessing in 2007. The advanced
reprocessing  technologies  now  being  pursued  are  in  a  very  early  stage  of  develop-
ment. As of a year ago, UREX+ had been demonstrated on a total of one pin of real
spent  fuel,  in  a  small  facility—and  had  not  met  all  of  its  processing  goals  in  that
test.18 Frankly, in my judgment there is little prospect that further development of
complex  multi-stage  aqueous  separations  processes  such  as  UREX+  will  result  in
processes  that  will  provide  low  costs,  proliferation  resistance,  and  waste  manage-
ment  benefits  sufficient  to  make  them  worth  implementing  in  competition  with  di-
rect  disposal.  Pyroprocessing  has  been  tried  on  a  somewhat  larger  scale  over  the
years, but the process is designed for processing metals, and significant development
is  still  needed  to  be  confident  in  industrial-scale  application  to  the  oxide  spent  fuel
from  current  reactors.  Other,  longer-term  processes  might  offer  more  promise,  but
too little is known about them to know for sure.

So  far,  we  do  not  have  a  credible  life-cycle  analysis  of  the  cost  of  a  reprocessing
and  transmutation  system  compared  to  that  of  direct  disposal;  DOE  has  yet  to  do
any detailed estimate of how much spent fuel can be placed in Yucca Mountain, and
of non-reprocessing approaches to extending that capacity; we do not have a realistic
evaluation of the impact of a reprocessing and transmutation on the existing nuclear
fuel industry; we do not have a serious evaluation of the licensing and public accept-
ance  issues  facing  development  and  deployment  of  such  a  system;  we  do  not  have
any  serious  assessment  of  the  safety  and  terrorism  risks  of  a  reprocessing  and
transmutation system, compared to those of direct disposal; and we do not yet have
assessments  of  the  proliferation  implications  of  the  proposed  systems  that  are  de-
tailed  enough  to  support  responsible  decision-making.  In  short,  now  is  the  time  for
continued research and development, and additional systems analysis, not the time
for committing to processing using any particular technology.
Recommendations

For the reasons just outlined, I recommend that we follow the advice of the bipar-
tisan  National  Commission  on  Energy  Policy,  which  reflected  a  broad  spectrum  of
opinion  on  energy  matters  generally  and  on  nuclear  energy  in  particular,  and  rec-
ommended that the United States should:

(1) ‘‘continue  indefinitely  the  U.S.  moratoria  on  commercial  reprocessing  of

spent nuclear fuel and construction of commercial breeder reactors;’’

(2) establish  expanded  interim  spent  fuel  storage  capacities  ‘‘as  a  complement

and interim back-up’’ to Yucca Mountain;

(3) proceed ‘‘with all deliberate speed’’ toward licensing and operating a perma-

nent geologic waste repository; and

18 Vandegrift  et  al.,  ‘‘Designing  and  Demonstration  of  the  UREX+  Process  Using  Spent  Nu-

clear Fuel.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

(4) continue  research  and  development  on  advanced  fuel  cycle  approaches  that
might improve nuclear waste management and uranium utilization, without
the huge disadvantages of traditional approaches to reprocessing.19

At  the  same  time,  the  U.S.  Government  should  redouble  its  efforts  to:  (a)  limit
the  spread  of  reprocessing  and  enrichment  technologies,  as  a  critical  element  of  a
strengthened  nonproliferation  effort;  (b)  ensure  that  every  nuclear  warhead  and
every  kilogram  of  separated  plutonium  and  highly  enriched  uranium  (HEU)  world-
wide  are  secure  and  accounted  for,  as  the  most  critical  step  to  prevent  nuclear  ter-
rorism;20 and  (c)  convince  other  countries  to  end  the  accumulation  of  plutonium
stockpiles,  and  work  to  reduce  stockpiles  of  both  plutonium  and  HEU  around  the
world. The Bush Administration should, in particular, resume the effort to negotiate
a  20-year  U.S.–Russian  moratorium  on  separation  of  plutonium  that  was  almost
completed at the end of the Clinton Administration.

Similar  recommendations  have  been  made  in  the  MIT  study  on  the  future  of  nu-
clear  energy,21 and  in  the  American  Physical  Society  study  of  nuclear  energy  and
nuclear weapons proliferation.22

It remains possible that someday approaches to reprocessing and recycling will be
developed  that  make  security,  economic,  political,  and  environmental  sense.  Re-
search  and  development  should  explore  such  possibilities.  Continued  investment  in
R&D  on  advanced  fuel  cycle  technologies  is  justified,  in  part  to  ensure  that  the
United States will have the technological expertise and credibility to play a leading
role  in  limiting  the  proliferation  risks  of  the  fuel  cycle  around  the  world.  But  the
leverage  of  these  technologies  in  meeting  the  most  serious  energy  challenges  of  the
21st century is likely to be somewhat limited in comparison to the promise of other
potential future energy technologies, and the emphasis that nuclear fuel cycle R&D
should receive in the overall energy R&D portfolio should reflect that.

The global nuclear energy system would have to grow substantially if nuclear en-
ergy  was  to  make  a  substantial  contribution  to  meeting  the  world’s  21st  century
needs  for  carbon-free  energy.  Building  the  support  from  governments,  utilities,  and
publics  needed  to  achieve  that  kind  of  growth  will  require  making  nuclear  energy
as cheap, as simple, as safe, as proliferation-resistant, and as terrorism-proof as pos-
sible.  Reprocessing  using  any  of  the  technologies  likely  to  be  available  in  the  near-
term  points  in  the  wrong  direction  on  every  count.23 Those  who  hope  for  a  bright
future  for  nuclear  energy,  therefore,  should  oppose  near-term  reprocessing  of  spent
nuclear fuel.

BIOGRAPHY FOR MATTHEW BUNN

Matthew  Bunn  is  a  Senior  Research  Associate  in  the  Project  on  Managing  the
Atom in the Belfer Center for Science and International Affairs at Harvard Univer-
sity’s John F. Kennedy School of Government. His current research interests include
nuclear  theft  and  terrorism;  security  for  weapons-usable  nuclear  material  in  the
former Soviet Union and worldwide; verification of nuclear stockpiles and of nuclear

19 National Commission on Energy Policy, Ending the Energy Stalemate: A Bipartisan Strategy
to Meet America’s Energy Challenges (Washington, D.C.: National Commission on Energy Policy,
December  2004,  available  as  of  June  9,  2005,  at  http://www.energycommission.org/
ewebeditpro/items/O82F4682.pdf), pp. 60–61.

20 For  detailed  recommendations,  see  Matthew  Bunn  and  Anthony  Wier,  Securing  the  Bomb
2005:  The  New  Global  Imperatives  (Cambridge,  Mass.,  and  Washington,  D.C.:  Project  on  Man-
aging  the  Atom,  Harvard  University,  and  Nuclear  Threat  Initiative,  May  2005,  available  as  of
June 10, 2005 at http://www.nti.org/cnwm).

21 John Deutch and Ernest J. Moniz, co-chairs, The Future of Nuclear Power: An Interdiscipli-
nary  MIT  Study  (Cambridge,  MA:  Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology,  2003,  available  as  of
June 9, 2005 at http://web.mit.edu/nuclearpower/).

22 Nuclear  Energy  Study  Group,  American  Physical  Society  Panel  on  Public  Affairs,  Nuclear
Power  and  Proliferation  Resistance:  Securing  Benefits,  Limiting  Risk  (Washington,  D.C.:  Amer-
ican  Physical  Society,  May  2005,  available  as  of  June  9,  2005  at  http://www.aps.org/pub-
lic¥affairs/proliferation-resistance).

23 For earlier discussions of this point, see, for example, John P. Holdren, ‘‘Improving U.S. En-
ergy Security and Reducing Greenhouse-Gas Emissions:The Role of Nuclear Energy,’’ testimony
to  the  Subcommittee  on  Energy  and  Environment,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Rep-
resentatives, July 25, 2000, available as of June 10, 2005 at http://bcsia.ksg.harvard.edu/publi-
cation.cfm?program=CORE&ctype=testimony&item¥id=9;  and  Matthew  Bunn,  ‘‘Enabling  A  Sig-
nificant  Future  For  Nuclear  Power:  Avoiding  Catastrophes,  Developing  New  Technologies,  De-
mocratizing Decisions—And Staying Away From Separated Plutonium,’’ in Proceedings of Global
’99: Nuclear Technology—Bridging the Millennia, Jackson Hole, Wyoming, August 30-September
2,  1999  (La  Grange  Park,  Ill.:  American  Nuclear  Society,  1999,  available  as  of  June  10,  2005
at http://bcsia.ksg.harvard.edu/publication.cfm?program=CORE&ctype=book&item¥id=2).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

warhead dismantlement; disposition of excess plutonium; conversion in Russia’s nu-
clear cities; and nuclear waste storage, disposal, and reprocessing.

Before  joining  the  Kennedy  School  in  January  1997,  he  served  for  three  years  as
an adviser to the Office of Science and Technology Policy, where he played a major
role in U.S. policies related to the control and disposition of weapons-usable nuclear
materials  in  the  U.S.  and  the  former  Soviet  Union,  and  directed  a  secret  study  for
President Clinton on security for nuclear materials in Russia. Previously, Bunn was
at the National Academy of Sciences, where he directed the two-volume study Man-
agement  and  Disposition  of  Excess  Weapons  Plutonium.  He  is  a  consultant  to  the
Nuclear  Threat  Initiative,  and  a  member  of  the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  Russian-
American Nuclear Security Advisory Council (an organization devoted to promoting
nuclear security cooperation between the United States and Russia), the Arms Con-
trol Association, and the Center for Arms Control and Nonproliferation.

Bunn  is  the  author  or  co-author  of  a  dozen  books  and  book-length  technical  re-
ports  (most  recently  including  Securing  the  Bomb  2005:  The  New  Global  Impera-
tives),  and  dozens  of  articles  in  magazines  and  newspapers  ranging  from  Foreign
Policy and The Washington Post to Science and Nuclear Technology. He appears reg-
ularly  on  television  and  radio.  Bunn  received  his  Bachelor’s  and  Master’s  degrees
in political science, specializing in defense and arms control, from the Massachusetts
Institute  of  Technology  in  1985.  He  is  married  to  Jennifer  Weeks,  and  lives  in  Wa-
tertown, Massachusetts. They have two daughters, Claire and Nina.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
Dr. Hagengruber, you are recognized for five minutes.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  ROGER  HAGENGRUBER,  DIRECTOR,  OF-
FICE FOR POLICY, SECURITY AND TECHNOLOGY; DIRECTOR,
INSTITUTE  FOR  PUBLIC  POLICY;  AND,  PROFESSOR  OF  PO-
LITICAL SCIENCE, UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO
Dr. HAGENGRUBER. Thank you, Madame Chairman, and I appre-

ciate the invitation by the Committee to——

Chairwoman BIGGERT. If you could, pull the mike a little bit clos-

er to you. Thank you.

Dr.  HAGENGRUBER.  Thank  you,  Madame  Chairman.  I  appreciate

the invitation of the Committee to testify today.

As  you  mentioned  earlier,  the  Nuclear  Energy  Study  Group  was
convened  by  the  American  Physical  Society’s  Panel  on  Public  Af-
fairs.  We  have  a  report,  which  we  have  submitted  for  the  record.

I—it treats several matters related to nuclear energy.
The first is related to the question of reprocessing. At this point,
we don’t see a foreseeable expansion of nuclear power in the United
States that would make a qualitative change to the need for spent
fuel  storage,  at  least  for  a  few  decades.  Even  though  Yucca  Moun-
tain may be delayed considerably, the interim storage of spent fuel
in dry casks, it—the current sites, or at a few regional sites, is, we
believe, safe and affordable, at least for a couple of decades into the
future.  So  we  believe  that  there  is  time  to  be  able  to  take  a  more
enduring  and  prudent  decision  with  respect  to  reprocessing  in  re-
gard to the issue of proliferation.

We  have  identified  a  number  of  areas  in  our  report  of  prolifera-
tion-resistant  and  cost-effective  technologies  that  we  think  should
be  pursued.  Some  of  these  are,  in  fact,  being  addressed  in  the  De-
partment of Energy. They include issues of integration of advanced
safeguards  into  reprocessing  systems,  additional  approaches  to
adulterating  or  making  the  material  less  attractive.  But  I  think
that  a  detailed  examination  by  nuclear  weapon  experts  of  the  via-
bility  of  this  material  in  a  true  national  nuclear  weapons  program
is desperately needed, and that is an extensive and rather detailed

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

classified  portion  of  research,  which  I  do  not  believe,  at  this  point,
has been accomplished.

We think, in a way, it is in the best interest of the United States
to maintain a reprocessing research program and to seek prolifera-
tion-resistant  and  cost-effective  reprocessing  technologies  if  they
can  be  found.  We  don’t  oppose  the  eventual  reprocessing  but  be-
lieve an early decision, given the current status, could threaten the
growth of the use of nuclear energy in the future. And by the way,
nuclear energy growth is something that the American Physical So-
ciety supports and supports quite strongly.

We don’t think that we should force a decision that might dimin-
ish  the  growing  momentum  for  nuclear  energy.  An  early  decision
on  reprocessing  may  not  have  the  policy  robustness  that  can  sus-
tain  it  through  the  next  two  decades  of  almost  certain  persistent
threat of proliferation. From our decade’s worth of work and public
survey  on  nuclear  matters  at  the  University  of  New  Mexico,  we
know that energy and waste management issues are not as volatile
in the minds of the public as the issue of proliferation.

The  goal  of  our  recommendations  here  is  straightforward.  If  re-
processing technology is determined to be adequately proliferation-
resistant and cost-effective, reprocessing can emerge then as a con-
sensus decision with industrial, scientific, political, and public sup-
port. The stronger the consensus, in my view, the more sustainable
the  momentum  for  nuclear  energy,  and  the  more  assured  that  the
schedule  for  proceeding  with  the  nuclear  fuel  cycle  for  the  rest  of
this century.

On  the  other  hand,  we  recognize  the  importance  of  timetables
and  respect  Chairman  Hobson’s  desire  to  have  people  appear  by
2007 with some decisions made, and we certainly applaud that, be-
cause  it  does  tend  to  force  people  to  move.  We  would  suggest,  per-
haps,  that  maybe  2007  is  a  good  time  to  look  at  the  status  of  the
development  of  technologies  for  this  purpose.  Maybe  they  will  be
ready  to  go  forward.  But  when  those  hearings  are  held,  we  think
that  strong  and  vigorous  discussions  should  occur  over  the  pro-
liferation-resistance  associated  with  these  technologies,  not  just  in
the  United  States,  we  are  not  the  threat  of  proliferation,  but  if,  in
fact, pursued across the world.

Now we want to address one last item before completing my tes-
timony,  and  that  is  the  importance  of  reinvigorating  research  and
development  in  technical  safeguards  for  the  International  Atomic
Energy  Commission.  Most  of  the  technology  today  that  has  pro-
vided  safeguards  that  detected  programs  in  North  Korea  and  in
Iran  is  technology  that  was  developed  in  a  vigorous  program  con-
ducted  during  the  1970s.  This  program  at  the  time,  in  today’s  dol-
lars,  probably  numbered  some  tens  of  millions  of  dollars.  Today’s
investment  in  research  and  development  for  international  safe-
guards  is  only  a  few  million  dollars,  and  is  a  very  small  amount
of  money  considering  the  opportunities  provided  by  the  advanced
technologies  of  this  decade  and  the  decade  before.  In  addition,  the
expansion of enhanced safeguards by the International Atomic En-
ergy  Commission  during  the  1990s  offers  opportunities  for  moni-
toring that are unprecedented in the first two decades of the NPT.
There  are  a  number  of  areas,  just  to  illustrate  the  point,  we
know  today  how  to  produce  cost-effective,  internationally-accept-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

able,  continuous  monitoring  through  satellite  links,  providing  as-
sured  security  for  an  instance  of  air  sampling  systems  that  can  be
used in conjunction with reprocessing or enrichment facilities. It is
literally impossible for such facilities to, in fact, create unapproved
procedures  or  material  without  being  detected  in  some  fashion  by
that type of rigorous sampling. In addition, the control that we use
frequently in our nuclear weapons, the things that have assured us
with  this  very  high  reliability  associated  with  nuclear  things,  can,
in fact, be integrated into the operations of facilities, assuring more
detectable capability on the part of the United States to be able to
see the operation of facilities in unauthorized ways.

In  conclusion,  the  extent  to  which  nuclear  power  will  be  an  en-
during option to meet future energy requirements in many regions
of  the  world  depend  upon  the  steps  that  Congress  takes  now  to
manage the associated proliferation risks. Prudent management re-
quires pursuing proliferation-resistant technologies exclusively and
developing  international  agreements  that  limit  the  spread  of  en-
richment  facilities  and  investing  in  a  strong  safeguards  program.
Subject  to  your  questions,  that  is  my  testimony,  Madame  Chair-

man.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Hagengruber follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROGER HAGENGRUBER

Thank you Congresswoman Biggert and Members of the Subcommittee for the op-

portunity to testify.

I’m Roger Hagengruber. I am a physicist by training and currently Director of the
Office  for  Policy,  Security  and  Technology  (OPS&T)  at  the  University  of  New  Mex-
ico. From 1991 to 1999, I was Senior Vice President of Sandia National Laboratory
directing  their  nuclear  weapons  programs.  I  spent  much  of  my  more  than  30  years
at Sandia in arms control and non-proliferation activities including several tours in
Geneva as a negotiator.

I  am  also  Chair  of  the  Nuclear  Energy  Study  Group  (NESG),  convened  by  the
Panel on Public Affairs of the American Physical Society. We examined technical op-
tions  for  raising  the  barrier  between  nuclear  power  and  nuclear  weapons  prolifera-
tion. With your permission, I would like to include a copy of the report in the hear-
ing record.

We reached conclusions in three general areas: technical safeguards, proliferation

resistance evaluation & design, and reprocessing.

Let  me  first  say  that  I  am  presenting  the  consensus  view  of  a  diverse  group  of
scientists  who  are  experts  on  nuclear  power  and  proliferation  issues.  Over  the
course  of  their  careers,  members  of  the  NESG  held  positions  as  DOE  Undersecre-
tary  of  Energy,  Chair  of  the  DOE  Nuclear  Energy  Research  Advisory  Committee,
director  of  research  for  the  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commission,  and  acting  Assistant
Secretary of Defense.

Over  the  course  of  several  months  of  discussion,  we  developed  a  consensus  posi-

tion on reprocessing. Here are our three main points:

• There is no urgent need to reprocess.
• Take the time to get the science right.
• Do no harm.

Let me say a few words about each point.

No Urgency

No  foreseeable  expansion  of  nuclear  power  in  the  U.S.  will  make  a  qualitative
change  to  the  need  for  spent  fuel  storage  over  the  next  few  decades.  Even  though
Yucca  Mountain  may  be  delayed  considerably,  interim  storage  of  spent  fuel  in  dry
casks,  either  at  current  reactor  sites,  or  at  a  few  regional  facilities,  or  at  a  single
national facility, is safe and affordable for a period of at least 50 years.

The  U.S.  can  take  some  of  the  next  ten  years  to  evaluate  technologies  and  make

a more enduring and prudent decision on reprocessing.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

Get the Science Right

A  decision  on  reprocessing  shouldn’t  outpace  the  science.  DOE  should  take  the
necessary  time  to  carry  out  more  thorough  reprocessing  research  to  identify  the
most  proliferation  resistant  and  cost  effective  technology.  Examples  of  areas  of  re-
search that could be most useful are:

— Detailed  evaluations  by  nuclear  weapons  experts  regarding  the  implications
of  the  reprocessed  material  on  a  reliable  yet  concealable  weapons  program
by a proliferating country.

— Concepts  for  the  integration  of  advanced  safeguards  (e.g.,  use  control)  into

reprocessing systems.

— Additional  approaches  to  increasing  the  inherent  protection  of  the  reproc-

essed material by additional adulteration or other means.

And let me be clear, it is in the best interests of the U.S. to maintain a reprocess-
ing  research  program  and  seek  a  proliferation  resistant  and  cost-effective  reprocess-
ing technology. We do not oppose eventual reprocessing, but believe an early decision,
given  the  current  status,  could  threaten  future  growth  in  the  use  of  nuclear  energy.
We  believe  that  by  pursuing  appropriate  reprocessing  technology  that  gives  the
highest  priority  to  proliferation  resistance,  the  U.S.  retains  the  ability  to  influence
future  directions,  both  technical  and  institutional,  of  the  international  community.
Do No Harm

We  should  not  force  a  decision  that  might  diminish  the  growing  momentum  for

nuclear power.

We should take a lesson from the past. More than forty years ago, the Atomic En-
ergy Commission, in an effort to establish a self-sufficient, domestic commercial nu-
clear  power  industry,  set  in  motion  the  transfer  of  nuclear  fuel  reprocessing  from
the  Federal  Government  to  private  industry.  In  response  to  this  call,  Nuclear  Fuel
Services,  a  private  company,  built  the  West  Valley  plutonium  reprocessing  plant  in
upstate  New  York  but  without  addressing  economic  and  safety  issues  adequately.
The plant began operating in 1966 and closed six years later to address safety, envi-
ronmental  and  efficiency  problems.  It  never  re-opened.  The  costs  for  retrofitting
were too high, and public concern about the plant had grown too large.

I  think  the  lesson  is  clear:  we  must  be  cautious  and  not  rush  into  reprocessing
again  until  the  safety,  proliferation  and  cost  issues  are  well  understood  and  have
been addressed properly.

The  goal  of  our  recommendations  is  straightforward:  If  a  reprocessing  technology
is  determined  to  be  adequately  proliferation  resistant  and  cost-effective,  reprocess-
ing can emerge as a consensus decision with industrial, scientific, political, and pub-
lic support.

That  said,  I  have  to  make  a  confession.  As  a  former  VP  of  Sandia,  I  recognize
the  value  of  timetables.  I  understand  the  importance  of  Congressman  Hobson  re-
quiring action by 2007.

Timetables keep programs from becoming endless academic exercises.
And while the science may not be able to deliver a proliferation resistant and cost-

effective technology by 2007, that doesn’t mean you don’t try.

So, I applaud Congressman Hobson for challenging the scientists to deliver. That

is an effective way to motivate programs.

Nevertheless,  I  think  we  should  be  cautious  about  our  expectations.  The  lesson

from the Nation’s West Valley foray is that we must proceed carefully.

So, I would make a modest suggestion.
Yes,  as  Congressman  Hobson  requires,  have  the  DOE  report  on  the  state  of  re-
processing  science  in  2007.  But,  instead  of  having  DOE  recommend  a  particular
technology  that  ‘‘should’’  be  implemented  in  2007—I  suggest  that  DOE  identify  the
most promising technology at that juncture were a decision to be made to begin de-
velopment and that its report include a detailed discussion of the relationship of the
technology to the prospect of proliferation. And we must be realistic in our expecta-
tions.  It  may  be  that  despite  the  best  efforts  of  all  involved,  the  most  promising
technology  in  2007  may  still  not  be  satisfactory  to  all  the  necessary  stakeholders.
I’m recommending a modest change of tone. The change keeps a reprocessing deci-
sion  as  a  goal  but  maintains  an  open  view  on  the  ability  to  deliver  a  cost-effective
and truly proliferation resistant technology by 2007.

including
pyroprocessing and UREX+. An aspect of assessing proliferation resistance is deter-
mining  whether  the  intensity  of  radioactive  ‘‘self-protection’’  of  the  resulting  waste
is  sufficient  to  prevent  or  deter  its  clandestine  development  into  a  nuclear  weapon.

reprocessing 

technologies 

researching 

The  DOE 

is 

currently 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

Our study group considered the proliferation resistance of UREX+. Some members
believed that the current version of UREX+ would create a plutonium byproduct so
hot  that  it  was  incapable  of  being  used  to  make  a  weapon.  Others  thought  that
UREX+ ‘‘self-protection’’ is lower than the ‘‘self-protection’’ of current U.S. fuel cycle
waste.

Research  is  on  going  at  DOE  to  settle  this  question.  We’ll  see  what  the  research
bears out. But, based on my nearly 20 years of involvement in nuclear weapons de-
sign  I’ll  make  one  observation.  The  ultimate  assessment  should  not  be  based  on
whether it is theoretically possible to make a weapon from the waste. A meaningful
assessment  must  evaluate  practical  factors  associated  with  making  a  weapon:  the
level  of  technical  sophistication,  the  willingness  to  assume  risk,  the  financial  re-
sources  available,  and  the  likelihood  of  success.  These  are  difficult  factors  to  evalu-
ate—some  of  them  will  require  extensive  classified  treatment—but  I  urge  DOE  to
approach the assessment in this manner.

If  no  cost-effective  and  proliferation  resistant  reprocessing  technology  emerges  in
2007, then the U.S. will continue to promote its current path of open-cycle & enrich-
ment.  A  number  of  experts  are  concerned  that  this  path  presents  significant  pro-
liferation  risks,  as  evidenced  by  Iran.  I  concur;  the  spread  of  centrifuge  technology
is a significant national security risk.

There  are  numerous  proposals  for  new  international  agreements  to  limit  the
spread  of  enrichment  technologies.  In  our  report  we  examined  technical  steps  to
limit proliferation. These steps will be most effective when coupled with changes in
institutional arrangements.

The first technological step is to improve the primary line of defense against pro-

liferation—international technical safeguards.

Technical  safeguards  used  by  the  International  Atomic  Energy  Agency  sound
alarms as soon as nuclear systems stray from peaceful use. They have proven value.
In North Korea, environmental sampling helped show that North Korea was making
false  claims  about  its  reprocessing  activities.  In  Iran,  disclosures  by  opposition
groups plus surveillance technologies and environmental sampling are revealing the
status of Iran’s nuclear program.

Most of the implemented safeguards technologies are the result of scientific work
done decades ago. Proliferators are adaptive and motivated adversaries; yet, we are
currently relying on technology that is almost as dated as a rotary phone. We must
re-invigorate  our  safeguards  R&D  program.  I’ll  mention  two  of  the  ten  R&D  focus
areas identified in our report.

More inspectors carrying out more inspections is not a sustainable path—instead,
next generation safeguards must spur a transition from the current system of peri-
odic manual inspections to a reliable and cost-effective system of continuous remote
monitoring.  Also,  more  aggressive  safeguards  should  be  explored  that  would  shut
down  a  facility  found  to  be  violating  international  operating  agreements.  There  are
numerous  other  examples  that  represent  ‘‘fruit  ripe  for  the  picking’’  as  opposed  to
research that may never become practical. Additional progress in safeguards should
involve  collaborative  research  with  international  partners.  In  this  regard,  the  large
programs to improve the security of nuclear material in Russia and to assist in con-
version  offer  major  opportunities  to  advance  joint  safeguards  concept  to  the  IAEA.
Unfortunately,  as  we  understand  it,  the  current  fiscal  year  2005  international
safeguards-related technology budget in NNSA (which we believe is already several
times  too  small)  was  just  reduced.  At  the  very  time  when  some  would  seek  more
rapid  progress  on  the  future  of  nuclear  energy,  modern  safeguards  and  a  deeper
analysis  regarding  proliferation  may  be  left  in  the  dust.  As  a  nation,  we  may  live
to regret our inadequate resources and emphasis in this area because for the future
of nuclear energy, ‘‘ignorance is not bliss.’’

Another technical step to manage global proliferation risks is designing prolifera-
tion  resistance  technology  directly  into  the  new  nuclear  power  plants  and  enrich-
ment  facilities.  Making  proliferation  resistance  a  design  criterion  would  re-shuffle
the  priority  of  future  reactors.  Some  fuel-cycles  would  be  deferred,  while  smaller,
modular,  reactor  designs  might  receive  more  emphasis.  By  carrying  out  this  step
with  commercial  participation,  proliferation  resistance  can  emerge  as  a  strength  of
our  nuclear  industry.  We  think  that  Congress  should  be  very  demanding  regarding
measures of proliferation resistance in any proposed further technical initiatives.

In  conclusion,  the  extent  to  which  nuclear  power  will  be  an  enduring  option  to
meeting future energy requirements in many regions of the world depends upon the
steps  Congress  takes  now  to  manage  the  associated  proliferation  risks.  Prudent
management  requires  exclusively  pursuing  proliferation  resistant  technologies,  de-
veloping international agreements that limit the spread of enrichment facilities and
investing in a strong safeguards program.

I’m happy to answer any questions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

BIOGRAPHY FOR ROGER HAGENGRUBER

Roger  Hagengruber,  Ph.D.,  is  the  Director  of  the  Office  for  Policy,  Security  and
Technology (OPS&T) and the Institute for Public Policy (IPP) and a Professor of Po-
litical  Science  at  the  University  of  New  Mexico.  He  was  formerly  a  Senior  Vice
President at Sandia National Laboratories. From 1991–99, he directed Sandia’s pri-
mary mission in nuclear weapons during the transition following the end of the Cold
War.  He  spent  much  of  his  30-year  career  at  Sandia  in  arms  control  and  non-pro-
liferation  activities  including  several  tours  in  Geneva  as  a  negotiator.  In  recent
years,  he  has  focused  on  the  nuclear  transition  in  the  former  Soviet  Union  and  in
security  issues  associated  with  counter-terrorism  and  has  chaired  or  served  on  nu-
merous  panels  that  have  addressed  these  areas.  He  has  traveled  widely  including
many  visits  to  Russia  where  he  led  the  large  interactive  program  between  Sandia
and the FSU.

His work at the University of New Mexico includes directing the IPP work in pub-
lic  survey  including  sampling  of  U.S.  and  European  views  on  a  wide  range  of  secu-
rity issues. The OPS&T is a relatively new function at UNM that creates multidisci-
plinary  teams  from  labs  and  universities  to  execute  projects  that  explore  policy  op-
tions in areas where security and technology are interrelated.

Dr. Hagengruber has a Ph.D. in experimental nuclear physics from the University
of  Wisconsin  and  is  a  graduate  of  the  Industrial  College  of  the  Armed  Forces.  He
has been associated with UNM since 1975.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much, Doctor.
Dr. Finck, you are recognized for five minutes.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  PHILLIP  J.  FINCK,  DEPUTY  ASSOCIATE
LABORATORY  DIRECTOR,  APPLIED  SCIENCE  AND  TECH-
NOLOGY  AND  NATIONAL  SECURITY,  ARGONNE  NATIONAL
LABORATORY
Dr.  FINCK.  Madame  Chairwoman,  Representative  Honda,  Mem-
bers of the Subcommittee, it is my pleasure to be here today to tes-
tify  on  technical  aspects  of  nuclear  fuel  reprocessing,  and  I  have
submitted a more detailed written statement for the record.

I  am  going  to  discuss  how  advanced  nuclear  fuel  cycles  can  help
mitigate the accumulation of spent nuclear fuel, and I will also de-
scribe  the  major  options  available  and  their  respective  advantages
and disadvantages.

And I have brought two charts to help frame this discussion.
[Chart.]
The  first  chart  that  is  on  your  right  illustrates  projected  sce-
narios  for  the  accumulation  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  in  the  United
States  until  the  end  of  this  century.  Two  limits  to—related  to  the
Yucca Mountain repository are important.

First  is  the  legislative  limit  of  70,000  metric  tons  of  spent  nu-

clear fuel that will be reached around 2010.

Second is a technical limit of the repository’s capacity of approxi-
mately 120,000 metric tons, which will be reached around 2030, as-
suming  nuclear  maintains  its  current  market  share.  But  if  we  can
implement  advanced  fuel  cycles  rapidly  enough,  the  amount  of
spent  nuclear  fuel  could  be  systematically  managed  to  remain
below the Yucca Mountain technical limit, as indicated by the blue
curve on the plot on the left.

The  right-hand  side  of  that  chart  illustrates  also  a  key  technical
point  for  spent  nuclear  fuel.  It  is  compromised  primarily  of  ura-
nium  that,  if  separated  from  the  fuel,  can  be  disposed  of  as  low-
level waste or reused. The technical difficulties for disposal lie with
the remaining elements that create short- and long-term heat loads
and  contribute  to  estimated  doses  at  the  boundary  of  the  reposi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

tory.  In  particular,  it  must  be  noted  that  the  technical  capacity  of
Yucca Mountain is limited by the very long-term heat generated by
isotopes  of  plutonium,  americium,  and  neptunium.  To  effectively
manage  repository  space,  these  should  be  eliminated  or  signifi-
cantly reduced. Reprocessing can separate these elements from the
spent fuel, which makes it a first necessary step to eliminate them
and must then be followed by recycle.

[Chart.]
The  second  chart  on  your  left  illustrates  the  three  major  options
for  managing  spent  nuclear  fuel.  The  once-through  cycle,  that  we
are  doing  today  in  the  United  States,  consists  of  sending  the  un-
processed  spent  fuel  to  the  repository.  Costs  are  fixed  to  one  mill
per  kilowatt-hour,  but  the  repository  is  not  yet  available.  The
mountain  picture  on  the  right  illustrates  how  much  repository
space the United States needs to deal with the spent fuel.

Limited recycle is currently implemented in France and will soon
be  implemented  in  Japan.  And  that  is  the  second  picture.  The
spent  fuel  is  reprocessed,  and  pure  plutonium  is  separated  and  re-
cycled as mixed-oxide fuel, partially burned in a commercial reactor
and  then  stored  or  sent  to  disposal.  The  benefits  to  our  repository
would  be  quite  limited,  only  an  improvement  of  about  10  percent.
This scheme as implemented today also raises the flag of prolifera-
tion  risk.  Claims  that  this  scheme  is  overly  expensive  are  not  cor-
rect. The life cycle cost of limited recycle, using real actual French
data,  is  only  a  few  percent  higher  than  that  for  the  once-through
option.

The  last  option,  full  recycle,  is  being  researched  intensely  in  the
United  States,  France,  Japan,  and  to  some  extent,  in  Russia.  The
U.S.  approach  relies  on  advanced  technologies  that  significantly
mitigate the disadvantages of the limited recycle option.

The  first  step,  separations,  could  rely  on  the  UREX+  technology
that  minimizes  liquid  waste  streams,  separates  key  elements  in
groups that are well suited for transmutation in different reactors.
It  offers  a  significant  advantage  for  nonproliferation  as  we  can  ef-
fectively  eliminate  the  risk  of  material  diversion  or  facility  misuse
by  developing  advanced  monitoring,  modeling,  and  detection  tech-
nologies,  and  integrating  these  technologies  within  the  plant  de-
sign. Also, consolidation of reprocessing facilities could be a key as-
pect for increasing proliferation resistance.

The  second  step  consists  of  partially  recycling  plutonium,  neptu-
nium,  and  some  other  elements  in  thermal  reactors.  This  step  is
not  necessary,  but  may  have  an  economic  advantage  that  must  be
balanced with proliferation concerns.

The last step consists of closing the fuel cycle by transmuting all
remaining  elements  in  fast  reactors  using  pyroprocessing  separa-
tions technology, with enhanced proliferation resistance.

The full recycle option, as presented here, has major benefits.
It  increases  repository  space  utilization  by  a  factor  of  more  than
100  and  delays  the  need  for  a  second  repository  well  into  the  next
century.  It  eliminates  all  isotopes  that  are  a  proliferation  concern.
It  allows  adoption  of  modern  separations  and  safeguards  tech-
nologies  that  will  greatly  increase  its  proliferation  resistance.  The
increase in life cycle costs is 10 percent or less according to OECD
studies,  and  this  must  be  contrasted  with  the  significant  benefits

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

of  this  approach,  particularly  with  regard  to  the  cost  and  difficul-
ties of a second repository.

To  conclude,  we  believe  that  the  technologies  being  considered
today  are  mature  enough  to  justify  a  down-selection  by  2007  and
the  startup  of  an  engineering-scale  demonstration  that  could  lead
to  large-scale  commercialization.  It  is  critical  that  the  down-selec-
tion  and  demonstration  be  performed  not  only  for  reprocessing
technologies  but  in  concert  with  research  in  recycle  technologies,
including fast reactors.

Thank  you,  again,  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  on
this  timely  and  very  important  subject,  and  I  would  be  pleased  to
answer any questions you might have.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Finck follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PHILLIP J. FINCK

SUMMARY

Management  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  from  commercial  nuclear  reactors  can  be  ad-
dressed  in  a  comprehensive,  integrated  manner  to  enable  safe,  emissions-free,  nu-
clear  electricity  to  make  a  sustained  and  growing  contribution  to  the  Nation’s  en-
ergy  needs.  Legislation  limits  the  capacity  of  the  Yucca  Mountain  repository  to
70,000  metric  tons  from  commercial  spent  fuel  and  DOE  defense-related  waste.  It
is estimated that this amount will be accumulated by approximately 2010 at current
generation  rates  for  spent  nuclear  fuel.  To  preserve  nuclear  energy  as  a  significant
part  of  our  future  energy  generating  capability,  new  technologies  can  be  imple-
mented  that  allow  greater  use  of  the  repository  space  at  Yucca  Mountain.  By  proc-
essing spent nuclear fuel and recycling the hazardous radioactive materials, we can
reduce the waste disposal requirements enough to delay the need for a second repos-
itory until the next century, even in a nuclear energy growth scenario. Recent stud-
ies indicate that such a closed fuel cycle may require only minimal increases in nu-
clear  electricity  costs,  and  are  not  a  major  factor  in  the  economic  competitiveness
of nuclear power (the University of Chicago study, ‘‘The Economic Future of Nuclear
Power,’’ August 2004). However, the benefits of a closed fuel cycle can not be meas-
ured by economics alone; resource optimization and waste minimization are also im-
portant  benefits.  Moving  forward  in  2007  with  an  engineering-scale  demonstration
of  an  integrated  system  of  proliferation-resistant,  advanced  separations  and  trans-
mutation  technologies  would  be  an  excellent  first  step  in  demonstrating  all  of  the
necessary technologies for a sustainable future for nuclear energy.
Nuclear Waste and Sustainability

World  energy  demand  is  increasing  at  a  rapid  pace.  In  order  to  satisfy  the  de-
mand  and  protect  the  environment  for  future  generations,  energy  sources  must
evolve  from  the  current  dominance  of  fossil  fuels  to  a  more  balanced,  sustainable
approach. This new approach must be based on abundant, clean, and economical en-
ergy sources. Furthermore, because of the growing worldwide demand and competi-
tion  for  energy,  the  United  States  vitally  needs  to  establish  energy  sources  that
allow for energy independence.

Nuclear  energy  is  a  carbon-free,  secure,  and  reliable  energy  source  for  today  and
for  the  future.  In  addition  to  electricity  production,  nuclear  energy  has  the  promise
to  become  a  critical  resource  for  process  heat  in  the  production  of  transportation
fuels,  such  as  hydrogen  and  synthetic  fuels,  and  desalinated  water.  New  nuclear
plants are imperative to meet these vital needs.

To  ensure  a  sustainable  future  for  nuclear  energy,  several  requirements  must  be
met. These include safety and efficiency, proliferation resistance, sound nuclear ma-
terials  management,  and  minimal  environmental  impacts.  While  some  of  these  re-
quirements  are  already  being  satisfied,  the  United  States  needs  to  adopt  a  more
comprehensive approach to nuclear waste management. The environmental benefits
of resource optimization and waste minimization for nuclear power must be pursued
with  targeted  research  and  development  to  develop  a  successful  integrated  system
with  minimal  economic  impact.  Alternative  nuclear  fuel  cycle  options  that  employ
separations,  transmutation,  and  refined  disposal  (e.g.,  conservation  of  geologic  re-
pository space) must be contrasted with the current planned approach of direct dis-
posal,  taking  into  account  the  complete  set  of  potential  benefits  and  penalties.  In
many  ways,  this  is  not  unlike  the  premium  homeowners  pay  to  recycle  municipal
waste.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

The  spent  nuclear  fuel  situation  in  the  United  States  can  be  put  in  perspective
with  a  few  numbers.  Currently,  the  country’s  103  commercial  nuclear  reactors
produce  more  than  2,000  metric  tons  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  per  year  (masses  are
measured  in  heavy  metal  content  of  the  fuel,  including  uranium  and  heavier  ele-
ments).  The  Yucca  Mountain  repository  has  a  legislative  capacity  of  70,000  metric
tons,  including  spent  nuclear  fuel  and  DOE  defense-related  wastes.  By  approxi-
mately 2010 the accumulated spent nuclear fuel generated by these reactors and the
defense-related  waste  will  meet  this  capacity,  even  before  the  repository  starts  ac-
cepting  any  spent  nuclear  fuel.  The  ultimate  technical  capacity  of  Yucca  Mountain
is  expected  to  be  around  120,000  metric  tons,  using  the  current  understanding  of
the  Yucca  Mountain  site  geologic  and  hydrologic  characteristics.  This  limit  will  be
reached  by  including  the  spent  fuel  from  current  reactors  operating  over  their  life-
time.  Assuming  nuclear  growth  at  a  rate  of  1.8  percent  per  year  after  2010,  the
120,000  metric  ton  capacity  will  be  reached  around  2030.  At  that  projected  nuclear
growth rate, the U.S. will need up to nine Yucca Mountain-type repositories by the
end of this century. Until Yucca Mountain starts accepting waste, spent nuclear fuel
must be stored in temporary facilities, either storage pools or above ground storage
casks.

Today, many consider repository space a scarce resource that should be managed
as  such.  While  disposal  costs  in  a  geologic  repository  are  currently  quite  affordable
for  U.S.  electric  utilities,  accounting  for  only  a  few  percent  of  the  total  cost  of  elec-
tricity, the availability of U.S. repository space will likely remain limited.

• Build more ultimate disposal sites like Yucca Mountain.
• Use interim storage technologies as a temporary solution.
• Develop  and  implement  advanced  fuel  cycles,  consisting  of  separations  tech-
nologies  that  separate  the  constituents  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  into  elemental
streams,  and  transmutation  technologies  that  destroy  selected  elements  and
greatly reduce repository needs.

Only  three  options  are  available  for  the  disposal  of  accumulating  spent  nuclear

fuel:

A responsible approach to using nuclear power must always consider its whole life
cycle,  including  final  disposal.  We  consider  that  temporary  solutions,  while  useful
as  a  stockpile  management  tool,  can  never  be  considered  as  ultimate  solutions.  It
seems  prudent  that  the  U.S.  always  have  at  least  one  set  of  technologies  available
to avoid expanding geologic disposal sites.
Spent Nuclear Fuel

The  composition  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  poses  specific  problems  that  make  its  ulti-
mate disposal challenging. Fresh nuclear fuel is composed of uranium dioxide (about
96  percent  U238,  and  four  percent  U235).  During  irradiation,  most  of  the  U235  is
fissioned,  and  a  small  fraction  of  the  U238  is  transmuted  into  heavier  elements
(known  as  ‘‘transuranics’’).  The  spent  nuclear  fuel  contains  about  93  percent  ura-
nium  (mostly  U238),  about  one  percent  plutonium,  less  than  one  percent  minor
actinides  (neptunium,  americium,  and  curium),  and  five  percent  fission  products.
Uranium,  if  separated  from  the  other  elements,  is  relatively  benign,  and  could  be
disposed  of  as  low-level  waste  or  stored  for  later  use.  Some  of  the  other  elements
raise significant concerns:

• The  fissile  isotopes  of  plutonium,  americium,  and  neptunium  are  potentially
usable  in  weapons  and,  therefore,  raise  proliferation  concerns.  Because  spent
nuclear fuel is protected from theft for about one hundred years by its intense
radioactivity, it is difficult to separate these isotopes without remote handling
facilities.
• Three isotopes, which are linked through a decay process (Pu241, Am241, and
Np237), are the major contributors to the estimated dose for releases from the
repository,  typically  occurring  between  100,000  and  one  million  years,  and
also  to  the  long-term  heat  generation  that  limits  the  amount  of  waste  that
can be placed in the repository.
• Certain fission products (cesium, strontium) are major contributors to the re-
pository’s short-term heat load, but their effects can be mitigated by providing
better  ventilation  to  the  repository  or  by  providing  a  cooling-off  period  before
placing them in the repository.
• Other  fission  products  (Tc99  and  I129)  also  contribute  to  the  estimated  dose.
The  time  scales  required  to  mitigate  these  concerns  are  daunting:  several  of  the
isotopes of concern will not decay to safe levels for hundreds of thousands of years.
Thus,  the  solutions  to  long-term  disposal  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  are  limited  to  three

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

options:  the  search  for  a  geologic  environment  that  will  remain  stable  for  that  pe-
riod; the search for waste forms that can contain these elements for that period; or
the  destruction  of  these  isotopes.  These  three  options  underlie  the  major  fuel  cycle
strategies  that  are  currently  being  developed  and  deployed  in  the  U.S.  and  other
countries.
Options for Disposing of Spent Nuclear Fuel

Three  options  are  being  considered  for  disposing  of  spent  nuclear  fuel:  the  once-
through cycle is the U.S. reference; limited recycle has been implemented in France
and  elsewhere  and  is  being  deployed  in  Japan;  and  full  recycle  (also  known  as  the
closed fuel cycle) is being researched in the U.S., France, Japan, and elsewhere.
1. Once-through Fuel Cycle

This  is  the  U.S.  reference  option  where  spent  nuclear  fuel  is  sent  to  the  geologic
repository that must contain the constituents of the spent nuclear fuel for hundreds
of thousands of years. Several countries have programs to develop these repositories,
with the U.S. having the most advanced program. This approach is considered safe,
provided  suitable  repository  locations  and  space  can  be  found.  It  should  be  noted
that  other  ultimate  disposal  options  have  been  researched  (e.g.,  deep  sea  disposal;
boreholes and disposal in the sun) and abandoned. The challenges of long-term geo-
logic disposal of spent nuclear fuel are well recognized, and are related to the uncer-
tainty  about  both  the  long-term  behavior  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  and  the  geologic
media in which it is placed.
2. Limited Recycle

Limited  recycle  options  are  commercially  available  in  France,  Japan,  and  the
United Kingdom. They use the PUREX process, which separates uranium and pluto-
nium,  and  directs  the  remaining  transuranics  to  vitrified  waste,  along  with  all  the
fission  products.  The  uranium  is  stored  for  eventual  reuse.  The  plutonium  is  used
to fabricate mixed-oxide fuel that can be used in conventional reactors. Spent mixed-
oxide fuel is currently not reprocessed, though the feasibility of mixed-oxide reproc-
essing has been demonstrated. It is typically stored or eventually sent to a geologic
repository  for  disposal.  Note  that  a  reactor  partially  loaded  with  mixed-oxide  fuel
can destroy as much plutonium as it creates. Nevertheless, this approach always re-
sults in increased production of americium, a key contributor to the heat generation
in a repository. This approach has two significant advantages:

• It can help manage the accumulation of plutonium.
• It  can  help  significantly  reduce  the  volume  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  (the  French

examples indicate that volume decreases by a factor of four).

Several disadvantages have been noted:

a few percent.

• It results in a small economic penalty by increasing the net cost of electricity
• The  separation  of  pure  plutonium  in  the  PUREX  process  is  considered  by
some to be a proliferation risk; when mixed-oxide use is insufficient, this ma-
terial is stored for future use as fuel.
• This  process  does  not  significantly  improve  the  use  of  the  repository  space
(the  improvement  is  around  10  percent,  as  compared  to  a  factor  of  100  for
closed fuel cycles).
• This  process  does  not  significantly  improve  the  use  of  natural  uranium  (the
improvement  is  around  15  percent,  as  compared  to  a  factor  of  100  for  closed
fuel cycles).

3. Full Recycle (the Closed Fuel Cycle)

Full  recycle  approaches  are  being  researched  in  France,  Japan,  and  the  United
States. This approach typically comprises three successive steps: an advanced sepa-
rations step based on the UREX+ technology that mitigates the perceived disadvan-
tages  of  PUREX,  partial  recycle  in  conventional  reactors,  and  closure  of  the  fuel
cycle in fast reactors.

The  first  step,  UREX+  technology,  allows  for  the  separations  and  subsequent

management of highly pure product streams. These streams are:

• Uranium, which can be stored for future use or disposed of as low-level waste.
• A mixture of plutonium and neptunium, which is intended for partial recycle
• Separated fission products intended for short-term storage, possibly for trans-

in conventional reactors followed by recycle in fast reactors.

mutation, and for long-term storage in specialized waste forms.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

• The  minor  actinides  (americium  and  curium)  for  transmutation  in  fast  reac-

tors.

The UREX+ approach has several advantages:

• It  produces  minimal  liquid  waste  forms,  and  eliminates  the  issue  of  the

‘‘waste tank farms.’’

• Through  advanced  monitoring,  simulation  and  modeling,  it  provides  signifi-
cant  opportunities  to  detect  misuse  and  diversion  of  weapons-usable  mate-
rials.

• It provides the opportunity for significant cost reduction.
• Finally  and  most  importantly,  it  provides  the  critical  first  step  in  managing

all hazardous elements present in the spent nuclear fuel.

The  second  step—partial  recycle  in  conventional  reactors—can  expand  the  oppor-
tunities  offered  by  the  conventional  mixed-oxide  approach.  In  particular,  it  is  ex-
pected that with significant R&D effort, new fuel forms can be developed that burn
up  to  50  percent  of  the  plutonium  and  neptunium  present  in  spent  nuclear  fuel.
(Note  that  some  studies  also  suggest  that  it  might  be  possible  to  recycle  fuel  in
these  reactors  many  times—i.e.,  reprocess  and  recycle  the  irradiated  advanced
fuel—and further destroy plutonium and neptunium; other studies also suggest pos-
sibilities for transmuting americium in these reactors. Nevertheless, the practicality
of  these  schemes  is  not  yet  established  and  requires  additional  scientific  and  engi-
neering  research.)  The  advantage  of  the  second  step  is  that  it  reduces  the  overall
cost  of  the  closed  fuel  cycle  by  burning  plutonium  in  conventional  reactors,  thereby
reducing the number of fast reactors needed to complete the transmutation mission
of  minimizing  hazardous  waste.  This  step  can  be  entirely  bypassed,  and  all  trans-
mutation  performed  in  advanced  fast  reactors,  if  recycle  in  conventional  reactors  is
judged to be undesirable.

The  third  step,  closure  of  the  fuel  cycle  using  fast  reactors  to  transmute  the  fuel
constituents into much less hazardous elements, and pyroprocessing technologies to
recycle  the  fast  reactor  fuel,  constitutes  the  ultimate  step  in  reaching  sustainable
nuclear  energy.  This  process  will  effectively  destroy  the  transuranic  elements,  re-
sulting  in  waste  forms  that  contain  only  a  very  small  fraction  of  the  transuranics
(less than one percent) and all fission products. These technologies are being devel-
oped at Argonne National Laboratory and Idaho National Laboratory, with parallel
development in Japan, France, and Russia.

The full recycle approach has significant benefits:

• It  can  effectively  increase  use  of  repository  space  by  a  factor  of  more  than

100.

risk.

• It can effectively increase the use of natural uranium by a factor of 100.
• It  eliminates  the  uncontrolled  buildup  of  all  isotopes  that  are  a  proliferation

rials, thus increasing their proliferation resistance.

when uranium supplies will become increasingly difficult to ensure.

• The fast reactors and the processing plant can be deployed in small co-located
facilities  that  minimize  the  risk  of  material  diversion  during  transportation.
• The  fast  reactor  does  not  require  the  use  of  very  pure  weapons  usable  mate-
• It  finally  can  usher  the  way  towards  full  sustainability  to  prepare  for  a  time
• These processes would have limited economic impact; the increase in the cost
• Assuming  that  demonstrations  of  these  processes  are  started  by  2007,  com-
mercial  operations  are  possible  starting  in  2025;  this  will  require  adequate
funding  for  demonstrating  the  separations,  recycle,  and  reactor  technologies.
• The systems can be designed and implemented to ensure that the mass of ac-
cumulated spent nuclear fuel in the U.S. would always remain below 100,000
metric tons—less than the technical capacity of Yucca Mountain—thus delay-
ing, or even avoiding, the need for a second repository in the U.S.

of electricity would be less than 10 percent (ref: OECD).

Conclusion

A well engineered recycling program for spent nuclear fuel will provide the United
States  with  a  long-term,  affordable,  carbon-free  energy  source  with  low  environ-
mental  impact.  This  new  paradigm  for  nuclear  power  will  allow  us  to  manage  nu-
clear  waste  and  reduce  proliferation  risks  while  creating  a  sustainable  energy  sup-
ply.  It  is  possible  that  the  cost  of  recycling  will  be  slightly  higher  than  direct  dis-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

posal  of  spent  nuclear  fuel,  but  the  Nation  will  only  need  one  geologic  repository
for the ultimate disposal of the residual waste.

72

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

APPENDIX 1:

75

Reprocessing Technologies

There are currently three mature options to reprocess spent nuclear fuel.

PUREX—Is the most common liquid-liquid extraction process for treatment of light
water reactor spent fuel. The irradiated fuel is dissolved in nitric acid, and uranium
and  plutonium  are  extracted  in  the  organic  phase  by  an  organic  solvent  consisting
of tributyl phosphate in kerosene, while the fission products remain in the aqueous
nitric  phase.  Further  process  steps  enable  the  subsequent  separation  of  uranium
from plutonium.

Advantages—fully commercialized process, with over 50 years of experience.
Disadvantage—it  is  not  efficient  enough  to  achieve  the  present  requirements  for
separations  of  technetium,  cesium,  strontium,  neptunium,  americium  and  curium.
UREX+—Is  an  advanced  liquid-liquid  extraction  process  for  treatment  of  light
water reactor spent fuel. Similar to PUREX, the irradiated fuel is dissolved in nitric
acid.  The  UREX+  process  consists  of  a  series  of  solvent-extraction  steps  for  the  re-
covery of Pu/Np, Tc, U, Cs/Sr, Am and Cm.

Advantages—meets  current  separations  requirements  for  continuous  recycle.
Builds  on  engineering  experience  derived  from  current  aqueous  reprocessing  facili-
ties such as La Hague.

Disadvantage—can  not  directly  process  short-cooled  and  some  specialty  fuels

being designed for advanced reactors.
Pyroprocessing—These technologies rely on electrochemical processes rather than
chemical  extraction  processes  to  achieve  the  desired  degree  of  conversion  or  purifi-
cation of the spent fuel. If oxide fuel is processed, it is converted to metal after the
irradiated  fuel  is  disassembled.  The  metallic  fuel  is  then  treated  to  separate  ura-
nium and the transuranic elements from the fission product elements.

Advantages—ability  to  process  short-cooled  and  specialty  fuels  being  designed  for

advanced reactors.

Disadvantages—does  not  meet  current  separations  requirements  for  continuous

recycle in thermal reactors, but ideal for fast spectrum reactors.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

APPENDIX 2:

76

Answers to Specific Questions

1. What are the advantages and disadvantages of using reprocessing to ad-
dress  efficiency  of  fuel  use,  waste  management  and  non-proliferation?
How  would  you  assess  the  advantages  and  disadvantages,  and  how
might the disadvantages be mitigated?
Reprocessing  of  spent  fuel  is  a  necessary  step  in  an  advanced  fuel  cycle,  but  is
insufficient to yield any significant benefits by itself: benefits are only incurred once
the reprocessed materials are recycled and partially or totally eliminated. Two types
of recycle schemes are typically considered: limited recycle in conventional reactors,
and full recycle in advanced reactors.
Limited Recycle

Limited  recycle  options  are  commercially  available  in  France,  Japan,  and  the
United  Kingdom.  They  utilize  the  PUREX  process,  which  separates  uranium  and
plutonium, and directs the remaining transuranics to vitrified waste, along with all
the  fission  products.  The  uranium  is  stored  for  eventual  reuse.  The  plutonium  is
used to fabricate mixed oxide (MOX) fuel that can be used in conventional reactors.
Spent MOX fuel is currently not reprocessed (though feasibility of MOX reprocessing
has  been  demonstrated)  and  is  typically  stored  or  eventually  sent  to  a  geologic  re-
pository for disposal. Note that a reactor partially loaded with MOX fuel can destroy
as  much  plutonium  as  it  creates.  Nevertheless,  this  approach  always  results  in  an
increase  in  the  production  of  americium  (a  key  contributor  to  the  heat  generation
in a repository). This approach has several advantages:

• It can help manage the accumulation of plutonium.
• It  can  help  significantly  reduce  the  volume  of  spent  nuclear  fuel  (SNF)  (the

French examples indicates a volume decrease by a factor of four).

Several disadvantages have been noted:

tricity is a few percent.

• It results in a small economic penalty, as the increase in the net cost of elec-
• The  separation  of  pure  plutonium  in  the  PUREX  process  is  considered  by
some to be a proliferation risk; when MOX utilization is insufficient, this ma-
terial is stored for future use as fuel.
• This  process  does  not  significantly  improve  the  utilization  of  the  repository
space (the improvement is around 10 percent, as compared to a factor of 100
for closed fuel cycles).
• This process does not significantly improve the utilization of natural uranium
(the  improvement  is  around  15  percent,  as  compared  to  a  factor  of  100  for
closed fuel cycles).

Full Recycle (the Closed Fuel Cycle)

Full  recycle  approaches  are  being  researched  in  France,  Japan,  and  the  United
States.  This  approach  is  typically  comprised  of  three  successive  steps:  an  advanced
separations  step  based  on  the  UREX+  technology  that  mitigates  the  perceived  dis-
advantages  of  PUREX,  partial  recycle  in  conventional  reactors,  and  closure  of  the
fuel cycle in fast reactors.

The  first  step,  UREX+  technology,  allows  for  the  separations  and  subsequent
management of very pure streams of products. It produces the following streams of
products:  uranium,  that  can  be  stored  for  future  use  or  can  be  disposed  of  as  low-
level waste; a mixture of plutonium and neptunium that are intended for partial re-
cycle  in  conventional  reactors  followed  by  recycle  in  fast  reactors;  separated  fission
products  intended  for  short-term  storage,  possibly  for  transmutation,  and  for  long-
term  storage  in  specialized  waste  forms;  and  the  minor  actinides  (americium  and
curium) for transmutation in fast reactors. The UREX+ approach has several advan-
tages:  it  produces  minimal  liquid  waste  forms  (and  eliminates  the  issue  of  the
‘‘waste tank farms’’); through advanced monitoring, simulation and modeling it pro-
vides significant opportunities for detecting misuse and diversion of weapons usable
materials; it provides the opportunity for significant cost reduction; and, finally and
most  importantly,  it  provides  the  critical  first  step  in  managing  all  hazardous  ele-
ments present in the SNF.

The  second  step,  partial  recycle  in  conventional  reactors  can  expand  the  opportu-
nities  offered  by  the  conventional  MOX  approach.  In  particular,  it  is  expected  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

with  significant  R&D  effort,  new  fuel  forms  can  be  developed  that  can  burn  up  to
50  percent  of  the  plutonium  and  neptunium  present  in  the  SNF.  (Note  that  some
studies  also  suggest  that  it  might  be  possible  to  recycle  fuel  in  these  reactors  mul-
tiple times (i.e., reprocess and recycle the irradiated advanced fuel) and further de-
stroy  plutonium  and  neptunium;  other  studies  also  suggest  possibilities  for  trans-
muting americium in these reactors. Nevertheless, the practicality of these schemes
is  not  yet  established  and  requires  additional  scientific  and  engineering  research.)
The  advantage  of  the  second  step  is  that  it  reduces  the  overall  cost  of  the  closed
fuel  cycle  by  burning  plutonium  in  conventional  reactors,  and  reducing  the  number
of  fast  reactors  needed  to  complete  the  transmutation  mission  of  minimizing  haz-
ardous  waste.  This  step  can  be  entirely  bypassed,  and  all  transmutation  performed
in advanced fast reactors, if recycle in conventional reactors is judged to be undesir-
able.

The third step, closure of the fuel cycle, using fast reactors to transmute the fuel
constituents into much less hazardous elements, and pyroprocessing technologies to
recycle the fast reactor fuel, constitutes the ultimate step in reaching sustainability
for  nuclear  energy.  This  process  will  effectively  destroy  the  transuranic  elements,
resulting in waste forms that contain only a very small fraction of the transuranics
(less than one percent) and all fission products. These technologies are being devel-
oped at Argonne National Laboratory and Idaho National Laboratory, with parallel
development in Japan, France, and Russia.

The full recycle approach has significant benefits:

— It  can  effectively  increase  the  utilization  of  the  repository  space  by  a  factor

in excess of 100.

— It  can  effectively  increase  the  utilization  of  natural  uranium  by  a  factor  of

100.

— It eliminates the uncontrolled buildup of all isotopes that are a proliferation

risk.

— The  fast  reactors  and  the  processing  plant  can  be  deployed  in  small  co-lo-
cated facilities that minimize the risk of material diversion during transpor-
tation.

— The fast reactor does not require the use of very pure weapons usable mate-

rials, thus increasing their proliferation resistance.

— It finally can usher the way towards full sustainability to prepare for a time

when uranium supplies will become increasingly difficult to ensure.

— These processes would have limited economic impact: the increase in the cost

of electricity would be less than 10 percent (ref: OECD).

— Assuming that demonstration of these processes is started by 2007, commer-
cial operations are possible starting in 2025; this will require adequate fund-
ing for demonstrating the separations, recycle, and reactor technologies.

— The  systems  can  be  designed  and  implemented  to  ensure  that  the  mass  of
accumulated SNF in the U.S. would always remain below 100,000MT, (Note:
less  than  the  technical  capacity  of  Yucca  Mountain)  thus  delaying,  or  even
avoiding, the need for a second repository in the U.S.

Several disadvantages have been noted:

— These processes would have limited economic impact: the increase in the cost

of electricity would be less than 10 percent (ref: OECD).

— Management  of  potentially  weapons-usable  materials  may  be  viewed  as  a

proliferation risk.

These disadvantages can be addressed by specific actions:

— Fuel cycle and reactor R&D is currently going on in the DOE Advanced Fuel
Cycle  Initiative  (AFCI)  and  Gen-IV  programs  to  reduce  the  costs  of  proc-
essing, fuel fabrication, and advanced reactors.

— Advanced simulation, modeling, and detection techniques can be used in fuel
cycle  facilities  to  improve  material  accountability  and  decrease  the  risk  of
misuse or diversion.

— An  aggressive  development  and  demonstration  program  of  the  advanced  re-
actors  and  recycling  options  is  needed  to  allow  commercialization  in  a  rea-
sonable timeframe.

2. What  are  the  greatest  technological  hurdles  in  developing  and  commer-
cializing  advanced  reprocessing  technologies?  Is  it  possible  for  the  gov-
ernment to select a technology by 2007?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

To  answer  the  first  part  of  the  question,  the  first  major  hurdle  is  the  current  in-
ability to test the chemical processing steps at a pilot-scale using spent nuclear fuel
(both as individual process steps and in an integrated manner simulating plant op-
erations)  to  verify  that  both  the  process  itself  and  the  larger  scale  equipment  will
function as intended, and to minimize the technical risks in designing the commer-
cial-scale  plant.  The  processing  methods  currently  being  refined  under  the  scope  of
the  DOE  AFCI  program  are  being  designed  to  very  high  standards  for  purity  of
products  and  efficiency  of  recovery,  in  order  to  reduce  costs  and  minimize  the  haz-
ardous  content  of  high-level  wastes.  The  processes  have  been  successfully  tested  at
laboratory  scale  (about  one-millionth  of  industrial  scale).  Normal  expectations  for
scale-up of industrial chemical processes are that the processes proven in the labora-
tory  will  perform  well  at  full  scale,  provided  that  the  process  and  equipment  func-
tion  as  intended.  In  order  to  test  process  operations  and  equipment  designs,  it  is
necessary  to  conduct  pilot  plant  operations  at  one/one-hundredth  to  one/one-thou-
sandth of industrial scale with the complete process.

The second major hurdle is related to the first, in that there is an insufficient sup-
ply  of  some  of  the  various  chemical  elements  needed  for  the  development  and  test-
ing  of  product  storage  forms  and  waste  disposal  forms.  However,  it  is  anticipated
that  these  would  become  available  as  a  result  of  pilot-scale  testing,  but  the  lack  of
materials will hinder progress prior to that time.

For  the  second  part  of  the  question,  yes,  it  is  completely  reasonable  to  select  a
processing  technology  by  2007,  given  the  present  state  of  development  for  the  proc-
essing technologies. The level of success achieved in the DOE AFCI program to date
indicates  that  the  development  of  at  least  one  processing  technology  satisfying  pro-
gram  goals,  UREX+,  will  be  advanced  to  the  stage  where  pilot-scale  testing  is  war-
ranted. At that time, it should also be possible to evaluate whether any of the other
promising technologies currently being studied have proven capable of meeting pro-
gram goals, and are also near to pilot-scale testing.

However, it must be emphasized that the reprocessing technology by itself will not
provide  any  significant  benefits  unless  the  development  of  such  capability  is
matched  by  similar  advances  in  recycling  technologies.  In  the  case  of  full  recycle,
the development of both suitable reactors for recycling transuranics and appropriate
nuclear  fuel  forms  containing  transuranics  must  proceed  in  parallel  to  testing  and
implementation  of  spent  fuel  processing.  Only  with  all  of  the  pieces  in  place  will
substantial benefits be achievable.
3. What  reprocessing  technologies  currently  are  being  developed  at  Ar-
gonne  or  at  other  national  labs?  What  technical  questions  must  be  an-
swered?
AFCI processing (chemical separations) technology is being developed at Argonne
National  Laboratory,  Idaho  National  Laboratory,  Los  Alamos  National  Laboratory,
Oak  Ridge  National  Laboratory,  Sandia  National  Laboratory,  and  Savannah  River
National  Laboratory.  All  are  involved  with  the  development  of  aqueous  solvent  ex-
traction  technologies  (the  suite  of  UREX+  processes),  while  ANL  and  INL  are  also
developing the pyrochemical processing technology that will be required for the nu-
clear  fuel  cycle  associated  with  Gen-IV  reactors.  The  aqueous  technology  is  needed
for  near-term  application,  and  the  emphasis  is  on  process  optimization,  equipment
development,  and  plant  design.  The  pyrochemical  technology  is  needed  for  deploy-
ment  of  the  Gen-IV  reactors,  and  requires  large  scale  demonstration.  Emphasis  on
pyroprocessing is in testing of process features, with some work in progress on proc-
ess equipment and facility design.

The UREX+ solvent extraction demonstrations have shown that it can meet sepa-
rations  criteria;  however,  integrated,  engineering-scale  testing  is  required  to  com-
plete development. Continuing work is required to optimize flowsheets and increase
process robustness and operations efficiency. An adequate facility is required for en-
gineering-scale  demonstrations  to  test  equipment,  advanced  instrumentation  for
process  control  and  PR&PP  (Proliferation  Resistance  and  Physical  Protection),  con-
version of product and waste forms.

Pyroprocessing  requires  continued  process  development  followed  by  engineering-
scale  demonstration  of  flowsheets  developed  for  reprocessing  the  many  alternative
advanced  reactor  fuels.  Improvements  in  the  areas  of  transuranic  element  recovery
and process equipment design needs to be completed. Similar to the UREX+ process
an adequate facility is required for engineering-scale demonstration.
4. What  reprocessing  technologies  are  still  in  the  basic  research  stage,
what advantages might they offer, and what is the estimated timeline for
development of laboratory scale models?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

There  are  currently  two  mature  technologies  for  reprocessing,  UREX+  and
pyroprocessing.  For  industrial  scale  implementation  optimization  of  these  tech-
nologies is still necessary:

• Off-gas  treatment  from  fuel  decladding  and  dissolution  for  retention  of  trit-
ium,  carbon-14,  ruthenium,  and  technetium  to  prevent  their  migration  to
downstream  operations  where  they  are  harder  to  sequester.  Development  of
high efficiency scrubbers is currently an effort in other countries.

• Advanced  instrumentation  and  process-sampling  techniques  for  near  real

time accounting for process control and material accountability.

• Process  diagnostics  for  early  on-line  detection  using  signals  from  process  in-
strumentation to differentiate legitimate process operation versus clandestine
product diversion.

• Waste  forms  optimization  for  preventing  migration  of  radionuclides  and  re-

duce potential heath hazard to the public.

Nevertheless, there are a number of novel technologies where basic research could
provide an alternative to the current technologies, with the potential of minimizing
dose  to  the  public  and  workers  and  environmental  impacts.  These  research  areas
are:

• Development of ligands, chelating agents, and advanced extractant molecules
based  on  fundamental  principles  to  guide  their  preparation.  Advantages—
molecules could be tailored to perform a specific function such as separations
of a given transuranic element. Estimated timeline 20 years.

• Development  of  environmentally  benign  separations  processes  such  as  based
on  magnetic  and  electronic  differences.  Advantages—produce  minimum  sec-
ondary  wastes  and  significantly  decrease  the  consumption  of  chemicals.  Esti-
mated timeline 30 years.

• Development  of  bio-based  separations.  Advantages—identify  methods  and
replicate  biological  compound  functions  leading  to  new  separation  schemes,
for example, separations of actinides over lanthanides. Estimated timeline 50
years.

5. How  would  you  contrast  what  is  being  done  internationally  with  U.S.
plans  for  reprocessing,  recycling  and  associated  waste  management?
What  countries  recycle  now?  What  components  of  the  waste  fuel  are  or
can be used to make new reactor fuel?
Commercial reprocessing plants in France, the United Kingdom and Japan utilize
the  PUREX  process,  which  separates  uranium  and  plutonium  and  directs  the  re-
maining  transuranics  (americium,  neptunium,  and  curium)  to  vitrified  waste  along
with  all  of  the  fission  products.  Reprocessing  operations  in  the  U.K.  may  be  termi-
nated within the next 10 years, primarily because the shutdown of gas-cooled power
reactors  is  limiting  the  need  for  the  Sellafield  B–205  plant.  BNFL’s  THORP  plant
at Sellafield is principally used for light water reactor (LWR) spent fuel processing;
the U.K. has only one LWR in operation and the market for foreign LWR fuel proc-
essing  is  decreasing.  A  shutdown  of  THORP  has  been  announced  for  2010.  In  con-
trast,  a  vigorous  reprocessing  activity  is  in  progress  in  France  at  the  La  Hague
plant  of  COGEMA.  This  plant  is  processing  spent  fuel  from  foreign  sources  as  well
as  from  the  57  power  reactors  of  Electricite´ de  France.  Plutonium  is  recovered  for
recycle  to  the  EdF  reactors  as  mixed  oxide  (MOX)  fuel.  Research  on  means  for  im-
proving waste management through reprocessing have been stimulated by the 1991
law,  and  research  is  in  progress  now  at  the  laboratories  of  the  Commissariat  a`
l’E´ nergie  Atomique  (CEA)  that  is  following  much  the  same  lines  as  that  pioneered
in the AFCI program of DOE. Commercial reprocessing will begin soon in Japan at
the  Rokkasho-mura  plant  of  Japan  Nuclear  Fuel  Ltd.  The  Rokkasho  Reprocessing
Plant is designed for the production of a mixed uranium-plutonium product that can
be  used  to  produce  mixed  oxide  fuel  for  recycle  in  Japanese  light  water  reactors.
Japanese  laboratories  are  also  experimenting  with  advanced  spent  fuel  processing
methods.

The  U.S.  program  represents  a  transition  to  an  advanced  nuclear  fuel  cycle.  In
the U.S., emphasis is being placed on technologies that can be successfully deployed
in the next 20 years or so and be economically competitive as well as secure against
all threats. The wastes arising from future U.S. process plants will be virtually free
of  radiotoxic  elements,  and  there  will  be  no  generation  of  liquid  wastes  requiring
underground  tank  storage.  We  expect  our  efforts  to  help  us  regain  international
leadership in the field of nuclear energy.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

Both  Japan  and  France  are  currently  developing  advanced  fuel  cycles,  similar  to
the  ones  described  in  this  paper,  where  there  first  would  be  partial  recycle  in  con-
ventional  reactors,  followed  by  closure  of  the  fuel  cycle  in  fast  reactors.  The  U.S.
program  has  had  significant  international  collaborations  with  these  two  countries,
and there have been excellent exchanges of research results. The approaches in the
three  countries  are  relatively  well  aligned,  with  a  stronger  emphasis  on  the  short-
term  development  of  separations  technologies  in  the  U.S.,  and  a  stronger  emphasis
on the long-term development of fast reactors in France and Japan.

BIOGRAPHY FOR PHILLIP J. FINCK

Phillip  Finck  received  his  Ph.D.  in  Nuclear  Engineering  from  MIT  in  1982,  and
a  MBA  in  2001  from  the  University  of  Chicago.  He  was  a  mechanical  engineer  at
NOVATOME, France from 1983 to 1986, and was involved in the safety and design
of fast reactors, including Superphenix. In 1986, he joined Argonne National Labora-
tory and was involved in neutronics methods development for the Integral Fast Re-
actor  concept,  and  later  for  the  New  Production  Reactor.  In  1991,  he  became  the
lead for EBR–II neutronics analyses at ANL–E. In 1993 he joined the French Atom-
ic Energy Commission where he became the head of the Reactor Physics Laboratory
at the Cadarache Center, with activities in LWR and LMR physics, criticality safety,
fuel cycle physics, and nuclear data. In 1995, he was elected to chair the European
nuclear  data  project—JEF.  Dr.  Finck  rejoined  ANL  in  1997,  where  he  became  the
Associate Director of the Technology Development Division. He has led the ANL ac-
tivities in the Advanced Accelerator Applications program since 2000, and has been
heavily  involved  in  transforming  the  program  from  accelerator-based  to  reactor-
based transmutation. In 2003 he was named Deputy Associate Laboratory Director,
Engineering  Research,  where  he  was  responsible  for  coordination  of  all  nuclear  en-
ergy  related  activities  at  ANL,  including  AFCI  and  Gen-IV  programs,  and  develop-
ment  of  new  initiatives.  Since  2004,  Dr.  Finck  is  the  Deputy  Associate  Laboratory
Director for Applied Science and Technology and National Security; in this position,
he coordinates all energy-related activities at ANL.

Dr. Finck is a Fellow of the American Nuclear Society.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

DISCUSSION

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much for your testimony.
We  will  now  turn  to  the  questions,  and  I  will  yield  five  minutes

to the—Chairman Hobson.

Mr.  HOBSON.  I  just  have,  quickly,  a  couple  of  things,  because  I
have  to  leave,  but  I  want  to  thank  you  all  for  your  testimony.  I
may  not  agree  with  all  of  it,  but  I  like  it.  I  like  the  fact  that  we
are having this dialogue, because it wasn’t happening.

Mr.  Bunn,  I  would  like  to  ask  you,  in  your  numbers  that  you
have put together, do you include any costs associated to the liabil-
ity increase each year that this government has to pay the utilities
for not removing the waste from their site?

Mr.  BUNN.  We  include—one  of  the  assumptions  that  we  make
that is favorable to reprocessing, we tried to make assumptions, in
general,  that  were  favorable  to  reprocessing  in  order  to  be,  you
know, fair and ironclad in our conclusions. And we assigned to the
cost  of  the  direct  disposal  option  100  percent  of  the  cost  of  interim
storage  for  many  decades  prior  to  disposal,  and  we  assumed  that
there was zero cost for interim storage with respect—on the reproc-
essing  side.  So  yes,  we  did  include  that.  And  the  costs  of  storage
are actually——

Mr. HOBSON. Oh, no, no, no. I am talking about the liability——
Mr. BUNN. I understand that, but the liability——
Mr. HOBSON.—cost. There is $500 million——
Mr.  BUNN.  The  liability  to  the  government  depends  on  the  costs
to  store  that  fuel.  The—if  the  government  takes  title  to  that  fuel
and pays for its storage, then its liability is the——

Mr. HOBSON. No, but you are making an assumption that would

take legislation, as I understand it, to do. Is that correct?

Mr. BUNN. I am saying that the government should not be in the
business  of  paying  the  utilities  amounts  that  far  exceed  their  ac-
tual cost for storing the amount of nuclear fuel, and therefore, one
should  look  at  what  the  cost  of  storing  spent  fuel  actually  is.  The
cost  of  providing  40  years  of  dry  cask  storage  for  spent  fuel  is  less
than  $200  a  kilogram.  The  cost  of  reprocessing  spent  nuclear  fuel,
even in a new facility, financed entirely with government money at
a  low  government  rate  of  interest,  would  be  more  than  $1,000  a
kilogram  if  its  capital  and  operating  costs  were  identical  to  the
costs  of  the  plants  built  in  France  and  Britain,  and  much  more
than  that  if  it  were  identical  to  the  cost  of  the  most  recent  plant
built in Japan, whose costs are astronomical.

So it is really—it is quite a large difference. You will find, if you
talk  to  utilities,  that  none  of  them  are  particularly  interested  in
paying  for  reprocessing  of  their  spent  fuel  if  they  can  simply  buy
dry casks.

Mr.  HOBSON.  Well,  a  lot  of  them  are  trying  to  move  them  out  of

the area that they have got them in, so——

Mr.  BUNN.  Yes,  they  would  love  to  have  the  government  take  it

away. There is no doubt about that.

Mr.  HOBSON.  No.  No.  Excuse  me.  They  are  providing  a  site  in
Utah—they are attempting to provide a site in Utah, because they
want to move them——

Mr. BUNN. That is right.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

Mr. HOBSON.—out of the cities where they have got them.
Mr. BUNN. Right.
Mr.  HOBSON.  And  the  security  problems  that  they  have,  which  I
am suspect of the—let me put it this way. I am suspect of the num-
bers, but we will look at the numbers.

I would also like to ask you, have you visited the sites in France?
Mr. BUNN. I have.
Mr.  HOBSON.  And  have  you  written  the  same  negative  situation
with  the  sites  in  France  and  encouraged  them  to  do  away  with
their  sites  and  get  away  from  reprocessing?  Because  if  you  look
where  those  sites  are,  there  are  vineyards  growing  up.  And  if  you
go to the Netherlands, there is a playground on the other side. Ob-
viously, there are differing opinions in the world, and I am always
interested  how  we  always  write  about  our  side  of  it,  but  we  have
not  written—maybe  you  have,  and  I  don’t  know  the  answer.  You
should  never  ask  a  question  you  don’t  know  the  answer  to,  but  I
am  concerned  that  I  don’t  see  the  same  concerns  expressed  about
these  existing  facilities,  which  what  I  have  seen,  seem  to  try  to  do
it in a responsible way, and have—don’t have the reliance upon fos-
sil  fuels  in  their  country  that  we  do,  don’t  have  the  proliferation
of  the  air  that  we  do  from  the  plants.  And  my  point  is,  we  need
to move forward in this, but I don’t see the same negatives written
about  that  that  is  written  about  our  ability  to  try  to  sustain  our
country. So I will let you answer that, and then I will——

Mr.  BUNN.  Well,  first  of  all,  I  am  not  against  nuclear  energy.  I
am  a  supporter  of  nuclear  energy,  and  as  I  made  the  point  at  the
end  of  my  testimony,  I  believe  that  if—those  who  support  nuclear
energy  ought  to  be  trying  to  make  it  as  cheap,  as  simple,  as  safe,
and  as  non-controversial  as  possible  in  order  to  build  the  support
needed to grow nuclear energy. And I think that reprocessing with
traditional  PUREX  type  technologies,  as  implemented  in  France
and  Britain  and  Japan,  points  in  the  wrong  direction  on  every
count.  I  have  expressed  concern  about  the  facilities  in  France  and
Britain and Japan for many years, as have many of my colleagues.
But  the  reality  is  those  facilities  exist.  Large  investments  have
been made. Those countries are not going to change their process—
their  approaches  any  time  soon.  However,  it  is  worth  noting  that
when  those  facilities  were  first  built,  they  had  substantial  foreign
customers,  and  now  the  foreign  customer  base  is  dwindling  away
to  almost  nothing,  because  utilities  around  the  world  are  realizing
increasingly  that  dry  cask  storage  offers  a  cheaper  alternative,
which leaves all options open. There is nothing that says that after
you have stored spent fuel for 30 years in a dry cask you can’t then
take  it  out  and  reprocess  it  later  if  technology  develops  that  is,  in
fact, more promising than the traditional technologies. I should say
that all of the numbers we used with respect to the cost of reproc-
essing are drawn from official French and British studies.

Mr. HOBSON. Yes.
Mr. BUNN. They are the French and British numbers.
Mr. HOBSON. Well, I like your final conclusions that you came to
on  the  processing.  When  you  talked  about—I  will  just  finish  with
this. When you talked about drying up, you mean on the reprocess-
ing side of it? Because the Germans, as I understand it, are buying
energy, as we speak, from——

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

Mr. BUNN. Yes, I mean, I——
Mr. HOBSON.—the French——
Mr. BUNN. No, I mean the customers for the reprocessing plants.
Mr. HOBSON.—facilities. Okay.
Mr. BUNN. I mean the customers are——
Mr. HOBSON. Okay. I am sorry.
Mr. BUNN.—from the reprocessing plants.
Mr. HOBSON. Well, again, thank you all for—and I want to thank
the  Chairwoman  for  this  dialogue,  because  we  weren’t  having  this
dialogue. And what we need to do is continue having this dialogue,
in  my  opinion,  so  that  we  do  move  forward  and  not  just  be  in  a
stagnant  situation,  because  every  year  that—and  I  want  to  say  in
this forum before I leave, I am a big proponent of Yucca Mountain.
I  will  have  a  huge  fight  with  the  Senate  over  that  in  getting  it
done.  But  I  also  understand  that  there  are  some  things  we  have
got  to  do  along  the  way.  And  what  we  are  both  trying  to  do  here
is  to  create  a  dialogue  that  we  move  forward,  and  if  we  don’t  put
some  things  into  legislation  and  if  we  don’t  move  and  talk  about
this, we continue to be in a stagnant position, and we will continue
our  reliance  upon  fossil  fuel,  which  I  firmly  believe  we  can  not  do.
I  don’t  think  environmentally  it  is  appropriate,  and  we  just  phys-
ically can’t afford it in the future to continue in this way.

So  I  want  to  thank  you  again.  I  am  going  to  have  to  leave,  and
I  want  to  thank  the  indulgence  of  the  Committee  for  allowing  me
to  intrude  to  show  support  and  to  listen  to  all  of  your  testimony.

Mr. BUNN. Thank you.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. And thank you, Chairman Hobson, for all
of  the  work  that  you  are  doing  on  this.  And  thank  you  for  coming
today.

And  with  that,  I  would  recognize  Ranking  Member,  Mr.  Honda,

for five minutes.

Mr. HONDA. Thank you very much.
I am going to set aside my written questions. I am going to sub-
mit  them,  if  you  don’t  mind,  Madame  Chair,  to  the  witnesses  and
expect a written response from them.

What  I  heard  this  morning  is  a  range  of  opinions,  but  what  I
think I heard was that there is agreement that we need to continue
on  R&D.  And  I  am  judging  by  the  nod  of  the  heads  that  it  sounds
like that is correct.

Then  the  question  is  really  is  the  process  or  the  steps  that  we
need to take in order to get to a point where we think that the dis-
position  of  spent  fuel  is  the  most  appropriate  and  the  most  safe
way  without  rushing  into  a  solution  because  of  political  timelines
and  things  like  that?  So  I  was  just  wondering  from  each  witness
what their response is to each other’s comments and why they feel
the  way  they  do.  I  am  not  trying  to  pit  one  against  the  other,  but
we have witnesses here who have a lot of——

Mr. JOHNSON. A broad range of views.
Mr. HONDA.—knowledge and experience, and I would sort of like
to  listen  to  that  before  I  ask  any  more  questions.  And  we  could
start with Mr. Johnson.

Mr. JOHNSON. Thank you, sir.
I  guess  I  would  like  to  begin  my  answer  by  agreeing  with  your
observation. I believe that what you heard this morning is there is

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

more  agreement  among  us  than,  possibly,  disagreement  with  re-
spect to the need of moving forward with a robust research and de-
velopment program on the issue of spent nuclear fuel, recycle tech-
nologies, safeguard technologies. And the Department very much is
supportive of that, and as you have seen in our budget request for
the last couple of years, we are continuing to move forward in try-
ing to walk through in a step-wise, reasonable fashion the develop-
ment  of  the  technologies  needed  to  address  the  issues  associated
with spent nuclear fuel.

I believe I will leave my comments at that. Thank you.
Mr. HONDA. Oh, okay.
Mr.  BUNN.  I  am  a  supporter  of  continued  research  and  develop-
ment,  but  I  think  even  with  respect  to  research  and  development,
we need to be very careful with respect to the proliferation implica-
tions.  For  example,  I  am  somewhat  concerned  over  pursuing  re-
search  and  development  on  reprocessing  technologies  with  South
Korea, which is a country that has a formal agreement not to have
either  enrichment  or  reprocessing  on  its  soil.  It  is  a  country  that
had a secret nuclear weapons program that was stopped under U.S.
pressure  that  was  based  on  plutonium  reprocessing.  And  some  of
these  technologies,  while  they  may  reduce  some  of  the  hazards  of
PUREX,  are  not  as  proliferation-resistant  if  you  look  at  the  con-
tribution they could make to the acquisition of the needed expertise
and  facilities  if  they  were  broadly  deployed  in  the  developing
world—the  contribution  to  a  proliferating  state’s  nuclear  weapons
program.

Moreover,  some  of  the  technologies,  the  amount  of  other  things
that  are  being  separated  and  cycled  with  the  plutonium  is  pretty
minor. In the case of UREX+, essentially, as I understand it, what
you  are—what  is  separated  with  the  plutonium  is  the  neptunium.
Neptunium-237  is  also  a  potentially  attractive  nuclear  weapons
material. So one has to worry about the possibility of theft of mate-
rials  containing  plutonium  and  neptunium-237  perhaps  somewhat
less than one would about theft of pure plutonium. But that is the
kind  of  thing  that  requires  the  fact-finding  examination  that  Dr.
Hagengruber was talking about.

I  should  mention,  since  I  have  been  questioned  on  the  subject  of
our  economic  assumptions  and  so  on,  that  I  did  bring  a  number  of
copies  of  the  full  study,  which  has  the  complete  references  and  so
on.  It  is  available  on-line  at  a  link  that  is  included  in  my  testi-
mony, and I would like to submit, for the record, the article-length
version of which is in the current issue of Nuclear Technology.

[The information follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

88

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

91

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

92

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

93

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

94

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

95

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

96

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

97

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

98

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

99

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

100

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

101

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

102

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

103

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

104

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

105

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

106

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

107

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

108

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Without objection.
Mr. HONDA. Thank you.
Dr.  HAGENGRUBER.  Yeah,  a  very  interesting  question  to  be  done
with  an  answer  to  be  compact.  Unfortunately,  I  am  the  age  where
I  started  more  than  35  years  ago,  my  first  study  was  to  look  at
long-term  and  short-term  technical  approaches  to  nuclear  waste.
The reactors cost $1 billion at the time. There wasn’t a Three Mile
Island. There wasn’t a study on it, and there wasn’t a Carter deci-
sion  on  reprocessing.  And  it  seems  like  I  have  seen  all  of  this  be-
fore.  We  knew  how  to  reprocess  material  in  a  way  that  produced
the closed fuel cycle. We knew what the nuclear waste issues were,
including  interim  storage  as  a  very  attractive  option.  We  had  lots
of technical opportunities that were demonstrated up in Idaho and
other  places  and  Hanford  for  how  to  dispose  the  material,  maybe
not as good as today, but it is hard to see the last 30 years as hav-
ing made that much progress.

The  issue,  in  the  end,  wasn’t  the  cost  of  nuclear  power  and  the
issue  of  interest  rates  and—I  mean,  West  Valley  was  built  and
then shut down not—in part not because the technology failed, but
the  basic  decision  of  the  infrastructure  and  the  supporting  infra-
structure had a hole in it. The hole is that proliferation became an
increasing concern, not just because it was President Carter. It was
a  national  concern.  There  were  the  London  Suppliers  Group  and
other  people  got  together,  and  decisions  were  struggled  with,  not
consensus,  to  decide  whether  or  not  to  reprocess  in  order  to  have
this  plutonium  appear  as  an  economy,  whether  it  was  in  the
United  States.  Whatever  we  did,  the  world  would,  in  fact,  eventu-
ally do. And today, even after all of these years of being out of the
business,  the  world  still  waits  for  us  to  make  the  decision  on  Gen-
eration IV, to make the decisions on reprocessing, to make the deci-
sions on Yucca Mountain. I mean, with all deference to France and
the  other  countries  making  these  choices,  people  are  looking  to  us
for leadership in the future of nuclear energy.

Our  position  at  APS  and  the  position  that  is  not  in  controversy
with  anything  that  has  been  said  here,  the  technical  information
about  the  processes,  the  work  of  the  Department  in  trying  to  pur-
sue  it,  Matt’s  comments  about  it,  I  mean,  we  all—we  would  agree
with  many  of  these.  We  represent  44,000  physicists,  and  you  can
probably not get two of them to have the same opinion on anything.
But where they divide on the business of plutonium is simple. They
believe  that  if  this  plutonium  appears  in  the  economy,  one  group
believes  that  it  is  so  unattractive  that  it  will  never  be  made  into
a  weapon.  The  other  group  believes  that  it  is  explosive.  From  a
physics  point  of  view,  interestingly  enough,  they  are  both  abso-
lutely  right.  You  could  make  it  into  an  explosive.  On  the  other
hand, no country sophisticated enough to do that, in my judgment,
would ever choose to use that material for a weapons program. But
we  face  the  important  decision,  and  you  face  the  decision,  that  we
can  make  all  of  the  technical  decisions  about  waste  and  reprocess-
ing,  and  there  will  be  good  decisions.  The  Department  of  Energy
will  do  good  research,  and  laboratories  like  Argonne  will  provide
good technologies. But if you wish to avoid another West Valley, if
you  wish  to  have  a  robust  leadership  of  nuclear  energy  that  will
last for 30 or 40 years, the issue of proliferation has got to be cen-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

109

tral  in  the  decision  about  whether  to  go  forward.  And  these  tech-
nologies not only have to be robust, there has to be a consensus in
this  country  that  they  are,  because  what  we  do,  the  rest  of  the
world will take as leadership. Thank you.

Dr. FINCK. Yes, I want to make five comments. And the first one
is one of the most important one. And Madame Chairwoman made
the  right  comment  that  we  need  to  have  a  systems  look  at  this
issue.  If  when  you  look  at  the  trees,  we  will  forget  to  look  at  the
forest.  And  the  ‘‘forest’’  here  is  our  future.  The  future  where  we
need to have energy sources. We need to have a total look and inte-
grate  a  nuclear  energy  system  that  needs  to  deal  with  its  waste,
needs to deal with its resources.

And  my  second  comment  is  about—is  to  Mr.  Bunn  about  the
UREX+  technology.  The  UREX+  can  actually  lure  you  to  do  a  co-
separation of all of the transuranics. When we talk about prolifera-
tion  resistance,  we  should  actually  not  concentrate  on  what  the
separation technology is, but on where the recycle technology is for
the  following  reasons.  Thermal  reactors  for  physics  reasons  need
relatively  pure  products.  You  can  not  recycle  fission  products  in
thermal  reactors,  for  example.  Therefore,  it  is  difficult  to  put  dirty
products,  or  proliferation-resistant  products,  back  in  a  thermal  re-
actor.  The  first  reactor—pure  physics  reasons  that  we  cannot
change—can  take  much  dirtier  product.  So  the  issue  of  prolifera-
tion  resistance  should  be  put  on  the  level  of  what  reactors  you
want  to  use,  what  spectrum  we  are  going  to  use.  I  mean,  it  is  a
real physics question.

My  third  comment  is  on  safeguards,  and  I  absolutely  agree  with
what  Dr.  Hagengruber  has  been  saying.  We  are  at  a  stage  where
we today can make major impacts on what we are doing with new
technologies  having  developed  new  computing  technologies,  new
modeling  capabilities,  and  we  can  really  change  the  future  dras-
tically  there  to  avoid  any  risk  of  diversion  of  misuse  of  any  plant.
Comment  number  four  on  economics.  Again,  we  should  not  look
at  a  tree.  We  need  to  look  at  the  forest.  We  need  to  do  a  full  life
cycle analysis for the economics of the nuclear system. The disposal
part  of  the  disposal  component  of  the  nuclear  fuel  cycle  is  only  a
few percent, changing the cost of a few percent by even 50 percent
might not be that important in view of the benefits we can get out
of that change.

Lastly,  a  comment  on  research  and  development.  I  think  this
country in the last four or five years, I have been here about eight
years, and we have made major progress in nuclear R&D. We have
basically  come  from  a  place  where  there  was  not  much  going  to  a
place  where  we  can  be  the  leaders  of  the  world.  But  the  objective
here  is  not  to  be  a  leader  of  the  world  in  R&D.  The  objective,  to
me, is very different. We are going to need nuclear power, because
we  are  going  to  need  clean  energy.  Global  warming  is  probably  a
very  major  concern.  Energy  security  is  a  concern.  We  are  going  to
need  to  build  these  reactors.  What  I  would  like,  personally,  is  to
build  them  with  U.S.  technology  in  U.S.  plants  by  creating  high-
tech  U.S.  jobs.  It  is  important  that  we  do  this  R&D  so  that  the
plants  are  fabricated  here  and  we  don’t  import  them  from  else-
where.

Thank you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

110

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you. Thank you very much.
And I will recognize myself for five minutes.
Dr.  Finck’s  testimony  points  out  that  the  technology  decisions
link to reactor design and fuel cell choices. How is the Department
coordinating  a  decision  on  reprocessing  with  the  decisions  for  a
next  generation  nuclear  plant  design,  transmutation,  technology,
and  overall  fuel  cycle  choices?  Are  you  working  with  industry  on
these choices?

Mr.  JOHNSON.  Thank  you.  With  respect  to  the  future  and  the
linkage between our advanced reactor technology development pro-
gram and our advanced fuel cycle program, those two programs are
actually  very  much  intertwined  where  we  have  laboratory  per-
sonnel  across  the  complex  working  cooperatively  across  laboratory
boundaries  with  one  another,  such  as  Argonne,  Idaho,  Los  Alamos
working  together.  The  decisions  that  we  are  making  with  respect
to the Generation IV reactor technologies, those decisions are being
made  in  the  context  of  the  fuel  technologies  and  recycle  tech-
nologies  that  are  being  investigated  or  are  under  investigation
within  the  advanced  fuel  cycle  program.  So  it  is  very  much  a  very
well integrated activity. We are working in the Generation IV pro-
gram  on  an  international  basis  so  that  it  also  brings  in  our  inter-
national  laboratory  partners  in  France,  Japan,  and  others.  So  the
decisions—it is, at this point, very early in the Generation IV reac-
tor development, actually the fuels program, I believe rightly so, is
leading  the  reactor  development,  trying  to  look  at  what  type  of  re-
actor  fuels  are  best  for  getting  to  the  key  issues  of  minimization
of  waste  generation,  maximizing  the  transmutation  of  the  various
waste  products  within  an  existing  fuel  cycle  for  a  Generation  IV
program.  We  have  much  work  left  to  do,  don’t  get  me  wrong,  but
the—with  respect  to  the  execution  of  the  Department’s  advanced
reactor  and  fuel  cycle  program,  it  is  highly  integrated  from  top  to
bottom,  both  in  the  federal  staff,  laboratory  staff.  You  asked  with
respect  to  the  industry  participation,  we  probably  do  not  have  as
much  industry  participation  as  we  could.  The  commercial  industry
today is focused on the near-term deployment, looking through our
Nuclear  Power  2010  program  getting  plants  built  in  the  next,  you
know,  five-  to  10-year  time  frame  whereas  the  work  we  are  doing
in our advanced fuel cycle engine programs are longer-term looking
20 to 30 years out.

Thank you.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. One of the big differences, it seemed like,
in particularly, France where the—it is a government subsidy, real-
ly,  to  operate  these  plants,  which  is  a  big  difference  than  we  have
in the United States.

Mr. JOHNSON. Yes, ma’am.
Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Then  Dr.  Finck,  how  long  would  it  take
Argonne or another DOE lab to develop a detailed engineering sys-
tem of the fuel cycle, including the economics, the waste, prolifera-
tion-resistant,  and  general  safety  and  security  characteristics?  I
mean, is anyone working on such a model now?

Dr. FINCK. Yes. We are actually working in collaboration with all
of other labs, including Idaho, Los Alamos, Oak Ridge, I think, yes,
on  the  systems  analysis.  And  I  think  we  have  been  doing  this  for,
now,  three  years  in  an  integrated  manner.  We  have  made  a  lot  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

111

progress  where  I  would  say  by  2007,  which  is  a  deadline  that
comes  up  often,  and  even  maybe  before,  we  already  have  many  of
the  technical  answers.  I  think  we  are  in  the  stage  of  integrating
them  and  we  look  at  the  systems.  And  so  2007  seems  to  me  with
a focused effort to be absolutely reachable.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Well,  I  seem  to  recall,  since  I  have  been
on this committee and since I have been in Congress, that you have
been working on EMT and pyroprocessing and things that it seems
like  it  is  not  something  new  that  has  just  come  up  this  year  that
we are planning on doing.

Dr.  FINCK.  Yes,  indeed.  Many  of  the  technologies  we  have  put
through  these  systems  are  relatively  mature  and  the  technical  an-
swers are well understood.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Yeah,  and  it  is  true  that  France  is  really
operating  on  a  system  that  really  was  developed  years  and  years
ago. Is it 30 years or so that——

Dr.  FINCK.  Well,  I  think  the  PUREX  technology  was  first  pub-
lished  integrally  in  1957.  I  mean,  this  is  a  well-known  technology,
which  is  quite  accessible.  I  think  the  book  was  published  in  1957,
if  I  recall.  So  they  are  using  many  of  the  technologies—actually
U.S. technologies that we exploited——

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  That  is  what  they  told  us  that  they  have

gotten them from——

Dr.  FINCK.  These  are  extremely  well  known,  and  then  they  im-
proved  them  after—of  course,  after  they  acquired  them.  For  exam-
ple,  one  of  the  big  improvements  is  to  reduce  the  volume  of  waste
by  a  factor  of  about  four  in  the  last  10  or  15  years.  So  there  have
been major incremental changes, but the basis is roughly the same.
Yes.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  And  then  are  the  safeguards  in  moni-
toring  research  and  development  part  of  Argonne’s  research  pro-
gram?

Dr. FINCK. We do very little bit of it. I think the places that have
real  expertise  would  be  places  like  Los  Alamos.  But  I  think  what
is  important  is  to  integrate  the  research  we  do  on  separations  and
reactors  with  the  research  done  in  other  labs.  If  we  run  these  re-
search  programs  in  parallel,  we  have  had  good  discussion  with—
certainly with integration. I think here is key.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much.
My time has expired.
And  I  will  recognize  Mr.  Matheson  from  Utah  for  five  minutes.
Mr. MATHESON. Thank you, Madame Chairwoman.
Mr.  Johnson,  in  your  testimony  on  page  four,  you  state  that  a
commercial  scale-up  of  spent  fuel  technologies  could  be  accom-
plished  relatively  rapidly  if  existing  domestic  facilities  could  be
modified  and  used.  What—which  facilities  were  you  talking  about
in terms of where are they and who owns those facilities?

Mr. JOHNSON. I apologize. I am not able to recall the exact three
locations.  I  would  be  more  than  happy  to  answer  that  question  in
writing,  but  off  the  top  of  my  head,  I  don’t  want  to  give  you  the
wrong answer.

Mr. MATHESON. No, that is okay. All right.
How—when  you  look  at  how  DOE  is  looking  at  selecting  a  re-
processing  technology,  you  know,  this  is  coming  back  on  Mr.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

112

Honda’s  line  of  questioning  a  little  bit  in  terms  of  as  we  move  for-
ward, the direction you have been given now, do we need to change
the policy direction we have given you as Congress in terms of how
you  are  going  about  your  research  and  development  in  terms  of
looking at developing new technologies? What do you think? Do you
need  more  flexibility?  Do  you  need  more  direction?  Or  are  you
happy with the current circumstance?

Mr.  JOHNSON.  I  believe  we  are  very  happy  with  the  current  pol-
icy  and  direction  that  we  have.  We  have  tried  to  lay  out  a  rea-
soned,  logical  process  for  stepping  through  various  laboratory  in-
vestigations  in  stepping,  again,  through  looking  at  what  tech-
nologies, whether it is a UREX+ type process, whether it is a crys-
tallization  process,  a  volatilization  process.  So  there  are—we  do
have  several  processes  that  have  been—being  investigated  at  the
laboratory scale. Again, it just takes some time to take and develop
these  technologies,  refine  them  in  the  laboratory,  and  then  make
decisions based on the technical data that has generated in moving
and making a selection to move up a technology into a larger scale
experiment.  So  what—one  thing  we  are  trying  to  do  is  to  walk
through the investigation of the issues and the potential treatment
technologies  and  then  make  a  sound  technical  decision  of  how  we
take  those  from  the  smallest  investigation  in  the  laboratory  scale
and scale-up the technologies to whether it is the next step up, an
engineering  scale,  and  that  what  would  ultimately  be  used  as  the
basis for a decision to move forward for a commercial-scale applica-
tion.  I  mean,  for  example,  we  are  currently  looking  at  spent  fuel
on  the  order  of  kilograms  of  spent  fuel  material  in  the  laboratory
that  if  you  did  it  for  a  year,  it  would  be—but  what  we  are  talking
about in a commercial scale would be, you know, thousands of met-
ric tons. So we are—very small-scale work going on right now.

Mr. MATHESON. In your testimony, you also said the development
of  advanced  fuel  treatment  technologies  would  improve  repository
capacity. Do you have an estimate of how much repository capacity
would be increased under the different reprocessing options you are
looking at right now?

Mr.  JOHNSON.  An  exact  number,  no.  The—for  example,  uranium
constitutes about 90 percent—96 percent of the mass in commercial
spent fuel. So the—a process such as a UREX+ process that would
take  out  the  uranium  would  see  a  resulting  reduction  in  the  mass
of  heavy  metal  needing  to  go  into  a  repository  by  an  equivalent
amount.  But  we  are  talking—but  the  issue  in  the  repository  isn’t
just volume. It is a heat generation. It is——

Mr. MATHESON. Right.
Mr.  JOHNSON.  There  are  other  constituents  in  the  spent  fuel,
both  in  near-term,  such  as  strontium,  which  is  really  a  near-term
heat  issue,  and  then  the  longer-term  heat  issue  associated  with
americium.  So  it  is  really  the—it  is  a  complex  problem,  multi-fac-
eted.  It  is  both  a  volume  issue  as  well  as  a  heat-generation  issue.
And the heat-generation issue, I believe, as Dr. Finck said, if really
addressed,  by  taking  it  from  the  next  step  of  the  reprocessing  and
then the destruction of these higher actinides in a fast reactor sys-
tem.

Mr. MATHESON. Thanks.
I yield back, Madame Chairman.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

113

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
Now  we  will  hear  from  our  resident—one  of  our  resident  physi-

cists, Mr. Bartlett, for five minutes.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  I  am  a  physiologist  rather  than  a  physicist.  The

physicist is sitting to my right.

I get very different estimates as to the world’s supply of economi-
cally recoverable fuel for light wire reactors. Could each of you tell
me,  in  terms  of  years  at  present  use  rates,  what  you  understand
that supply to be? It is not infinite.

Mr.  JOHNSON.  No,  sir,  it  is  not  infinite,  as  all  our  resources  are
not  necessarily  infinite.  There  have  been  some  studies  that  have
been produced, both within the Department and outside of the De-
partment,  and  as  you  can  imagine,  they  come  up  with  different
numbers.  Those  numbers  have  gone—range  anywhere  from—there
is, you know, a 50- to 100-year supply of uranium around the globe
to  the  fact  that,  you  know,  there  is  a  1,000-year  supply.  So  there
really  is  no  firm,  strong  agreement  with  respect  to  the  energy  re-
sources  available  in  the  uranium  ore  around  the  globe,  but  the
range—again,  the  range  is  anywhere  from,  you  know,  50  to  100
years to 1,000 years.

Mr. BARTLETT. Mr. Bunn.
Mr. BUNN. Yes, this—we have—in the Harvard study that I men-
tioned,  there  is  an  extensive  appendix  on  this  subject.  The  range
of  estimates  comes  from,  I  think,  in  part,  differences  of  under-
standing  of  the  terms  by  which  the  estimates  are  described.  Very
often,  people  refer  to  reserves,  which  is  a  term  really  used  to  de-
scribe,  basically,  uranium  that  you  have  actually  struck  a  pick  to,
as  though  that  were  all  of  the  uranium  in  the  world,  as  opposed
to  resources,  which  is  the  amount  of  uranium  that  might  be  avail-
able  in  the  future  as  technology  develops  and  more  uranium  is
found and so on. The reality is, because of, until very recently, very
low  prices  for  decades  for  uranium,  there  has  been  very  little
searching  for  uranium,  particularly  at  higher  prices  than  existed
for  the  last  couple  of  decades.  And  as  a  result,  it  seems  certain  to
those  who  have  looked  at  it  in  detail,  I  think,  that  there  is  a  lot
more uranium out there than is currently reported as reserves.

Mr. BARTLETT. What is currently reported as reserves?
Mr. BUNN. Currently, the—let us see. The red book, which is the
IAE document, suggests that there is something of the order of sev-
eral  million  tons  that  are—there  is  basically  17.1  million  tons  of
uranium  available  at  prices  in  the  range  of  $40  to  $80  a  kilogram
of uranium, which is——

Mr. BARTLETT. Which is how many years’ supply?
Mr.  BUNN.  Let  us  see.  That  would  be  a  couple  of  century’s

worth——

Mr. BARTLETT. Okay.
Mr. BUNN.—at current rates, but, of course, if you expect nuclear
energy  to  grow  in  the  future,  which  I  think  many  people  in  this
room hope that it will, then, of course, you know, that—the amount
of  material  used  every  year  would  grow.  But  the—that  is  what  is
sort  of  reported  so  far.  And  the  reality  is,  as  I  said,  there  is  a  lot
more  out  there.  And  particularly  as  you  develop  improved  mining
technology  in  the  future,  the  record  on,  essentially,  every  mineral
that is mined, if you look, over the past century or so, the price in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

114

real  terms  of  extraction,  rather  than  increasing  as  the  good  stuff
gets  mined  out,  has  been  decreasing  because  the  technology  has
been  developing  faster  than  the  good  stuff  gets  mined  out.  And  I
would expect that to occur for uranium in the future as well.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  Let  me  ask  you  each  very  quickly  to  tell  me  how
your testimony might have been different if you knew oil was going
to be $100 a barrel next year.

Mr.  JOHNSON.  I  can  guarantee  you  my  testimony  would  not

Mr.  BUNN.  I  can  guarantee  you  exactly  the  same,  because  as  I
say, I believe in the future of nuclear energy, and I believe the fu-
ture  of  nuclear  energy  is  best  assured  by  not  making  a  near-term
decision to reprocess.

Dr.  HAGENGRUBER.  And  my  testimony  would  have  been

unaltered as well.

change.

Dr.  FINCK.  My  testimony  would  even  be  more  optimistic.  We
need  more  nuclear  power,  certainly.  But  we  also  need  ways  to  use
nuclear power to fuel our cars. We don’t have these ways today.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  Well,  I  hope  there  is  a  lot  of  additional  uranium
remaining  in  the  world,  because  I  suspect,  as  we  run  down  Hub-
bard’s Peak, we are going to need it.

Thank you very much, Madame Chairman.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
The gentleman from South Carolina, Mr. Inglis, is recognized for

five minutes.

Mr. INGLIS. Thank you, Madame Chairman.
In South Carolina, you know, we have some sites that have done
some work on reprocessing spent fuel from weapons used at Savan-
nah  River  Site,  and  also  some  at  Barnwell,  South  Carolina.  If  we
went  to  a  reprocessing  approach,  how  attractive  would  those  sites
be as places to do that work? Mr. Johnson, particularly you. Could
you comment on that?

Mr. JOHNSON. Yes, sir. Thank you.
The  sites  that  you  noted  would  be,  I  would  expect,  part  of  the
evaluation  that  the  Department  would  conduct  as  part  of  any  na-
tional  environmental  policy  act  review  that  we  would  be  required
to  undertake  before  moving  forward  with  any  kind  of  large  scale
demonstration.  So  I  would  say  pretty  confidently  that  those  sites
would  be  among  the  list  of  sites  that  would  be  evaluated  for  such
a future use.

Mr.  INGLIS.  Let  us  see—other  countries,  and  I  have  been  at  a
markup, so I am not sure whether this has already been addressed,
but  other  countries,  Japan,  France,  England,  Germany  have  all
pursued  reprocessing.  And  Mr.  Johnson,  do  you  have  any  com-
ments  about  the  success  of  their  programs  and  what  we  can  learn
from those?

Mr. JOHNSON. Yes. I believe that in those countries where reproc-
essing  technologies  have  been  used  in  support  of  their  domestic
commercial nuclear power plant operation, they have been success-
ful, with success being defined as the ability to safely and securely
separate  spent  fuel  into  its  constituent  parts,  refabricate  fuel  for
use  for  power  production.  And  in  that  case,  I  would  say  yes,  the
programs  have  been  very  successful.  And  there  is  no  reason  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

115

think that the same type of success could not be seen elsewhere as
well.

Mr. INGLIS. Mr. Bunn, do you agree with that or——
Mr. BUNN. I don’t. If you define it in purely technical terms, they
eventually  manage  to  become  successful,  although  in  both  France
and  Britain  and  particularly  in  Japan  now  they  had  tremendous
difficulties  with  cost  and  startup  problems  and  so  on  at  these  re-
processing plants. But if you look at the official government studies
in both France and Japan, they conclude that their nuclear energy
is  noticeably  more  expensive—because  they  have  pursued  reproc-
essing—than  it  would  have  been  had  they  not  done  so.  And  that
is  not  me  saying  that.  That  is  the  official  government  studies  in
both  of  those  countries  saying  that.  And  so  it  is  hard  for  me  to
characterize  that  as  a  success  when  an  alternative  technology  of
dry  cask  storage  would  have  provided  nuclear  energy  with  a  way
to  manage  its  fuel  more  cheaply,  more  safely,  and  more  securely.

Mr. INGLIS. Dr. Finck, do you agree or disagree with that?
Dr.  FINCK.  Well,  I  absolutely  disagree,  if  I  may.  And  I  used  to
be  French  years  ago,  and  I  would  characterize—it  is  not  the  case
anymore, but I still have a little bit of pride left.

First  of  all,  I  think  the  French  program,  in  my  mind,  has  been
incredibly  successful.  They  did  meet  their  objective.  They  know
how to deal with their waste. And it is true their reports say there
were  small  costs  associated  with  closing—that  cost  is  very  small.
And  in  view  of  the  benefit  they  are  getting  out  of  it,  they  have  ac-
cepted that small cost. I mean, nothing is free in life. Where I live,
we recycle our household things, and I pay a cost to the city to re-
cycle,  so  I  think  it  is  well  worth  it  in  view  of  the  benefits  of  not
having  to  bury  it  in  my  own  backyard.  So  I—you  know,  as  a  soci-
ety,  we  have  to  take  into  account  not  only  the  small  cost  increase
but  the  whole  benefits.  I  think  the  French  programs,  I  view  those
as having been extremely successful. And the demonstration of suc-
cess  is  that  they  have  not  decided  to  stop.  If  it  weren’t  worth  it,
they  would  not  go  on.  They  are  doing  it.  And  they  will  continue,
I believe.

Mr.  INGLIS.  Germany,  however,  has  suspended  their  program,

Dr.  FINCK.  Germany  has  suspended.  Basically,  they  are  going
to—they want to suspend their whole nuclear program. They want
to  shut  down  all  of  their  nuclear  plants;  therefore  they  don’t  want
to  do  anything,  no  nuclear  energy,  no  reprocessing,  et  cetera.  This
is a——

Mr.  BUNN.  But  they  decided  to  stop  reprocessing  before  they  de-

right?

cided to shut down——

Dr. FINCK. Yes, let me finish. This is a political decision. My only
question  will  be  in  2015  and  2020,  where  will  they  get  their  elec-
tricity?  They  might  have  a  real  problem.  They  might  import  it
across the French boundary using reactors and using reprocessing.
They just happen to be down on the other side of the Rhine River,
which two—the bottom line would be the same effect.

Mr. INGLIS. My time has expired.
Thank you, Madame Chairman.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
The gentleman from Indiana, Mr. Sodrel.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

116

Mr. SODREL. I don’t have any questions at this time. Thank you.
We  don’t  have  any  nuclear  power  plants  in  Indiana.  We  do  have
a lot of coal.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  The  gentleman  from  Michigan,  Mr.

Schwarz.

tion.

Mr. SCHWARZ. I want to make sure that I am getting this correct,
and  Mr.  Bunn,  I  guess  you  would  be  the  one  that  I  would  like  to
have answer this, so anyone else jump in, if you feel like it.

You feel that the—we should not proceed to build any sort of re-
processing facility in this country now, that we should continue the
open  fuel  cycle,  storing  the  waste  product,  and  that  when  we  do,
hopefully soon, start building new nuclear power plants, that is the
technology that would be—that should be used, and if we go to the
reprocessing and recycling, that would put off, significantly into the
future,  any  expansion  of  the  number  of  nuclear  power  plants  we
have in the United States. Do I have that right?

Mr.  BUNN.  Except  for  the  last  bit.  I  think  my  argument  is  not
that  it  would  inevitably  put  off  construction  of  new  power  plants,
but  that  it  would  make—because  of  the  increased  complexity  of
cost, safety issues, and so on, it would make public acceptance and
utility acceptance of new power plants somewhat more problematic
to achieve.

Mr.  SCHWARZ.  You  led  right  into  my  next  observation  and  ques-

What  is  the  position  of  the  investor-owned  regulated  utilities  in
this  country  who  potentially  would  build  these  new  plants?  What
is their position on the issue of the open fuel cycle versus using re-
processed and recycled fuel?

Mr. BUNN. You would not be able to find a utility in the country
who—that  is  willing  to  pay  the  cost  of  reprocessing  its  spent  nu-
clear fuel or who would be interested in investing in a reprocessing
plant today.

Mr.  SCHWARZ.  So  for  anyone  on  the  panel,  then,  if  we  are  going
to—if there is a need to build new nuclear power plants, and I be-
lieve  there  is,  the  sooner  the  better,  in  my  opinion,  why  would  we
be  considering  building  any  sort  of  a  reprocessing  recycling  facili-
ties or be pushing that technology now when it is not a technology
we are going to use?

Dr. HAGENGRUBER. Let me just venture a comment here.
I—the industry—I can’t speak for the industry, and I don’t think
any  of  us  here  can  speak  for  the  industry  itself.  But  what  I  have
heard from the industry would lead me to believe that the number
one  priority  that  they  have,  as  far  as  nuclear  energy  is  concerned,
is to get a new reactor licensed and get something under construc-
tion in this country, a plan for one or several reactors. I think part
of the industry that builds reactors would like to also sell a reactor
to China and have some influence on that process.

I think the number two thing is they would like to get something
done on the waste, that they don’t want to watch another licensing
period  go  on  without  some  hope.  So  whether  it  is  interim  storage
of waste or dry cask storage at an interim site or Yucca Mountain,
and  there,  one  of  the  issues  they  would  like  to  see  is  something,
you  know,  that  would  lead  them  to  believe  that  this  100,000-year
standard,  which  is,  you  know,  the—gotten  into  the  way  of  Yucca

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

117

Mountain,  somehow  that  will  be  dealt  with.  I  think  in  the  case  of
the reprocessing, it is so far off in the future that from an economic
horizon point of view, as businesses, they have to look at the issues
of  the  reliability  of  the  Federal  Government  to  have  a  regulatory
environment that allows them to predict cost so that they can tran-
sition  over  interest  rates.  And  I  think  the  last  thing  is  not  reproc-
essed  fuel.  I  mean,  I  think  technically  they  are  interested  in  all  of
these  questions,  but  I  think  it  is  really  beyond  the  scope  of  them
as  a  business,  but  we  are,  in  fact,  going  to  use  some  fuel  from  the
nuclear  weapons  program,  and  I  think  they  would  like  to  actually
see  that  successfully  done  and  like  to  see  a  process  that  would  ac-
tually  burn  these  fuels,  because  before  you  start  believing  that
these  are  going  to  have  a  major  influence  on  the  business  you  are
in,  you  would  like  to  really  believe  that  there  will  be  a  business
that  will  be  predictable  from  a  cost  point  of  view.  And  so  when  I
talk with the industry people, they are always very courteous about
Generation IV and reprocessing. But it is really not on the horizon
of the time that they are going to be in charge of the business.

Mr. SCHWARZ. Thank you, sir.
I yield back, Madame Chairman.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
I  might  note  that  we  will  be  having  a  hearing  later  on  focusing

on the utilities and having them here.

And  also,  the  utilities  do  pay  a  fee  to  the  Nuclear  Trust  Fund,
and  that  is  what  provides  for  the  waste,  and  that  is  why  the  Fed-
eral Government takes over at that point.

I would like to recognize the gentlelady from Texas, Ms. Jackson

Lee, for five minutes.

and to the Ranking Member.

Ms.  JACKSON LEE.  Thank  you  very  much,  Madame  Chairperson,

I can’t imagine, even in the calmness and quietness of this room,
that there could not be a more important hearing to talk about re-
configuring  how  we  deal  with  nuclear  waste,  particularly  when  we
mention  a  favorite  President  of  mine,  Jimmy  Carter,  but  that  you
can  describe  his  legacy  as  decades  ago.  And  certainly,  nuclear
waste  is  not  something  that  should  be  described  in  the  concept  of
decades ago.

And  so  I  would—I  just  would  like  to  focus  on  the  vitality  of  the
question  of  reprocessing  spent  fuel.  When  I  say  the  vitality,  the
good  things  that  can  happen  by  doing  that.  And  then  I  would  like
to also—and I would like each of the witnesses to comment on that,
since our friends in Japan and France have seemingly already done
that.  Those  of  us  in  Texas  are  still  mourning  the  loss  of  a  super-
conductivity  lab,  which  is  a  parallel,  not  necessarily  in  sync  with
this, but new technology.

At the same time, I would like to wear the hat of the many con-
cerned  persons  about  the  danger  of  nuclear  waste,  and  of  course,
as  was  noted  in  some  of  the  information,  the  concern  about
PUREX,  but  also  the  concern  about  the  potential  of  weapons.  And
some  of  my  colleagues  may  have  asked  this  question.  I  was  inter-
estingly just in a meeting on homeland security, and so I apologize
for  not  hearing  the  totality  of  your  testimony.  But  I  would  like  to
hear  a  balanced  response  of  the  answer  back  on  the  potential
threat of the creation of terrorist weapons, but the vitality of doing

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

118

this processing of finding a creative way to advise the Administra-
tion, meaning Congress to advise the Administration, or set policies
and standards on how we do this.

Let  me  also  say  that  this  question  is  in  the  backdrop  of  a  great
deal  of  concern  and  opposition  that  comes  from  both  sides  of  the
aisle with any traveling of nuclear waste, and certainly the concern
that  Nevadians  have  expressed,  or  persons  from  Nevada,  in  their
utilization right now as to the storage place of nuclear waste.

So  my  first  question,  the  vitality  of  reprocessing  this  nuclear
waste, the way that we can answer the question regarding the abil-
ity  of  terrorists  accumulating  or  using  this  for  weapons,  and  then
guidance  that  might  be  helpful  now  decades  later  in  a  policy  that
would  be  effective  in  providing  a  way  to  transport  and  also  to,  if
you will, handle nuclear waste.

I could start with Mr. Johnson.
Mr. JOHNSON. Thank you.
Before  I  start,  let  me  just  reiterate  that  the  Administration
stands  firmly  behind  Yucca  Mountain  and  the  need  to  proceed  as
expeditiously  as  possible  with  the  completion  and  the  opening  of
that  facility,  and  that  the  talk  that  we  are—the  work  that  we  are
engaged  in  at  the  Department  and  the  investigation  of  recycle  re-
processing technologies is looked at as complementary to that activ-
ity.

Ms. JACKSON LEE. And may I just, for a moment, so I can make
the  record,  there  are  many  of  us  that  don’t  stand  behind  that,  but
we  are  certainly  interested  in  the  complementary  part  being  more
than  a  complementary  part  and  maybe  being  a  fixed  part.  But  let
me  hear  your  answer  to  the  complementary  part.  Some  of  us  are
in disagreement with the Administration’s position on Yucca Moun-
tain. But you may proceed.
Mr. JOHNSON. Thank you.
Yes,  well,  we  are  very  much  committed  to  continuing  to  inves-
tigate  the  possibilities  that  exist  in  treating  spent  fuel,  not  nec-
essarily  as  a  pure  waste,  but  looking  at  what  kind  of  energy  con-
tent—the  energy  content  that  it  has,  how  can  we  recapture  that,
how  can  we  minimize  the  waste  burden  on  future  generations
through  the  need—or  through  the  positive  impacts  in  geologic  dis-
posal.

With  respect  to  the  commercial  viability  of  the  technologies,  we
are  not  there  yet.  We  are  continuing  to  work  within  the  labora-
tories. Things look very promising at the laboratory, on the labora-
tory scale. There are technologies, as you know, being deployed and
being in use worldwide. We think we can improve upon those, that
the investigations we have going on within the Department are, we
believe,  vastly  improved  technologies  over  what  are  being  used
commercially worldwide.

With  respect  to  the—your  question  on  security,  as  you  know,
spent  nuclear  fuel  is  being  stored  at,  roughly,  60  nuclear  sites
around the country. So there is a need to look at the issue of where
does the spent nuclear fuel reside, for how long does it reside, and
can  there  be  some  increased  safety  assurances  by  consolidation  to
less than the number of sites that are currently being used.

Ms.  JACKSON LEE.  Yes.  Can  I  get  questions—answers  from  the

panelists? Thank you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

119

Mr. BUNN. I would argue that the reprocessing industry today is
not  a  very  vital  one,  to  use  your  words.  British  Nuclear  Fuels,
which  operates  one  of  the  world’s  largest  commercial  reprocessing
plants, has announced that they are going to be out of the business
in  less  than  a  decade,  because  they  simply  don’t  have  customers
anymore. France is running out of foreign customers, will continue
its  domestic  reprocessing,  but  will  end  up  using  significantly  less
than  the  total  reprocessing  capacity  that  it  has.  Japan  is  about  to
open its new reprocessing plant after a prolonged struggle in which
the  utilities  sort  of  tried  without  saying  so  publicly  to  get  out  of
having to pay for it and have now—are now talking to the govern-
ment about imposing a huge lines charge on all users of electricity
in order to pay the immense costs of reprocessing. No other country
is seriously thinking about getting into the business. I should men-
tion that Russia is struggling to keep its last commercial reprocess-
ing  plant  open,  because  it  has  so  little  business,  and  the  costs  are
so high.

So  this  is,  in  a  sense,  a  dying  industry  that  we  are  thinking  of

joining here.

With  respect  to  the  terrorist  risks,  as  I  mentioned  in  my  testi-
mony,  there  has  not  yet  been  a  good,  credible  study,  a  life  cycle
comparison  of  the  terrorist  risks  of  the  once-through  fuel  cycle
versus reprocessing and recycling. But if you just look at the situa-
tion, it is—the National Academy of Sciences, and others, have con-
cluded  that  the  risk  of  terrorist  attack  on  a  thick  dry  cask  is  very
modest. The risk of a terrorist attack on fuel in a pool is somewhat
more, particularly if the fuel is fresh enough that there is potential
for  a  fire  if  the  water  is  drained.  But  when  you  are  processing
the—you  know,  in  this  kind  of  intensely  radioactive  material,  in
huge  facilities  with  volatile  chemicals,  often  at  high  temperatures,
there  are  more  potentials  for  accident  or  for  dispersing  that  radio-
active  material  than  there  are  if  it  is  just  sitting  in  a  thick  steel
or  concrete  cask.  And  similarly,  then  you  are  going  to  be—for  the
transportation part, you are going to be shipping some pretty radio-
active stuff from place to place in order to send it to the transmuta-
tion reactors, and that will require significant investments in secu-
rity.

More  broadly,  with  respect  to  actual  nuclear  weapons  terrorism,
I  hope  that  we  will  not  proceed  with  any  technology  that  won’t  be
reasonably resistant against theft of nuclear material for that pur-
pose,  although  I  have  some  doubts  about  some  of  the  technologies
we are looking at now. But the traditional approach to reprocessing
involves  a  huge  number  of  shipments  of  directly  weapons-usable
plutonium  from  place  to  place  every  year.  And  those—you  know,
the part of the nuclear materials life cycle, when it is most vulner-
able to sort of overt, forcible theft, is when it is being shipped from
place to place.

As  I  mentioned  in  my  testimony,  there  is  a  problem  worldwide
with  security  and  accounting  for  nuclear  stockpiles,  both  nuclear
warheads  and  nuclear  material  that  could  be  used  to  make  a  nu-
clear  bomb.  Regardless  of  what  we  do  about  reprocessing,  our  gov-
ernment  needs  to  step  up  its  efforts  very  substantially  to  make
sure that every kilogram of plutonium, every kilogram of highly-en-
riched  uranium,  every  nuclear  warhead  worldwide,  wherever  it

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

120

may be, is secure and accounted for, because our homeland security
starts  there.  It  starts  wherever  there  is  a  vulnerable  cache  of  nu-
clear  material  anywhere  in  the  world  that  terrorists  might  use  for
a nuclear attack.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  The  gentlelady’s  time  has  expired.  If  the

next two witnesses could give very short answers, please.

Ms. JACKSON LEE. I thank the Chairwoman.
Dr. HAGENGRUBER. I will only address one part of it. I spent my
whole career on issues relating to security, nuclear security. I have
done  many  security  studies,  including  9/11  studies  for  the  Depart-
ment  of  Energy,  their  facilities.  So  let  me  address  this  in  par-
ticular.

The worst places in the fuel cycle are the reactor, as the National
Academy Report on Terrorism said, would be something happening
at  the  reactor,  because  there  is  a  lot  of  energy  stored  there.  It  can
be dealt with.

The  other  place  is  when  fissile  material,  that  is  plutonium  or
highly-enriched  uranium,  which  is  weapon-like  materials,  appear.
Plutonium  is  particularly  bad,  because  when  you  scatter  it  about,
it  costs  an  enormous  amount  of  money  to  clean  it  up.  I  would  dis-
agree  with  my  colleague,  Matt  Bunn,  on  the  business  about  weap-
on-useable,  because  many  of  these  things,  unless  they  are  really
fuel  grade,  the  plutonium’s  biggest  risk  is  this  dispersal  risk.  It  is
not easy to make a weapon out of it. Even in fuel grade, weapons—
it  is  just  very  hard  to  make  that.  So  just—my  view  of  this  is  the
reprocessing opens a door up for plutonium to be available in trans-
port.

And  here  I  would  agree  with  them  that,  in  fact,  opens  this  risk
up.  And  so  it  needs  to  be  done  with  the  greatest  of  care  in  terms
of  looking  at—over  at  that  overall  system  or  there  will  be  another
panel like this meeting on that issue.

Thank you.
Dr. FINCK. I will try to answer very quickly.
As  far  as  terrorist  use,  I  think  there  are  many  options  today  for
increasing  proliferation  resistance.  We  have  heard  them.  The  bot-
tom  line,  to  me,  is  to  never  separate  pure  weapons-useable  mate-
rial,  and  we  can  do  that.  Therefore,  we  never  have  to  ship  it,  and
it won’t be very attractive to potential terrorists.

As far as vitality, Shane Johnson made a very good point. Yucca
Mountain is needed whatever we do. And what we are trying to do
is  making  better  use  of  the  one  Yucca  Mountain  we  might  have
soon.  So  we  raise  a  real  complementary  effort  between  repository
work and transmutation work.

Finally,  for  the  question  of  vitality  in  Europe  Mr.  Bunn  ad-
dressed, I think the issue is not deciding to go out of reprocessing.
Several  countries  have  decided  to  go  out  of  nuclear  in  Europe,
therefore, they are not doing reprocessing anymore. When the time
comes,  and  I  think  it  is  now,  where  energy  costs  are  going  up  and
the  gentleman  asked  the  question  of  the  cost  of  oil  at  $100,  when
that  time  comes,  nuclear,  I  believe,  will  be  reborn  in  Europe  and
many  other  countries,  and  the  fuel  cycle  will  have  to  follow,  be-
cause they will need as much as I know. They will try to avoid hav-
ing to build many repositories in the countries that are very dense.

Ms. JACKSON LEE. Thank you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

121

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
The gentleman from Alabama, Mr. Bonner, is recognized.
Mr. BONNER. Thank you, Madame Chair, and this is a very time-

ly conversation, I agree.

Mr.  Bunn,  you  say  in  your  testimony  that  there  is  little  doubt
that  Yucca  Mountain  could  hold  far  more  than  the  current  legisla-
tive  limit,  perhaps  even  all  of  the  waste  produced  over  the  life  of
the existing nuclear fleet. Why are you so confident of Yucca Moun-
tain’s ability to hold more waste? And would this require an expan-
sion  of  the  repository?  And  if  so,  would  you  be  willing  to  venture
a guess of what it costs?

Mr.  BUNN.  Well,  the  costs  of  the  repository  are  not—it  is  only  a
very  minor  portion  of  those  costs  that  are  related  to  digging  more
tunnels.  And  I  am  confident  in  part  because  my  colleagues,  Mr.
Johnson  and  Dr.  Finck,  have  both  published  reports  that  indicate
that  their  view  of  the  technical  limit  is  120,000  tons  of  heavy
metal,  as  opposed  to  70,000,  which  is  the  legislative  limit.  But  I—
the  reality  is  that  the  Department  hasn’t  really  looked  at  the  sub-
ject  in  the—of  how  you  could  go  about  expanding  that  capacity  in
any significant detail. For example, there are—you can go outward
in some directions until you get to the edges of the areas that have
sufficient  geologic  stability  to  deal  with  that  situation.  You  can
think about whether it is possible to have a second or a third tier,
because currently it is just one tier, a flat repository. I have talked
to  a  number  of  analysts  within  the  Yucca  Mountain  program  who
think it is quite plausible that you could do a second or a third tier.
So  there  are  a  variety  of  things  that,  as  I  said  in  my  testimony,
need to be looked at in more detail. The American Physical Society
Panel that Dr. Hagengruber chaired also talked about the potential
that it could hold all of the fuel from the existing nuclear fleet.

I should also mention, with respect to other countries, the United
States is, I believe, the only country that has made the mistake of
locating its repository in a mountain with fixed sides. In most other
countries, they are looking at giant blocks of granite that you could
put centuries of spent fuel into simply by extending the size of the
tunnel.  So  it  is,  in  most  countries,  not  an  issue  of  having  to  build,
you know, lots and lots and lots of Yucca Mountains all of the time.
I  should  also  mention,  in  respect  to  Dr.  Hagengruber’s  disagree-
ment  with  me,  it  is  not  just  my  view.  It  is  the  published  view  of
the  U.S.  Government  in  a  report  sited  in  my  prepared  testimony.
It is also—was gone through in some considerable detail in a report
of  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  that  included  the  former  Di-
rector  of  Lawrence  Livermore  Laboratory,  a  former  Chairman  of
the  Joint  Chiefs  of  Staff,  and  so  on,  among  its  panelists.  So  Roger
and I can talk about that more off-line after the hearing.

Mr. BONNER. If I could just ask the panel, anyone willing to take
a  stab  at  this,  hearing  the  questioning  from  the  gentlelady  from
Texas.  In  respect  that  there  are  many  people  who  have  different
views on Yucca Mountain, but as a Nation, we are in an energy cri-
sis,  and  we  are  depleting  fossil  fuels  faster  than  we  are  replen-
ishing them, and we are more and more dependent on foreign coun-
tries  for  energy.  That  would  have  to  be  a  problem  that  we  could
all agree to, and yet I sit back sometimes, when I hear my friends
who do not want to proceed with Yucca Mountain and yet want the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

122

benefits  of  nuclear  power,  and  wonder,  ‘‘What  are  the  other  alter-
natives out there if we don’t proceed, as Chairman Hobson said be-
fore  he  left,  with  the  plan  that  we  have  in  front  of  us?’’  Are  there
other  reasonable  plans  out  there  that  can  allow  us  to  continue
down the path of pursuing nuclear but being responsible with what
we do with its waste?
Mr. BUNN. To me?
Mr. BONNER. To any of the four of you.
Mr.  BUNN.  Ultimately,  we  are  going  to  need  a  nuclear  waste  re-
pository.  We  are  going  to  need  that  whether  we  go  direct  disposal
or  whether  we  pursue  reprocessing  and  transmutation.  That  is
clear.  There  isn’t—unfortunately  for  Ms.  Jackson  Lee,  there  isn’t
an  alternative  to  a  nuclear  waste  repository.  There—one  could  po-
tentially cancel the Yucca Mountain and try to find a different nu-
clear  waste  repository.  My  own  view  is  that  that  would—the  pros-
pects  of  political  success  in  licensing  a  different  nuclear  waste  re-
pository  somewhere  in  the  United  States  before  I  retire  are  prob-
ably pretty modest.

Mr. BONNER. Anyone else disagree?
Dr. FINCK. I would like to answer that.
With the technology we have discussed today, we have a path to-
wards  sustainability  on  energy  security  in  the  United  States  by—
we  will  need  the  repository,  certainly,  but  we  will  need  a  unique
repository  where  we  will  use  it  much  better  than  we  plan  to  use
it today. It will last us well beyond this century. So there are ways
to  make  nuclear  much  more  sustainable  than  what  we  are  doing
today.

Dr.  HAGENGRUBER.  I  would  like  to  just  offer  a  comment  on  that.
I—that  was  the  first  study  I  did  back  in  1972.  And  at  the  time,
we were classifying separated waste from reprocessing at Hanford.
We  were  also  doing  work  at  Savannah  River  Site.  And  there  was
waste  being  stored  in  tanks  in  Idaho.  It  was  very  obvious,  at  the
time, that engineered storage, which is storage that might be mon-
itored—retrievable storage that might be monitored for hundreds of
years  into  the  future  as  a  concept  with  something  that  was  not
hard  to  do,  that  trying  to  get  a  solution  that  would  meet  people’s
acceptable  standard  of  permanent  disposal  with  no  chance  of  any-
thing  ever  being  returned  to  the  environment  was  too  hard.  It  is
just  as  hard,  in  fact,  it  is  even  worse  now,  because  the  legal  bar-
riers to making any kind of progress are higher. The prospect—you
know, I don’t know how you will deal with the 100,000-year stand-
ard. It is too ice age for—and we don’t know of any technology that
is  going  to  survive  that.  So  practically  speaking,  I  think  a  perma-
nent  disposal  repository  for  nuclear  waste  is  something  that  prob-
ably  30  years  from  now,  somebody  will  be  sitting  here  talking
about the same thing, because it still hasn’t happened. I think that
what people will have to face is that we have very poor interim in-
termediate  storage  capabilities  by  using  reactors  as  places  to  store
stuff. We need to get on with the business of accepting the fact that
it is not 100,000 years later some guy with a burrow digging a hole
in  the  ground  is  going  to  be  the  measure  whether  we  did  a  good
job  on  permanent  storage.  But  the  fight  over  Yucca  Mountain  is  a
fight  that  existed,  by  the  way,  very  strongly  in  the  1970s,  but  for
different  things.  It  wasn’t  Yucca  Mountain  then.  It  was  deep-sea

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00126 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

123

beds  and  granitic  disposal,  glass  rods.  It  was  the  same  kind  of  ar-
guments  you  see  today.  It  is  30  years  later,  and  we  still  haven’t
made  any  progress.  I  am  not  a  cynic,  but  I  guess,  realistically,  I
have—a physicist that has become an engineer. I would just get on
with  the  job  of  some  regional  intermediate  storage  with  dry  cask
storage  and  just  expect  to  take  care  of  it  for  the  rest  of  our  exist-
ence.

Mr. BONNER. Thank you, Madame Chair.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
The gentleman from Missouri, Mr. Akin, is recognized.
Mr. AKIN. Thank you, Madame Chair.
I  had  a  bunch  of  questions,  and  I  hope  a  couple  of  them  maybe

have fairly short answers.

The  first  one  was,  somewhere  or  other  I  had  heard  that  if  you
were  just  volumetrically  to  take  the  spent  nuclear  fuel  that  we
have  so  far  and  stack  it  on  a  football  field,  it  would  end  up  about
a  meter  or  so  deep.  I  understand  that,  from  a  thermal  point  of
view,  that  wouldn’t  work  very  well,  but  just  volumetrically,  if  you
stacked  it  on  a  football  field,  is  that  about  right?  About  a  meter?
Mr. BUNN. I haven’t done that calculation, but it sounds like the

right order of magnitude.

Mr. AKIN. Reasonable? Okay.
The second question——
Mr. BUNN. It is not huge volumes of stuff, you know, but——
Mr. AKIN. It generates a lot of heat, that is the——
Mr.  BUNN.  The  total  amount  is  less  than,  you  know,  the  waste

from a coal power plant—one coal power plant every year.

Mr.  AKIN.  Okay.  The  second  question  is  the  small,  inexpensive
reactors possibly with—what generation would they be? Third gen-
eration or fourth or what?

Mr. BUNN. Probably fourth.
Mr.  AKIN.  Fourth  generation?  First  of  all,  my  question  is,  are
they  available  now,  if  we  said,  all  of  a  sudden,  we  are  so  sick  of
paying for this oil. We are just going to build them, how long would
it take us to get to the point where we would actually start digging
some dirt and pouring some concrete and all?

Mr.  JOHNSON.  If  you  are  referring  to  some  of  the  small,  Genera-
tion  IV  reactor  technologies  that  we  have  just  begun,  essentially,
conceptualizing,  we  are,  you  know,  a  decade  or  more  away  from
seeing any kind of commercialization of that particular technology,
although I would——

Mr.  AKIN.  So  those  are  the  things  that  people  talk  about  that  it
is  pelletized,  kind  of,  in  ceramic  pellets  and  that  they  are  very
small——

Mr.  JOHNSON.  Oh,  you  are  talking  about  the  pebble  bed?  The
pebble  bed  could  be  done  somewhat  sooner,  potentially.  There  are
smaller,  as  Mr.  Bunn  has  eluded  to,  what  is  called  a  pebble  bed,
gas-cooled  reactor  technology  that  has  been  under  development
both  in  Japan  and  South  Africa  predominately  that  builds  upon
earlier German technologies. Those have been looked at by U.S. in-
dustry recently, although there is no one in industry currently pur-
suing that particular technology.

Mr. AKIN. Would that be called third generation? Maybe?
Mr. BUNN. Probably.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00127 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

124

Mr. JOHNSON. Probably.
Mr.  AKIN.  Okay.  So  you  are  saying  we  are  10  years  away,  at  a

minimum, from a small, fourth generation type of facility?

Mr. JOHNSON. At least, yes.
Mr.  AKIN.  At  least.  Okay.  If  you  had  to  build  something  now,

what would you build?

Mr.  JOHNSON.  Well,  as  you  may  know,  the  commercial  industry
in this country is looking at the next generation light water reactor
technologies,  which  build  off  the  technology  base  that  is  currently
deployed  at  103  sites—or  103  reactors  across  our  country.  So  they
are  looking  at,  essentially,  an  evolution  of  the  current  technology
that is——

Mr.  AKIN.  A  further  improvement  of  what  we  have  already  had?
Mr. JOHNSON. Yes, sir.
Mr.  AKIN.  Okay.  Is  that  the  same  thing  the  Navy  uses  in  their

different ships and all? The same general technology?

Mr. JOHNSON. The base technology of a pressurized reactor, or a
boiling water reactor, yes. But there are considerable differences in
fuel and the operation of those facilities.

Mr. AKIN. Just because the nature of what they are trying to ac-

complish is a lot different?

Mr. JOHNSON. Correct.
Mr.  AKIN.  Okay.  And  now  is  it  true  that  what  you  said  that  de-
pending on how you come out on reprocessing might change the de-
sign somewhat of the power plant?

Mr.  JOHNSON.  Yes,  what  I  was  trying  to  address  was  the
Chairlady’s  question  on  the  integration  of  our  Generation  IV  reac-
tor  program  and  our  fuels  development  program  that  those  are  in-
tegrated.  They  are  interrelated.  And  it  is  an  integrative  process  of
trying  to  optimize  the  fuel  to  meet  both  power  production  require-
ments,  waste  minimization,  and  also  enhances  proliferation  resist-
ance to——

Mr.  AKIN.  So  dry  cask  storage,  that—would  you  take  that  off  of
the  table,  if  you  were  talking  about  reprocessing  then  it  may
change  your  design  parameter  somewhat?  Because  if  you  are  dry
cask storage, you could use whatever gives you the most power out
of the material and then you get rid of what is left over, right?

Mr.  JOHNSON.  Yes,  but  I  don’t  want  to  say  that  you  would  not
have,  somewhere  in  the  process,  the  need  for  dry  cask  storage  at
some point in the process.

Mr.  AKIN.  Okay.  The  third  thing  was—and  this  was  a  point,  I
think,  that  you  were  making,  Mr.  Bunn,  pretty  heavily,  and  that
is this reprocessing cost can drive the thing out of economic range.
Relative  to  relative  cost,  and  that  was  where,  I  gather,  you  dis-
agreed  with  Mr.  Finck.  You  are  saying  it  is  a  relatively  small  cost
and  a  responsible  cost  to  add.  Mr.  Bunn,  you  are  saying  it  is  just
disproportionately  so  large  it  makes  it  impractical.  Better  to  post-
pone  the  problem  until  the  technology  develops  a  little  bit  more.
We  can  always  come  back  and  catch  it  later  at  a  lower  cost.  What
is  the  relative  cost  of  the  reprocessing  in  the  overall  process?  Are
we  talking  about  adding  five  percent  or  doubling  the  cost  of  elec-
tricity,  or  what  would  be  the  effect  on  the  cost  of  electricity  to  the
consumer if——

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00128 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

125

Mr. BUNN. The effect on the cost of electricity, actually Dr. Finck
and I don’t disagree, is relatively modest, because the advantage of
nuclear  power,  when  you  look  at—when  you  compare  it  to  other
electricity  sources,  is  that  its  whole  fuel  cost  is  pretty  modest,  be-
cause the energy in its fuel is so concentrated. So the main cost in
nuclear  energy  is  the  capital  cost  of  the  nuclear  plant  that  you
have  built.  And  so  the  total  contribution  to  electricity  generation
costs  would  be  relatively  modest,  a  few  percent,  probably,  depend-
ing  on  how  expensive  the  reprocessing  and  the  recycling  ended  up
being.

But  that  is  a  little  bit  like  saying,  ‘‘Well,  I  should  be  willing  to
pay  $300  rather  than  $100  for  a  pair  of  shoes,  because  it  is  still
a  small  proportion  of  the  cost  of  my  wardrobe.’’  And  the  reality  is,
if  you  look  at  the  cost  of  nuclear  waste  management,  which  is  one
of the few costs that the owner of a nuclear power plant that is al-
ready  built  can  still  control  going  forward,  you  are,  of  order,  dou-
bling  that  cost  of  nuclear  waste  management,  if  you  are  going  for-
ward  with  reprocessing  and  recycling,  as  traditionally  practiced,
using the cost—you know, if we had a plant that was government-
financed  at  low  cost,  and  if  it  had  the  same—managed  to  achieve
the  same  capital  and  operating  costs  as  the  most  efficient  plants
that  exist  today  in  France  and  Britain.  So  you  know,  a  utility  is
not going to want to do that. So they—if left to the private market,
reprocessing  wouldn’t  happen.  So  then,  as  I  said,  you  have  to  do
one  of  three  things.  You  either  have  to  substantially  increase  the
nuclear  waste  fee,  which  utilities  are  going  to  scream  bloody  mur-
der about, or you are going to have to have the government provide
tens  of  billions  of  dollars  in  subsidies  over  decades,  and  you  know,
while it is a small contribution to electricity, tens of billions of dol-
lars  is  significant  money.  If  we  were  talking  about  a  weapons  sys-
tem,  we  would  agree  that  that  was  an  expensive  weapons  system.
Or third, you are going to have to impose regulations that force the
industry to take it out of their own bottom line and build these fa-
cilities themselves.

Mr.  AKIN.  And  let  me  just  stop  you  for  a  minute.  Somehow  or
another there was a little leap here of reasoning that I didn’t catch.
Okay.  What  I  was  asking  was,  let  us  say—first  of  all,  let  us  start
with the assumption that the government is not going to subsidize
anything.  We  are  just  going  to  try  to  keep  the  lawyers  at  bay  and
the  politics  at  bay  and  let  us  just  deal  with  it  just  from  an  engi-
neering—let us—a perfect world.

Mr. BUNN. Right.
Mr. AKIN. My question is, the total cost for generating, obviously
you  have  got  to  put  the  plant  cost  in  and  your  cost  of  capital  to
build  it  all.  And  so  I  am  saying  that  is  built  into  the  cost  to  the
consumable electricity.

Mr. BUNN. Right.
Mr. AKIN. What you are saying is the reprocessing is still a small

portion of——

Mr. BUNN. It is a small portion of that——
Mr. AKIN.—the overall——
Mr. BUNN.—total cost.
Mr. AKIN.—electrical establishment?
Mr. BUNN. Correct.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00129 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

126

Mr. AKIN. Okay.
Mr.  BUNN.  Correct.  That  is  what  I  am  saying.  And  what—all  I
was  saying,  with  respect  to  the  regulations  or  the  fee  was  how  do
we  make  that  money  for  that  small  additional  cost  appear.  You
have  got  to  either  charge  the  utilities  for  it  or  force  them  to  pay
for  it  themselves  or  the  government  has  to  pay  for  it  itself.  Those
are the only three options I can think of anyway.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  The  gentleman’s  time  has  expired.  We

will have a second round of questioning.

Mr. AKIN. Thank you.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. We are experiencing technical difficulties.
We will also be having a hearing on cost later on.
So the gentleman from Michigan, the physicist, Dr. Ehlers.
Mr. EHLERS. That puts a heavy burden on me.
I—it  is  interesting  listening  to  this,  because  the  first  in-depth
look I took of this was in the late 1970s, slightly after you did, Dr.
Hagengruber.  And  it  doesn’t  seem  much  has  changed.  But  I  look
at—I  took  a  good  look  at  this,  because  I  was  teaching  a  course  on
the  environment,  and  I  was  also  a  member  of  the  Sierra  Club,
which  was  adamantly  opposed  to  nuclear  power.  And  so  I  looked
very  carefully  at  the  various  forms  of  generating  electricity  and
came  to  the  conclusion  that  nuclear  power  and  fossil-generated
power are about equally bad. And I ended up disagreeing with the
Sierra  Club,  which  I  was  a  member  then  and  still  am,  in  spite  of
occasional  difficulties  with  them.  I  came  down  on  the  side  of  nu-
clear  power,  because  the  base—the  biggest  problems  that  you  had
to deal with, with the fossil-fueled plants, is the greenhouse gas ef-
fect.  The  biggest  problem  of  the  nuclear  plants  is  the  disposal  of
the  radioactive  waste.  In  other  words,  in  both  cases,  dealing  with
the  waste  products.  And  I  felt  much,  much  more  comfortable  deal-
ing  with  a  compact,  solid  material  that  is  a  waste  product  than  a
gaseous  dispersed  product,  which  is  virtually  impossible  to  deal
with capture, and we talk about a lot of solutions, but none of them
look as easy as either reprocessing or storage of waste.

I  would  also  pick  up  on  Dr.  Hagengruber’s  comment  on  the—I
am  supposed  to  be  at  another  meeting,  so  I  am  sure  I  am  being
summoned.

Dr.  Hagengruber’s  comment  was  about  disposal  versus  storage.
And he is absolutely right. I got into politics because of an environ-
mental  problem  in  my  area.  That  was  ordinary,  solid  waste.  And
one  of  the  things  I  proposed  is  that  we  change  the  name  of  our
landfill  from  the  Kent  County  Solid  Waste  Disposal  Facility  to  the
Kent County Solid Waste Storage Facility, because it is still there.
And  it  is  still  there  and  it  is  still  creating  problems.  And  we  have
to recognize that. Yucca Mountain, I think the legislative language
that we put on Yucca Mountain is just impossible to fulfill, and we
ought  to  wake  up  to  that,  and  I  have  tried  to  wake  my  colleagues
up  to  that.  Monitored,  retrievable  storage  is  the  only  viable  solu-
tion  politically,  because  you  can  not  guarantee  that  this  will—that
if you just stick it in the ground and leave it there it is never going
to leak, never going to create problems.

I  always  thought  that  recycling  of  waste  was  a  good  idea.  And
Mr.  Bunn,  you  seem  to  argue  against  it  on,  primarily,  economic
grounds.  I  would  point  out,  if  there  is  that  much  excess  capacity

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00130 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

127

in  other  parts  of  the  world,  I  would  be  perfectly  happy  to  ship  it
over there and let them reprocess it and pay for it.

The—I  also  would  disagree,  and  this  is  because  I  have  to  leave
for another meeting. I am not—I am just stating my opinions here
and  will  not—probably  not  have  time  to  listen  to  your  responses,
but  the  economic  argument,  I  don’t  think,  is  a  valid  one  in  this
case.  I  find  it  hard  to  believe  that  the  cost  of  recycling  the  waste
is  going  to  be  greater  than  the  perpetual  care  over  the  long-term
of  the  stored  waste,  because  I  think  the  only  way  to  do  it  is  to  set
up a trust fund to make sure the money is always there, otherwise
there  are  going  to  be  political  hassles  every  year  about  the  cost  of
that.

I  would  also  point  out  that  this  is  not  a  cost  on  the  utilities.  It
is a cost on the customers. We have been talking about the utilities
pay this fee that they are paying now. That goes right into the rate
base,  and  since  they  are  mostly  regulated  industries,  it  is  the  cus-
tomers  who  really  pay  the  bill.  And  so  I  feel  comfortable  just—if,
in fact, recycling is a better alternative, I feel comfortable just tell-
ing  the  customers  that  that  is  a  fee  that  has  to  be  paid  as  part  of
the total cost of the system.

So I haven’t quite exhausted my time. There are probably 30 sec-
onds, if any of you would like to respond and argue with me or say
something different about it.

Mr. BUNN. Well, I would like to argue with you a bit. I think that
you  and  I  are  supporting  the  same  option,  which  is  monitored  re-
trievable  storage.  I  believe  that  if  we  put  the  fuel  in  storage  while
moving  forward  in  a  responsible  way  with  a  geologic  repository,
that we are going to leave open whatever option we take. Then we
can allow time for technology to develop. We can allow time for in-
terest  to  accumulate  on  funds  that  we  set  aside  today.  And  I  com-
pletely agree that the only way to manage a geologic waste reposi-
tory,  which  we  are  going  to  need,  again,  no  matter  what  path  we
take,  is  to  set  aside  a  trust  fund  so  that  the  money  will  always  be
available.  But  with  the  wonders  of  compound  interest,  that  is  pos-
sible to do without spending enormous amounts of money today.

So  I  think  that  that  is  really  the  best  path  forward:  to  continue
looking  at  the  technology,  but  not  to  make  a  rush  to  judgment
today  on  technologies  that  currently  are  more  expensive,  more
risky, and more proliferation-prone than the alternatives.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Okay.  And  I  don’t  have  that  much  argument  with
that. Obviously, we have to know what we are going to do. But I—
the difficulty of siting, I think, is the biggest problem with the stor-
age system. And I think it is a large enough problem that recycling
will have to—just so that you don’t have to cite as many sites. And
the economics may not win in this case. The politics may win.

Mr. BUNN. But then you have to site the reprocessing and trans-
mutation  facilities,  and  since  they  will  pose  greater  hazards  to
their  neighbors  than  a  repository  will,  that  may  be  even  more  dif-
ficult.

Mr. EHLERS. Well, possibly, but I am not convinced that it would
pose  greater  hazards,  if  it  is  done  properly.  And  after  all,  we  have
two  polluted  sites  we  can  start  with  and  just  build  a  large  perim-
eter  fence  around  them  and  say,  ‘‘Okay.  Keep  on  doing  it.’’  But  I
don’t—I  think  your  view  of  the  dangers  is  somewhat  exaggerated.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00131 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

128

Madame  Chairwoman,  I  appreciate  your  consideration,  and  I

yield back the balance of my time.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much, Mr. Ehlers.
And we will start a second round now. And Mr. Honda, why don’t

you——

please.

Mr. HONDA. Madame Chairwoman, let me yield to Mr. Matheson,

Mr. MATHESON. Well, thank you, Mr. Honda.
The question I would like to ask about is in the evaluation of re-
processing,  I  am  assuming  that  there  would—if  we  moved  ahead
with the commercial effort of reprocessing at some point, we would
have  it  at  a  few  sites  around  the  country,  or  perhaps  fewer  than
a few?

Mr. BUNN. Maybe only one. Who knows?
Mr.  MATHESON.  In  terms  of  looking  at  all  of  this  effort  for  R&D
and  reprocessing,  what  effort  is  being  looked  at  in  assessing  the
risk of transporting of the waste to another site?

Mr. BUNN. Do you want to handle that?
Mr. JOHNSON. Well, with respect to our Advanced Fuel Cycle Ini-
tiative,  we  are  not  looking  at  transportation  issues.  Probably  the
only part of the Department that is looking at transportation issues
associated  with  spent  nuclear  fuel  would  be  the  Office  of  Civilian
Radioactive Waste Management, and to their work, I apologize, but
I can’t really address.

Mr.  BUNN.  There  is  a  fairly  substantial  R&D  effort  in  the  De-
partment related—not—I wouldn’t say—R&D is the wrong word. A
fairly  substantial  effort  to  look  into  what  measure  should  be  ap-
plied  to  secured  transports  of  spent  fuel,  and  there  is  a—what  is
called  the  Transportation  Safeguards  Division  within  DOE  that
today safeguards shipments such as how weapons are shipped from
place to place.

Mr.  MATHESON.  It  may  be  getting  a  little  outside  of  the  scope  of
this  hearing,  but  as  a  member  of  the  Transportation  Committee,
we  held  a  hearing  in  Las  Vegas  talking  about  transportation  rel-
ative  to  moving  waste  to  Yucca  Mountain.  I  was  not  given  a  lot  of
assurance that the Department has really done a lot of work on as-
sessing transportation risk of nuclear waste, and so it would be an
interesting issue to——

Mr. BUNN. I don’t disagree with the—your assessment of the ade-

quacy of what has been done so far.

Mr.  MATHESON.  Well,  since  I  am  from  a  state  where  95  percent
of  that  waste  would  go  through,  I  have  a  certain  interest  in  this
issue.

Dr.  HAGENGRUBER.  Let  me  just  speak,  because  on  that—I  think
people have said the right thing. The RW Office actually is the one
that  is  taking  the  responsibility  for  the  security  aspects  of  trans-
portation.  There  has  been  work  done.  I  know,  because  some  of  the
work  was  done  at—you  know,  involving  Sandia  National  Labs.
Some  of  the  work  in  the  transportation  area,  including  the  trans-
portation of casks, for instance, fuel casks and accidents that occur,
the  idea  of  people  shooting  weapons  at  fuel  casks  or  transport
casks, that work goes back 25 or 30 years. So there is—if you look
at  the  integrated  total  of  the  amount  of  money  that  has  gone  into
both  purposeful  and  accidental  attacks  on  the  transportation  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00132 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

129

fresh fuel and spent fuel, there has been a lot of work, and we are
talking about many, many millions of dollars.

Now  in  particular,  RW  has  been  looking  at—was  looking  at  the
question  of  whether  or  not  to  federalize  the  transportation  or  to
make it commercial in its nature. Transportation Security Division,
one that Matt mentioned, transports, in effect, trigger quantities of
material  weapons  and  pits  and  other  types  of  material.  And  it  is
a  very,  very  expensive  thing.  The  trucks  cost  a  couple  of  million
dollars. They have a full cadre of highly trained, armed forces with
them.  They  have  constant  communication.  If  you  were  to  move  to
that,  the  implications  in  cost  and  transportation  of  anything,
whether  you  have  a  reprocessing  plant,  spent  fuel,  or  doing  any-
thing, would become staggering.

The  question  of  federalization  of  the  forces,  that  is  to  actually
have federal people driving those trucks, has additional cost impli-
cations.  But  I  think  it  is  wrong  to  believe  that  there  hasn’t  been
work  done.  I  mean,  you  may  have  been  talking  with  people  that
don’t  know  the  historical  work  that  was  done.  You  may  have  been
talking  about  people  that  don’t  know  what  RW  was  trying  to  do.
Whether  it  is  adequate  or  not,  in  light  of  this,  I  don’t  know,  but
I  know  that  it  has  gone  far  enough  to  do  studies  looking  at  all  of
the  donor  sites,  of  which  there  are—I  think  there  are  106  or  108,
not  just  the  operating  reactors.  And  there  are  certainly—there  is
a stack of documents this thick on security at Yucca Mountain, in-
cluding the transportation from the entry to Yucca Mountain to the
location  at  the  Yucca  Mountain  site.  I  know  this,  because  I—the
National  Academy  panel  that  I  am  part  of  was  asked  to  consider
doing  a  study  on  research  and  development  and  the  security  at
Yucca  Mountain.  So  we  have  seen  some  of  those  reports.  I  don’t
think—it may not be enough, sir, but there is a substantial amount
of work out there.

Mr. MATHESON. Thank you, Madame Chair.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
Do you have any more questions, Mr. Honda?
Mr. HONDA. Just a quick question, and this is probably reflective
of my ignorance. But what I have heard is that, and I think it was
Mr.  Johnson  that  indicated  that  the  reprocessing  of  uranium  is,
what,  96  percent  or  94  percent  of  its  total  weight  in  volume,  I
guess.  And  encapsulating  that  for  storage,  that  is  one  step,  but
aren’t  there  other  byproducts  of  reprocessing  or  of  creating  the
waste  that  other  materials  have  to  be  encapsulated,  also,  so  that
in practice it appears that there will be more volume than just the
waste  itself.  There  are  other  wastes  that  are  created  so  that  the
volume is really more. If that is the case, then how does that really
solve our storage and our nuclear waste problem?

Mr.  JOHNSON.  Yes.  What  I  was  referring  to  was  that,  by  mass,
uranium  constitutes  96  percent  of  the  mass  of  spent  nuclear  fuel,
and  that  uranium  is  primarily  uranium—the  isotope  uranium-238.
The  fissile  content  of  the  uranium-235  in  spent  nuclear  fuel  is
slightly  above  that  of  natural  uranium.  It  is  roughly—it  is  a  little
less than 1 percent, on average. You are correct in that the separa-
tions technologies that we are currently investigating within our—
the  Department’s  programs,  is  looking  at  partitioning  spent  fuel
into  different—into  its  different  constituents,  separating  out  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00133 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

130

uranium.  That  does  provide  significant  volume  reduction,  but  as  I
mentioned  earlier,  the  primary  concern  in  repository  performance
is  the  heat  generation.  And  that  heat  generation  is  driven  both  in
a  short-term  and  a  long-term  component.  By  separating  the  spent
fuel  into  these  different  elemental  constituents,  yes,  you  have  not
really  reduced  the  amount  of  material,  it—the  amount  of  material
that has to be stored, but it is the recognition that all of that mate-
rial doesn’t then have to go into a geologic repository. For example,
the  uranium  can  be  extracted  at  such  purity  that  it  could  possibly
be  stored  as  a  low-level  class  C  waste.  It  would  meet  that  type  of
requirement that would therefore not need to go into a repository—
into  a  geologic  repository.  The  other  constituents  could  be  stored
for  future  destruction  or  transmutation  in  future  fast  reactor  sys-
tems that would minimize the volume of the highly radioactive ma-
terials that would have to go into a repository.

Mr.  BUNN.  I  think  that—I  agree  with  Dr.  Finck  that  what  we
need  is  an  end-to-end  systems  analysis  on  this  kind  of  thing,  be-
cause  when  you  look  at  reprocessing,  you  have  got,  depending  on
which  technologies  you  are  using,  a  variety  of  different  streams  of
high-level waste or species you are going to send for transmutation,
but  you  also  then  have  to  look  at  intermediate-level  waste,  low-
level  waste.  You  have  to  look  at,  when  you  are  done  with  the  re-
processing  plant,  when  it  has  outlived  its  lifetime,  the  decommis-
sioning  waste,  the  same  for  the  transmutation  facilities  and  so  on.
And then you have to compare the costs of managing those various
different waste streams and the hazards of managing those various
waste  streams  and  hazards  with  other  options.  So  I  think  that  is
the  kind  of  examination  that  needs  to  be  done.  The  cost—the  vol-
umes of, for example, decommissioning waste projected from the re-
processing plants in France are quite large.

Dr. FINCK. If I may, volume in Yucca Mountain is not the issue,
as  the  gentleman  is  saying.  The  issue  is  heat  load  generation,  and
most of the heat load comes from a few percent of the waste. That
is what we have to deal with. Essentially, we have to get rid of that
heat to increase the capacity of Yucca Mountain. No, I fully agree.
We  have  to  look  at  an  integrated  cycle  to  see  where  the  benefits
and costs are and to gain where we can.

Mr. HONDA. So the other wastes that are created that have to be
contained,  you  are  saying  that  those  are  safe  and  all  we  have  to
do is find a storage place for them?

Dr.  FINCK.  No,  the  ones  that  are  toxic.  What  we  want  to  do  is
transmute  them.  Basically  take  them,  let  us  say,  americium-241,
and  fission  it  into  elements  or  isotopes  that  are  much  less  toxic.
And you do this by running it through a—in a reactor.

Mr.  HONDA.  And  is  this  what  is  happening  in  France  and  in
Japan and in the UK where they are completely being able to deal
with their waste or——

Dr. FINCK. No.
Mr. HONDA.—do they have waste issues, also?
Mr. BUNN. Go ahead.
Dr.  FINCK.  They  take  the  first  step  there.  They  take  care  of  one
of  the  elements,  one  of  the  isotopes.  They  take  care  of  plutonium-
239  by  burning  it  partially,  but  they  plan,  in  the  future,  to  do  ex-
actly  what  we  described  earlier,  take  care  of  the  other  elements,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00134 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

131

which  we  usually  call  minor  actinides.  And  their  plans  for  the
years  to  come,  roughly  when  we  plan  to  do  it,  is  also  to  find  ways
to  destroy  these  minor  actinides.  But  right  now,  they  only  burn
plutonium-239 partially, and they store the resulting fuels and the
resulting minor actinides are stored for future use.

Mr. BUNN. But the way that they are implementing reprocessing
today,  with,  as  Dr.  Finck  said,  one  round  of  recycling  of  the  pluto-
nium  as  in  plutonium  mixed-oxide,  or  MOX,  fuel,  in  their  existing
light  water  reactors,  has  essentially  no  noticeable  waste  manage-
ment  benefits.  As  Dr.  Finck  and  Mr.  Johnson  have  both  said,  the
volume  and  cost  of  a  repository  is  determined  by  the  heat  output,
while  if  you  go  to  a  system  with  one  round  of  reprocessing  and
MOX  and  then  disposal,  you  actually  have  more  heat  rather  than
less  for—compared  to  a  direct  disposal  per  unit—you  know,  per
number  of  kilowatt  hours  generated.  And  you  don’t  have  any  sig-
nificant reduction in the radiological toxicity, the doses from the re-
pository, because the only thing you are separating is the uranium
and  the  plutonium,  and  those,  basically,  don’t  contribute  signifi-
cantly  to  the  doses—from  geologic  repositories.  So  you  really  have
to  go  to  the  kinds  of  transmutation  technologies  that  Dr.  Finck  is
developing in order to get the kinds of benefits that——

Dr.  FINCK.  If  I  may  complement.  We  actually  get  a  very  small

benefit from MOX. It is like 10 percent, not really big.

Mr. BUNN. The studies I have seen go the other direction, but we

can talk about that.

Dr. FINCK. Well, I like to do my own studies.
Mr.  HONDA.  Well,  through  the  Chair  and—I  just  want  to  thank
you for your testimony, but my sense is that it is much more com-
plicated of an issue that requires a systems approach to look at the
entire  problem  and  look  in  that—some  matrix  that  would  address
the issues of proliferation and the dangers intermittently——

Mr. BUNN. And for that reason——
Mr.  HONDA.—combined  together  rather  than  just  talking  about
storage and transferring to other countries for processing and com-
ing  back.  It  is  much  more  complicated  than  that,  and  I  appreciate
the—your input in providing this insight for me.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you.
I am glad that Mr. Honda brought this back to the systems anal-
ysis,  because  I  think  that  is  where  we  needed  to  go  back.  I  would
like  to  go  one  step  further  back,  and  I  think  in  my  opening  state-
ment I talked about the log and how we take three percent off one
side and three percent on the other end and throw the rest into the
fire  to  burn  and  then  we  take  it  out  and  put  it  in  a  mountain,  or
we are going to try.

When  I  was—in  the  1960s  and  I  first  went  to  France,  and  I  can
remember  going  to  these  hotels.  We  used  to  go  in  Europe  on  $5  a
day.  That  doesn’t  happen  anymore,  but  it  was—we  would  go  to
these  hotels,  and  you  would  walk  into  the  hotel,  and  you  would
come in at night, and to turn on the lights to go up the stairs, you
would push a little button and the lights would go on, and then you
would get—try and make it to the top of that staircase to push the
next  button,  because  the  next  staircase  the  lights  were  going  to—
and  having  been  to  France  since  then,  you  know,  things  have
changed.  They—the  electricity  that  is  there,  you  don’t  drive  with

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00135 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

132

your—just the car headlights anymore, the buildings are lit up like
it  was  never  before.  And  80  percent  of  France’s  electricity  is  nu-
clear. Ours is 20 percent. Now I live in a state that is over 50 per-
cent  electric,  because  we  have  had  a  lot  of  nuclear  facilities  there.
My point is that, you know, here we have a clean, environmentally-
friendly energy source, and we keep saying, ‘‘Well, we should wait.
We  should  wait  and,  you  know,  just  use  that  small  amount  of  the
energy,  the  fuel,  and  let  the—just  burn  up  the  rest  or—and  then
put  it  away.’’  And  that  concerns  me  that  in—you  know,  for  future
generations,  we  have  got  to  find  means  of  energy  that  is  going  to
be—to have that rather than being oil now—oil dependent. Now we
don’t  need  electricity,  but  we  need  natural  gas.  We  need  different
fuels that are not going to be around, fossil fuels. And I think that
this  is  imperative  that  we  start  to  work  on  it,  because  the  time  it
is  going  to  take  to  create  the  fast  reactor  where  we  are  going  to
have the closed fuel cycle and be able to do all of this in one place
and  really,  you  know,  time  after  time  use  this  fuel  until  it  is  gone
and then have this small amount to put into Yucca Mountain. And
it  always  seems  to  come  down  to  the  issue  of  non-proliferation.
That  is  the  first—everything  everybody  says,  and  I  know  that  this
has been worked on for years and years. France is using something
that is really outdated, compared to what we can do now, and just
for  one  thing  that  Mr.  Bunn  said  that—you  know,  you  had  said
that  there  are  240  tons  of  separated—where—weapons-usable  plu-
tonium  already  exists  throughout  the  world.  So  you  know,  I  know
we have to be concerned about terrorists, but—seeking nuclear ma-
terial,  but  if  there  is  plutonium  that  is  being  used  and  produced
by  UREX+  and  even  if  it  isn’t  lethal,  wouldn’t  somebody—you
know,  somebody  go  after  the  pure  plutonium  that  they  can  find
rather  than  something  that  has,  you  know,  been  reprocessed  like
that?

Mr.  BUNN.  Well,  I,  for  one,  agree  that  there  are  a  huge  number
of  places  in  the  world  that,  today  at  least,  are  sufficiently  vulner-
able  that  have  either  highly-enriched  uranium  or  plutonium  that
they would be the places of choice for terrorists to get that kind of
material. And one of the points I made in my testimony is that we,
as a Nation, have to be working as fast as we can to lock down all
of those stockpiles.

I  don’t  think  that  proliferation  is  the  only  issue  here.  I  agree
with you that nuclear energy is something that I would like to see
grow as one of the potential answers to climate change——

Chairwoman BIGGERT. And don’t you think that——
Mr.  BUNN.—but  I  don’t  think  we  need  reprocessing  as  part  of
that.  In  fact,  I  think  a  near-term  decision  to  reprocess  would  be
more likely to undermine than to promote the future of nuclear en-
ergy.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  But  don’t  you  think  that  we  really  need

to take in the cost consideration of the global climate?

Mr. BUNN. Absolutely. And because we need to take into the cost
consideration,  that  is  one  of  the  reasons  why  I  think  we  shouldn’t
reprocess.  The  cost  of  climate  change  is  an  issue  of  nuclear
energy——

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  But  what  we  will  be  spending  for  other
types  of—like  the  carbon  that  is—you  know,  that  is  creating  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00136 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

133

problems, and if we have the nuclear, then that is going to change
the  costs  that  we  are  going  to  have  to  spend  on  the  environment.
Mr. BUNN. But what I am saying is you can have nuclear energy
without reprocessing. In fact, I believe you are more likely to have
growth  in  nuclear  energy  if  we  don’t  pursue  reprocessing  with  the
technologies that are available now or in the near-term.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  But  having  been  over  in  France  and  hav-
ing seen those pools and the way that the storage is, I mean, they
are getting to—you know, like the big rooms, like the football field
with  the  cask,  and  then  you  have  got  the  water  pool  in  the  other
room.  And  that  is—you  know,  they  are  doing  well,  but  when  we
can  reduce,  you  know,  the  amount  of  radioactivity  and  the  heat  to
where—to—down to, let us say, 300 years versus 10,000 years, that
is  a  big  difference  in  a  cost  to  us  as  far  as,  you  know,  having  the
ability to put that some place.

Dr. HAGENGRUBER. If I could just make a comment.
I think it is really important in the systems analysis to also look
at  the  history  of  how  the  government  participated  in  the  industry,
not  only  in  this  country,  but  in  France,  and  how  they  participate
today, just like Airbus and Boeing, are interesting issues.

I think the other thing is that from a systems point of view, this
is the only energy source that we are going to look at, that attrac-
tive  energy  source,  where  the  government  will  bear  an  enormous
burden.  It  is  worse  than  ethanol  or  solar  energy  or  geothermal  in
terms  of  the  subsidy,  because  you  will  not  be  able  to  create  an  in-
dustry that would freely build this reprocessing plant, would freely
move  and  recycle  the  material,  would  freely  build  the  generations
of reactors in which it would most efficiently be done if the entire—
almost  the  entire  research  and  development  burden  for  this,  not
just  the  reprocessing  facility,  the  Generation  IV  reactors,  every-
thing,  will  be  borne  by  the  government,  and  that  is  quite  unlike
any  other  energy  source.  If  you  put  that  into  the  context,  then,  of
how much we spend dealing with the threat of nuclear weapons or
the threat of proliferation of weapons of mass destruction, it means
that—I  mean,  I  actually  believe,  from  a  physicist’s  point  of  view,
recycling  makes  sense  for  the  very  reasons  that  you  say.  On  the
other  hand,  proliferation  has  been  a  persistent  problem.  It  is  an
emotional problem. It is one that gets into the deepest sense of fear
that  people  have.  And  it  affects  the  political  environment,  the  cy-
cles  of  support  and  non-support  for  nuclear  energy.  We  have  seen
those  cycles  now  since  the  Manhattan  Project,  and  we  will  see
them again. It seems to me that it behooves us then to make a de-
cision  that  is  most  robust  that  draws  the  most  constituency  across
the political spectrum. And I think that decision should include the
closed  cycle.  But  I  think  the  time—the  timing  of  the  closed  cycle
is something where there should be an exquisite attention paid not
to how efficiently we could get the Department of Energy to do the
research,  but  how  much  the  Congress,  committees  like  this,  could
demand that the standards of proliferation be reasonably answered
when they see the alternative technologies, because in the end, Ma-
dame  Chairman,  you  and  your  colleagues  will  bear  almost  the  en-
tire cost of the development of this part of the cycle.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Well,  I  know  that,  you  know,  the  Admin-
istration has come out and said we need to move forward with the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00137 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

134

advanced fuel. And there has been some discussion that, you know,
the cost of doing the first fast reactor or doing the first—the whole
process  is  going  to  be  huge.  But  once  that  is  built,  then  it  will  re-
duce the costs that the utilities will be able to come in and do that,
is that something that you think is possible?

Dr.  HAGENGRUBER.  We  have—we  built  a  fast  reactor  in  Ten-
nessee,  essentially  completed.  And  it  did  not  run.  We  built  the
West  Valley  field  facility  for  recycling,  and  it  ran  for  a  few  years
and was shut down.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  But  we  actually  had  one  in  Illinois,  too,

that was built but never opened.

Dr.  HAGENGRUBER.  Right.  And  it  seems  to  me  that  it  goes  back

to the——

Chairwoman BIGGERT. But that was political.
Dr. HAGENGRUBER. But it is just, in a way—well, but that is my
point  is  it  is  not  physics.  And  it  is—and  we  are  not  the  threat  of
proliferation.  Our  material  is  very  unlikely  to  be  truly  the  threat
to  terrorists,  even  in  this  country,  because  we  do  provide  a  high
level  of  security.  It  certainly  is  true  in  France.  The  security  is  ex-
quisite. In the end, the question is whether or not the international
regime  we  launch  now,  as  we  did  in  the  1950s,  launched  the  nu-
clear  regime  that  is  around  the  world,  whether  or  not  that  regime
will  be  one  we  want  to  live  with,  you  know,  in  the—for  the  next
20 years.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Well,  we  launched  that,  but  I  would  say
in the 1970s, you know, we said shut down all of the reprocessing.
The  United  States  did.  Nobody  else  did,  and  they  haven’t  followed
our lead on that. Do you think we are still a leader in this industry
at the moment?

Dr.  HAGENGRUBER.  I  think  that  the—I  believe  that  the  inter-
national  community  still  looks  to  the  United  States  in  terms  of,
like,  the  permanent  geologic  repository,  I  know  from  my  discus-
sions  with  the  RW  people,  that  people  in  France  and  everywhere
look to the United States asking, ‘‘What are you going to do?’’ They
look at Yucca Mountain to see. I think in the question of reprocess-
ing  and  what  will  happen  to  an  economy,  a  plutonium  economy  in
the  world,  the  question  about  Generation  IV  reactors,  the  invest-
ments  that  our  government  makes  will  be  the  ones  that  set  the
standards. So even though there have been countries that are suc-
cessfully reprocessing, et cetera, is that the reactors the French are
trying  to  sell  to  China  are  the  reactors  that  were  developed  in  the
technology  here  in  the  United  States.  It  is  changed  somewhat,  but
they  are  not  an  original  design.  And  so,  you  know,  in  the  end,  we
will  have  a  major  influence.  The  decisions  made,  you  know,  in
these next few years will have a major influence on what the world
decides.  And  even  though  we  should  have  lost  our  leadership,  I
mean, we have been sitting still for 25 years, we have not. I mean,
there  is  still—they  will  look  to  us  to  see  how  much  of  an  invest-
ment we make. Generation IV, the advanced fuel cycle, these deci-
sions  are  ones  in  which  the  U.S.  leadership  will  have  a  profound
effect on the world’s decisions.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Dr. Finck.
Dr. FINCK. Yeah, if I may, two comments.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00138 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

135

I would like the United States to regain leadership in the nuclear
business.  I  wouldn’t  be  as  optimistic  as  Dr.  Hagengruber  that  we
have  kept  everything.  For  example,  in  the  repository,  sure  they
look at our solution, but as Matt Bunn was saying, we are the only
one to have put it in a mountain with limited walls. They are look-
ing  at  very  different  solutions.  Maybe,  possibly,  they  are  learning
from our mistakes. I don’t know.

But  you  know,  one  more  thing  I  would  comment  on,  we  need  to
stop  thinking  the  same  way  we  were  thinking  30  years  ago.  The
world  has  really  changed.  Global  warming  is,  today,  a  recognized
issue,  at  least  by  many  scientists,  and  it  is  going  to  affect  the  fu-
ture, maybe not mine, but certainly my children and grandchildren.
It  will  affect  more  than  any  other  program  we  had  in  our  civiliza-
tion before. We—oil, the price of oil has gone up, and I believe, un-
like in the past where we have oil crisis due to a supply of political
issue  on  the  supply  side,  this  time  it  has  to  deal  with  a  major  in-
crease  in  demand,  mostly  in  China  and  India.  And  I  believe,  I
might  be  wrong,  and  hopefully  I  am  wrong,  the  price  of  oil  will  be
up  for  a  very,  very  long  time,  maybe  forever  because  these  coun-
tries are consuming more. So the world has really changed, and the
way  we  look  at  nuclear  must  address  these  changes,  too.  We  need
to increase nuclear to have a cleaner environment, to have more se-
cure  energy,  and  if  we  do  not  deal  with  the  waste  problem,  that
will prevent nuclear from moving forward. We need to deal with it.

Chairwoman BIGGERT. Thank you very much.
Mr. Bunn.
Mr.  BUNN.  I  believe  that  we  do  have  some  leadership  and  some
influence  on  other  countries,  and  that  is  part  of  the  reason  that  I
am  concerned  that  President  Bush’s  approach,  where  he  has  made
stopping  the  spread  of  reprocessing  to  additional  countries  a  key
element of his nonproliferation policy, will be more difficult to carry
out  if  we,  ourselves,  are  moving  forward  with  large-scale  commer-
cial  reprocessing  in  our  country.  If  we  are  doing  it,  it  will  be  more
difficult  to  convince  others  not  to.  Countries  like  South  Korea  and
Taiwan  have  both  expressed  interest  in  reprocessing.  They  have
been  not  pursuing  it,  because  of  U.S.  pressure,  and  they  both  had
secret nuclear weapons programs based on reprocessing in the past
that  were  stopped  under  U.S.  pressure.  We  just  read  in  the  news-
paper  this  morning  about  additional  secret  reprocessing  work  in
Iran that the IAEA has reported. So I think a nontrivial part of the
consideration is what influence will this have on our ability to con-
vince  other  countries  to  follow  what  is  a  significant  part  of  Presi-
dent Bush’s nonproliferation——

Chairwoman BIGGERT. So I guess what you are saying is that we
shouldn’t move forward in our research and development if another
country might do it, too?

Mr.  BUNN.  That  is  not  correct.  I  have  strongly  supported  contin-
ued research and development in my testimony. What I am saying
is  we  should  allow  time  for  the  technology  to  develop.  We  have
available  today  commercially  safe,  cheap,  reliable  ways  to  manage
our nuclear fuel for decades to come. We should allow the time for
a responsible decision with more development of the technology.

Chairwoman  BIGGERT.  Mr.  Johnson,  do  you  have  anything  to

add?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00139 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

136

Mr. JOHNSON. No, ma’am.
Chairwoman BIGGERT. No? Okay. Thank you, all. Thank you, all
of  the  panelists  today,  for  testifying  before  this  subcommittee,  and
I  really  appreciate  all  that  you  have—the  expertise  that  you  have
brought  to  this  Committee.  And  obviously,  this  is  a  very  complex
issue,  and  we  will  be  holding  further  hearings,  and  I  know  that  it
is—I think we do have a responsibility to know all of the facts and
make  decisions  based  on  that,  and  I  appreciate  all  that  you  have
contributed to that.

So  if  there  is  no  objection,  the  record  will  remain  open  for  addi-
tional statements from the members and for answers to any follow-
up questions the Subcommittee may ask the panelists. Without ob-
jection, so ordered.

The hearing is now adjourned.
[Whereupon, at 12:34 p.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00140 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(137)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00141 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

138

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Robert  Shane  Johnson,  Acting  Director,  Office  of  Nuclear  Energy,
Science,  and  Technology;  Deputy  Director  for  Technology,  U.S.  Department  of
Energy

Questions submitted by Chairman Judy Biggert
Q1. There was some discussion during the hearing about the economics of reprocess-
ing, once it becomes commercial scale. What are the major steps necessary before
the  technology  is  mature  enough  for  commercial  deployment?  For  each  of  those
steps,  do  we  have  enough  information  to  estimate  the  associated  costs?  If  so,
what are the costs?

A1. Assuming  that  any  near-term  (e.g.,  within  twenty  years)  commercial  deploy-
ment  in  the  United  States  would  involve  one  of  the  UREX+  flow  sheet  variations,
the  major  steps  remaining  are  (1)  completion  of  both  laboratory-scale  experiments
and  modeling  efforts  to  characterize  the  selected  flow  sheet  and  its  associated  con-
trol/accountability  system,  and  (2)  successful  testing  at  an  engineering  scale  of  the
integrated flow sheet and controls. Some preliminary cost estimates have been made
based on laboratory experience to date plus related data from commercial scale sep-
arations  operations  in  foreign  countries.  Additional  research  and  development  is
needed  to  identify  the  losses  between  process  steps  and  the  scalability  of  the  tech-
nology.

Questions submitted by Representative Dave G. Reichert
Q1. I understand that there is likely to be a shortfall of trained professional nuclear
engineers,  nuclear  scientists,  health  physicists,  radiochemists  and  actinide  spe-
cialists brought on in part by the impending retirement of a substantial portion
of the national lab staff with experience in these fields. I am further advised that
Universities  in  my  state  with  leading  radiochemistry  programs  are  hindered  in
attracting nuclear science and engineering students.
• How  will  a  renewed  development  of  the  nuclear  fuel  cycle,  including  nuclear
reprocessing,  in  the  U.S.  be  staffed  with  competent  scientists  and  engineers?
A1. The Department of Energy’s (DOE) Office of Nuclear Energy, Science and Tech-
nology’s  (NE)  supports  nuclear  science,  radiochemistry,  health  physics,  and  engi-
neering  programs  at  U.S.  colleges  and  universities  through  the  University  reactor
Infrastructure  and  Education  Assistance  program  (University  Programs).  This  pro-
gram has been in place for over a decade and it along with the efforts of universities
and industry has led to a significant increase in enrollments in these programs. For
example,  nuclear  engineering  programs  in  the  U.S.  increased  from  490  students  in
1998  to  more  than  1,500  today.  Additionally,  the  Department  provides  targeted  op-
portunities  to  outstanding  students  interested  in  disciplines  related  to  nuclear  fuel
cycles, through fellowships awarded through the Advanced Fuel Cycle Initiative.
Q2. Numerous  National  Academy  studies  have  emphasized  the  need  for  inter-
national cooperation and collaboration in the development of future nuclear fuel
cycles.
• What  role  might  international  agreements  play  in  the  growth  of  our  involve-
ment  in  closing  the  loop  on  the  nuclear  fuel  cycle?  In  other  words,  how  might
we  achieve  a  mutual  benefit  through  cooperation  with  the  French,  the  Japa-
nese or the Russians who are all involved in advanced fuel cycle work?

A2. The  Department  is  actively  engaged  with  several  other  countries  in  developing
next-generation  nuclear  energy  systems  including  advanced,  proliferation-resistant
fuels and fuel cycles. Through the Generation IV Nuclear Energy Systems Initiative,
the  Advanced  Fuel  Cycle  Initiative  (AFCI)  and  the  International  Nuclear  Energy
Research Initiative (INERI), collaborative research and development (R&D) into ad-
vanced fuel cycles, including treatment and recycling of spent nuclear fuel, has been
underway  for  over  four  years.  The  United  States  is  currently  collaborating  with
France,  Japan,  and  the  European  Union.  The  United  States  is  gaining  insight  into
other countries’ recent operational experience and sharing in their expertise as new,
improved,  proliferation-resistant  advanced  fuel  cycle  technologies  are  jointly  devel-
oped.  These  cooperative  activities  involving  spent  fuel  reprocessing  and  advanced
plutonium-bearing  fuel  fabrication  technologies  are  sensitive  and  subject  to  tech-
nology transfer export controls.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00142 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

139

Questions submitted by Representative Michael M. Honda
Q1. The  House  report  language  mentions  the  West  Valley  reprocessing  plant.  How
much  has  it  cost  to  clean  up  the  reprocessing  waste  left  over  from  operation  of
West  Valley  from  1966–1972?  How  much  is  it  expected  to  cost?  How  long  will
the clean-up take?

A1. The  Department’s  cost  from  the  1980  inception  of  the  West  Valley  Demonstra-
tion  Project  (WVDP)  through  1996  was  $1.1  billion  and  included  design,  construc-
tion and initiation of hot operation of the high-level waste vitrification facility. Since
1997 (when the Office of Environmental Management began formally collecting cost
information)  through  Fiscal  Year  2004,  the  Department  spent  an  additional  $832
million  (current  year  dollars).  Per  the  WVDP  Act  (P.L.  96–368,  1980),  this  rep-
resents the Federal Government’s contribution of 90 percent; the State of New York
contributes 10 percent.

The Department plans to address its responsibilities under the WVDP Act in two
phases.  The  preliminary  estimated  cost  to  complete  the  first  step  (associated  with
interim  end  state  completion  on  or  before  2010)  is  an  additional  $443  million  for
a total of $1.275 billion since 1997. The scope associated with this phase of the work
includes  completion  of  off-site  low-level  and  transuranic  waste  disposition,  and  de-
contamination  and  demolition  of  facilities  previously  utilized  to  support  tank  waste
solidification.  The  preliminary  cost  estimate  associated  with  storage,  surveillance,
and  monitoring  of  the  vitrified  waste  canisters  through  2035  (when  off-site  disposi-
tion is planned for completion) is $390 million.

The second step includes tank decommissioning. DOE and the State of New York
are  jointly  developing  an  Environmental  Impact  Statement  (EIS)  for  Decommis-
sioning and/or Long-term Management of the West Valley Demonstration Project to
evaluate various options for the site, including the technical, cost, and schedule con-
siderations.  The  cost  estimate  and  schedule  associated  with  this  final  phase  of  the
WVDP will be developed based on the outcome of the EIS, to be published in 2008.
Q2. Do  you  have  an  estimate  of  what  it  would  cost  to  implement  the  plan  proposed
by  Chairman  Hobson  to  reprocess  50,000  metric  tons  of  commercial  nuclear
waste at one or more Department of Energy (DOE) sites?

A2. No,  the  Department  does  not  have  an  estimate  for  these  costs.  This  is  a  very
large  undertaking  and  the  Department  is  pursuing  order  of  magnitude  estimates
during FY 2006.
Q3. Is  the  estimate  for  reprocessing  of  $280  billion  from  DOE’s  roadmap  over  117
years  still  current?  What  fraction  of  this  cost  estimate  was  from  reprocessing?
Does  this  include  cost  for  physical  protection  and  safeguards  of  plutonium  cre-
ated?  What  design  basis  threat  is  assumed?  Are  you  assuming  a  9/11  mag-
nitude threat in these estimates?

A3. These  cost  estimates  are  out  of  date.  New  technologies  are  under  development
that  would  represent  a  fraction  of  the  costs  that  were  estimated  in  1999  with  dif-
ferent technologies.
Q4. What  are  the  principal  technological  uncertainties  related  to  the  development  of

the UREX+ process?

A4. While  there  are  five  technology  variations  under  the  UREX+  technology,  the
Department  believes  that  one  of  these  variations  is  most  advantageous  from  a  pro-
liferation resistance perspective (in that it does not separate pure plutonium or sep-
arate  pure  plutonium  plus  neptunium).  For  that  reason,  most  of  the  research  and
development is expected to be focused on that variation.
Q5. On  page  4  of  your  testimony  you  state  that  commercial  scale-up  of  spent  fuel
technologies  could  be  accomplished  relatively  rapidly  if  existing  domestic  facili-
ties could be modified and used. Where are these facilities and who owns them?
A5. There  are  four  such  facilities  that  could  possibly  be  used  in  demonstrating  the
technologies. Two are private facilities built in the 1970s but never completed or op-
erated with spent fuel. One is the Barnwell plant on the edge of the DOE Savannah
River  Site  in  South  Carolina,  designed  and  built  by  the  Allied  Chemical  Company.
The second is the General Electric Company’s Morris Plant, at the edge of the Dres-
den  Power  Reactor  south  of  Chicago,  which  is  an  active  fuel  storage  facility  con-
taining about 800 tons of spent fuel originally slated for processing in the plant.

The other two facilities are at DOE sites: Savannah River Site and the Idaho Na-
tional  Laboratory  (INL).  The  Savannah  River  facility  is  known  as  the  H  Canyon,
previously  used  for  processing  spent  reactor  fuel  for  weapons  purposes  and  now
used  as  part  of  the  site  cleanup.  The  INL  facilities  are  at  the  Idaho  Nuclear  Tech-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00143 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

140

nology  and  Engineering  Center  (INTEC),  consisting  of  several  buildings  previously
used or intended to be used to process spent naval nuclear reactor fuel.
Q6. How will DOE select a reprocessing technology for the future? What factors will

be taken into account?

A6. The  selection  of  a  reprocessing  technology  is  dependent  on  economics,  reli-
ability, ease of scale-up and considerations related to safety and proliferation resist-
ance. Advanced aqueous processing are best suited to treat spent nuclear fuel being
stored  and  generated  today  and  therefore  are  the  technologies  likely  to  be  selected
for  reprocessing  of  those  fuels.  Pyrochemical  processes  may  be  better  suited  for
spent fuel from advanced fast reactors.
Q7. Does  the  use  of  MOX  fuel  in  light  water  reactors  in  conjunction  with  reprocess-
ing  actually  reduce  the  amount  of  waste  that  will  ultimately  need  to  go  into
Yucca  Mountain  from  the  existing  fleet  of  reactors  in  the  U.S.?  Please  provide
some specific numbers to illustrate your answer.

A7. The present technical capacity of Yucca Mountain is limited not as much by the
amount  of  waste,  but  rather  by  the  long-term  heat  produced  by  the  waste  and  cer-
tain  repository  design  restrictions.  The  principal  sources  of  long-term  heat  are  the
transuranic elements in the waste. The most important of these are plutonium–241,
americium–241 and neptunium–237. Aqueous reprocessing and the recycle of pluto-
nium/neptunium  into  a  modified  form  of  MOX  fuel  to  light  water  reactors  can  be
used  to  transmute  the  critical  transuranic  isotopes  and  eliminate  uranium  (95  per-
cent of the spent fuel by weight) from the final waste going to the repository. There-
fore,  by  using  these  two  processes  together,  it  is  possible  both  to  decrease  the
amount of waste and to increase the technical capacity of the repository by a factor
of about two.
Q8. Is  MOX  a  U.S.  technology?  If  MOX  is  used,  will  the  U.S.  have  to  pay  royalties

to the owners of the technology?

A8. The  MOX  technology  was  originally  developed  in  the  United  States  and  there-
fore the U.S. would not need to pay royalties if MOX technology is used.
Q9. Does reprocessing itself create additional waste? If so, what is it?
A9. Reprocessing  using  a  technology  such  as  UREX+  would  not  create  additional
liquid high level waste as is associated with current generation PURER technology.
The  purpose  of  reprocessing  is  to  reduce  the  total  quantity  of  high  level  waste  re-
quiring  repository  disposal  as  compared  with  direct  disposal  of  the  same  fuel.  The
French reprocessing experience with the PURER process has demonstrated a factor
of  four  reduction  in  waste  volume.  Advanced  aqueous  recycling  processes  under  de-
velopment in the Advanced Fuel Cycle Initiative (AFCI) program have the potential
for  further  volume  reductions.  This  is  because  the  high  level  waste  would  not  have
short  or  long  term  heat  producing  isotopes  and  therefore,  would  be  superior  to  the
PURER technology.
Q10. Are  there  other  ways  to  burn  nuclear  waste  in  a  reactor  than  MOX?  What  are

they?

A10. MOX is the only fuel technology that has been commercially deployed for light
water reactors. Research has been ongoing for several advanced technologies:

— Multi-recycle schemes based on MOX fuels have been investigated that pro-
vide  greater  benefits  than  the  standard  MOX  approach,  but  come  at  a  cost
of significant difficulties in designing and operating fuel cycle plants.

— Advanced  fuels,  called  Inert  Matrix  Fuels,  that  contain  no  uranium  are
being  investigated  and  could  provide  additional  benefits  beyond  MOX  fuel.
However, the development of Inert Matrix Fuels is not sufficiently advanced
for commercialization.

Q11. Can high temperature gas cooled reactors burn nuclear waste after it has been
reprocessed?  If  a  gas  cooled  reactor  is  built  at  the  Idaho  National  Lab,  could
it be used to demonstrate another means of getting rid of nuclear waste?

A11. Spent  fuel  from  existing  light  water  reactors  contains  plutonium  and  other
transuranic  elements  (higher  actinides)  which  are  the  most  important  contributors
to  the  long-term  radiological  hazards  and  performance  uncertainties  for  a  geologic
repository.  Reprocessing  can  be  used  to  separate  these  isotopes,  which  can  then  be
fabricated  into  fuel  for  light  water  reactors  or  gas  cooled  reactors.  By  burning  this
fuel,  thermal  reactors  (light  water  and  gas  cooled  reactors)  could  destroy  higher
actinides, the plutonium.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00144 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

141

Q12. DOE  has  many  nuclear  related  issues  that  must  be  addressed  including  nu-
clear  waste,  non-proliferation,  building  new  reactors  in  the  near  term,  Gen  IV
reactors, rebuilding nuclear capability and industry in the U.S., nuclear hydro-
gen production and so on. I have the sense that many of these issues have been
treated  as  unrelated  and  that  there  has  not  been  an  effort  to  take  a  systems
view  at  DOE  of  these  opportunities  and  issues.  Is  this  the  case?  Would  there
be  benefits  from  trying  to  see  whether  certain  technologies  or  strategies  would
address two or more of these issues?

A12. The  Department  agrees  that  an  integrated  approach  is  needed  to  address  the
front and back end of the nuclear fuel cycle as well as reactor technologies. To that
end,  the  Department  has  employed  a  systems  approach  to  its  research,  specifically
treating  the  issues  such  as  waste  minimization,  energy  optimization,  proliferation
resistance,  economics  and  safety  in  an  integrated  fashion.  The  performance  criteria
associated  with  Generation  IV  reactors  are  closely  coordinated  with  the  advanced
fuel cycle research and development. For example, as part of the fuels development
effort, the Department is pursuing fuels that are proliferation resistant and recycla-
ble, and are integrating the research and development on the fuels to meet both fuel
cycle and reactor performance requirements.

In  addition,  in  FY  2006,  the  Administration  is  proposing  to  commission  a  com-
prehensive  review  of  NE  program  goals  and  plans  by  the  National  Academy  of
Sciences. The evaluation will validate the process of establishing program priorities
and  will  result  in  a  comprehensive  and  detailed  set  of  policy  and  research  rec-
ommendations, including performance targets and metrics for an integrated agenda
of research activities.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00145 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

142

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Matthew  Bunn,  Senior  Research  Associate,  Project  on  Managing  the

Atom, Harvard University, John F. Kennedy School of Government

Questions submitted by Representative Michael M. Honda
Q1. If the United States made a decision to proceed with reprocessing its commercial
spent  nuclear  fuel  what  impact  would  that  have  on  our  efforts  to  limit  the
spread  of  reprocessing  and  enrichment  technologies  around  the  world,  and  con-
vince other countries not to pursue this technology themselves?

A1. If  the  United  States  undertakes  large-scale  reprocessing  of  its  own  commercial
spent nuclear fuel, it will become significantly more difficult to convince other states
that  it  is  not  in  their  national  interest  to  pursue  similar  technology.  The  United
States will have little ability to ensure that other states adopt proliferation-resistant
approaches to reprocessing. Thus, the effort to stem the spread of reprocessing tech-
nology, a key element of President Bush’s nonproliferation strategy, could be signifi-
cantly  undermined.  At  the  same  time,  the  magnitude  of  this  effect  should  not  be
overstated;  there  are  only  a  limited  number  of  countries  that  do  not  already  have
operating  reprocessing  capabilities  but  are  interested  in  establishing  such  capabili-
ties (or might plausibly become interested in the next decade). Over the longer-term,
the effect might be more significant.
Q2. It  is  vital  to  ensure  that  plutonium  already  separated  by  reprocessing  is  ade-
quately  secured  against  terrorist  theft.  What  more  should  the  U.S.  Government
be  doing  to  ensure  that  nuclear  stockpiles  around  the  world  are  secure  and  ac-
counted for and cannot fall into terrorist hands?

A2. A  sea-change  in  the  level  of  sustained  White  House  engagement  focused  on
sweeping  aside  the  bureaucratic  and  political  obstacles  to  rapid  progress  in  locking
down the world’s nuclear stockpiles is urgently needed. An accelerated and strength-
ened effort would have many ingredients, but three are essential:

• accelerating  and  strengthening  the  effort  in  Russia,  where  the  largest  stock-
piles  of  potentially  vulnerable  nuclear  materials  still  exist,  with  the  goal  of
ensuring  that  all  nuclear  weapons  and  weapons-usable  materials  there  are
secure  enough  to  defeat  demonstrated  insider  and  outsider  threats  in  Russia
by  the  end  of  2008,  in  a  way  that  will  last  after  U.S.  assistance  phases  out;
• removing  the  potential  bomb  material  entirely  from  the  world’s  most  vulner-
able  sites  (particularly  research  reactors  fueled  with  highly  enriched  ura-
nium),  with  the  goal  of  removing  nuclear  material  or  providing  highly  effec-
tive security for all of the most vulnerable sites within four years, and elimi-
nating  the  civilian  use  of  highly  enriched  uranium  worldwide  within  roughly
a decade; and
• building a fast-paced global coalition to improve security for nuclear weapons
and weapons-usable nuclear materials around the world, with the goal of en-
suring  that  every  nuclear  weapon  and  every  kilogram  of  weapons-usable  nu-
clear  material,  wherever  it  may  be  in  the  world,  is  secure  and  accounted  for.
In  addition  to  securing  nuclear  material  at  its  sources—the  critical  first  line  of
defense—strengthened efforts are also needed to beef up the inevitably weaker lines
of  defense  that  come  into  play  after  a  nuclear  weapon  or  nuclear  material  has  al-
ready  been  stolen,  including  particularly  strengthened  police  and  intelligence  oper-
ations (including sting operations and the like) focused on preventing nuclear smug-
gling and identifying potential nuclear terrorist cells.

The effort to lock down nuclear stockpiles around the world should be considered
a  central  part  of  the  war  on  terrorism.  Homeland  security  begins  abroad;  wherever
there is an insecure cache of potential nuclear bomb material, there is a potentially
deadly  threat  to  the  United  States.  As  Senator  Richard  Lugar  (R–IN)  has  argued,
the war on terrorism cannot be considered won until all nuclear weapons and weap-
ons-usable  nuclear  materials  worldwide  are  demonstrably  secured  and  accounted
for,  to  standards  sufficient  to  prevent  terrorists  and  criminals  from  gaining  access
to them.

President  Bush  should  issue  a  directive  identifying  prevention  of  nuclear  ter-
rorism as a top national security priority, and appoint a senior official, with the ac-
cess needed to get a presidential decision whenever necessary, to lead the many dis-
parate  efforts  now  underway  to  keep  nuclear  capabilities  out  of  terrorist  hands.  A
detailed  set  of  recommendations  is  available  in  Securing  the  Bomb  2005:  The  New
Global Imperatives, available on-line at http://www.nti.org/cnwm.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00146 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

143

Q3. You  state  in  your  testimony  (p.  8)  that  if  the  government  is  fulfilling  its  obliga-
tion to take title to spent fuel and clear progress is being made on the waste re-
pository then potential investors in nuclear plants will have sufficient confidence
to make a commitment. Given that the repository is about 10 years late in open-
ing the government has yet to take possession of significant volumes of fuel, how
much longer do you believe investors will give the benefit of the doubt to the gov-
ernment  that  it  will  ultimately  fulfill  its  contractual  obligations  to  take  posses-
sion of existing spent fuel and open a permanent repository?

A3. From  the  perspective  of  a  potential  investor  in  a  new  nuclear  plant—or  the
owner of an existing one—the most important thing is that the spent fuel must not
become an indefinite political and economic liability hanging around the neck of the
privately owned plant. If it was clear that the government was going to pay all the
costs  of  the  fuel’s  storage,  or  better  yet,  take  it  to  an  off-site  location  (for  example,
an  interim  storage  facility),  that  would  address  the  most  important  investor  con-
cerns;  what  happens  to  it  after  that,  whether  reprocessing  or  storage  followed  by
direct disposal, is less critical from the investor’s point of view.

Indeed,  a  decision  to  reprocess  U.S.  spent  nuclear  fuel  would  be  more  likely  to
undermine  than  to  strengthen  investor  interest  in  new  nuclear  power  plants.  Re-
processing would be significantly more costly than direct disposal, meaning that ei-
ther  (a)  the  nuclear  waste  fee  would  and  would  have  to  be  substantially  increased;
(b) the government would have to pass onerous regulations forcing industry to build
and  operate  facilities  that  would  not  be  economic  in  themselves;  or  (c)  the  govern-
ment  would  have  to  provide  many  billions  of  dollars  in  subsidies  for  this  approach
to spent fuel management. From the point of view of a potential investor in nuclear
power,  options  (a)  and  (b)  are  quite  unattractive,  and  whether  the  government
would actually fulfill its obligations in option (c) is, if anything, more uncertain than
Yucca  Mountain  (and  a  permanent  repository  would  still  be  needed  in  any  case).
Moreover,  it  is  clear  that  reprocessing  would  provoke  substantial  political  con-
troversy  in  the  United  States,  which  would  also  be  a  negative  from  an  investor’s
perspective.  If  we  want  nuclear  energy  to  have  a  bright  future,  we  need  to  make
it  as  cheap,  as  simple,  as  safe,  as  proliferation-resistant,  and  as  non-controversial
as  possible,  and  near-term  reprocessing  points  in  the  wrong  direction  on  every
count.

In short, the government must meet its contractual obligations, but that does not
help  make  the  case  for  reprocessing  of  the  fuel.  The  actual  cost  of  storage  of  U.S.
spent  fuel  for  another  decade—to  the  utilities,  or  to  the  government—is  actually
quite  modest;  estimates  that  storage  will  cost  the  government  $1  billion  per  year
are  vastly  overstated.  That  being  said,  it  is  important,  regardless  of  what  decisions
are  made  about  reprocessing,  to  move  forward  in  a  timely  way  with  licensing  and
opening a permanent repository.
Q4. You note that the Department of Energy (DOE) has not performed a credible life
cycle  cost  analysis  of  the  cost  of  a  reprocessing  and  transmutation  system  com-
pared  to  that  of  direct  disposal.  Do  you  recommend  that  the  Committee  direct
DOE to conduct such an analysis? Is that a necessary first step, in your opinion?
A4. Such an analysis is certainly needed, but it should be only one part of a broader
assessment of the costs and benefits of near-term reprocessing, compared to interim
storage  followed  by  direct  disposal.  If  advocates  argue  that  separations  and  trans-
mutation are needed to make more repository space available, then a credible study
is  needed—which  does  not  yet  exist—of  all  the  available  options  for  achieving  that
goal, with their costs, risks, and benefits, not just of reprocessing. If advocates argue
that  separations  and  transmutation  will  reduce  the  toxicity  and  lifetime  of  the
waste  to  be  disposed,  then  a  credible  study  is  needed—which  does  not  yet  exist—
of  the  total  life-cycle  environmental  hazards  posed  by  direct  disposal  compared  to
those  of  separations  and  transmutation  (including  near-term  doses  from  operations
of the relevant facilities, not just long-term doses from a permanent repository, and
including  not  only  doses  from  normal  operations  but  from  plausible  accidents  as
well). In the post-9/11 era, detailed analyses of the terrorist risks of both approaches
are  needed,  and  these,  too,  have  not  yet  been  done.  No  realistic  evaluation  of  the
impact  of  a  reprocessing  and  transmutation  on  the  existing  nuclear  fuel  industry
has  yet  been  done.  No  serious  evaluation  of  the  licensing  and  public  acceptance
issues  facing  development  and  deployment  of  a  separations  and  transmutation  sys-
tem  has  yet  been  done.  No  serious  assessment  of  the  safety  and  terrorism  risks  of
a  reprocessing  and  transmutation  system,  compared  to  those  of  direct  disposal  has
yet been done. Assessments of the proliferation implications of the proposed systems
that  are  detailed  enough  to  support  responsible  decision-making  have  not  yet  been
done.  In  short,  virtually  none  of  the  most  important  information  on  which  to  base

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00147 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

144

a responsible decision to carry out reprocessing of U.S. nuclear fuel is yet available.
The Committee should consider directing DOE to carry out studies of all these mat-
ters, or assigning such studies to the National Academy of Sciences. In either case,
the  Committee  should  allow  enough  time  for  careful  consideration  of  the  relevant
issues.
Q5. You  recommend  the  establishment  of  expanded  interim  storage  facilities  ‘‘as  a
complement and interim backup’’ to the Yucca Mountain repository. Is there any
reason  why  that  interim  facility  shouldn’t  also  be  located  at  Yucca  Mountain?
A5. The  area  around  Yucca  Mountain  is  one  plausible  location  for  such  an  interim
facility,  but  there  are  others,  and  the  different  possible  locations  have  both  advan-
tages  and  disadvantages.  Obviously,  there  are  advantages  to  shipping  the  fuel  to  a
site  close  to  where  it  will  ultimately  be  disposed  of.  There  are  also  disadvantages,
however.  Technically,  the  area  around  Yucca  Mountain  has  a  high  level  of  seismic
activity,  which  is  more  of  a  problem  for  an  above-ground  interim  storage  facility
than a below-ground repository (just as a storm at sea is more of a problem for sur-
face  ships  than  for  submarines).  Politically,  Congress  has  in  the  past  judged  that
it  would  not  be  fair  to  burden  Nevada  with  both  the  permanent  repository  and  an
interim  storage  facility.  For  any  interim  site,  detailed  analysis  of  the  best  ap-
proaches  to  providing  safe  and  secure  transportation  of  spent  fuel  to  the  site  is
needed, and such analyses may reveal that some sites have significant safety or se-
curity advantages over others.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00148 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

145

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00149 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

146

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00150 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

147

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Phillip J. Finck, Deputy Associate Laboratory Director, Applied Science

and Technology and National Security, Argonne National Laboratory

Questions submitted by Chairman Judy Biggert
Q1. There was some discussion during the hearing about the economics of reprocess-
ing, once it becomes commercial scale. What are the major steps necessary before
the  technology  is  mature  enough  for  commercial  deployment?  For  each  of  those
steps,  do  we  have  enough  information  to  estimate  the  associated  costs?  If  so,
what are the costs?

A1. The UREX+ aqueous reprocessing technologies have already been demonstrated
at the laboratory scale with spent nuclear fuel. As these processing technologies are
similar  to  the  mature  PUREX  process  currently  being  used  in  France  and  the
United Kingdom (U.K.) at an industrial scale, it is likely that scale-up to industrial
size  will  be  successful  and  relatively  straightforward  if  similar  equipment  is  used.
If  advanced  equipment,  reducing  size  and  cost,  is  desired,  then  an  intermediate
stage of pilot plant demonstration would be prudent, and represents the only major
step  in  development.  The  UREX+  technologies  are  candidates  for  processing  spent
fuel  from  light  water  reactors  (LWRs),  typical  of  present-day  nuclear  power  plants.
Less  developed  technologies,  such  as  pyroprocessing,  should  be  viewed  as  being
further  from  commercialization  at  an  industrial  scale.  Ongoing  research  and  devel-
opment  of  this  method  in  the  DOE  Advanced  Fuel  Cycle  Initiative  (AFCI)  program
is  aimed  at  facilitating  the  large-scale  commercialization  of  this  technology  as  well.
However, at this time, the likely use for pyroprocessing is to process spent fuel from
fast neutron reactors that are used for actinide transmutation and uranium resource
extension.  Since  the  U.S.  currently  does  not  have  any  reactors  of  this  type,  but
would  likely  implement  them  in  the  future  as  part  of  an  overall  energy  strategy,
there is sufficient time for this technology to mature.

The  proposed  Advanced  Fuel  Cycle  Facility  in  the  AFCI  program  would  address
the  need  for  pilot  scale  demonstration  of  both  UREX+  and  pyroprocessing.  Results
from testing in this facility should allow the competent design of industrial facilities
using  these  technologies.  While  cost  estimates  for  such  a  facility  are  necessarily
highly  uncertain,  due  to  the  lack  of  recent  experience  in  building  such  a  facility,  it
is likely that the current cost estimate for this facility would be in the range of $1B
(including  not  only  processing  demonstration  but  fuel  fabrication  capabilities  as
well), with an estimated annual operating cost to demonstrate these technologies of
$100M/year. Although admittedly large, these costs need to be placed in the context
of the existing nuclear power industry in the United States, with capital investment
of  several  hundred  billion  dollars,  and  electricity  generation  of  about  $50B  or  more
per  year.  Payments  into  the  nuclear  waste  fund  also  approach  $1B  per  year,  with
the anticipated cost of the Yucca Mountain repository in the neighborhood of $50B.

Questions submitted by Representative Michael M. Honda
Q1. The House report says that European countries ‘‘recycle’’ (plutonium) as they go,
but actually MOX fuel is not made and used immediately. (Nor is the high-level
liquid  waste  generated  from  reprocessing  immediately  vitrified;  rather  it  is
stored in stainless steel tanks to cool.) More than 200 metric tons of commercial
plutonium worldwide is separated and has not been used as MOX and the sur-
plus  is  building  up  each  year.  Many  reactors  need  costly  modifications  to  use
MOX  and  some  reactors  cannot  be  modified.  There  are  about  80  metric  tons  of
surplus plutonium at La Hague in France and similar amounts at Sellafield in
the  United  Kingdom  (U.K.)  and  more  than  30  metric  tons  in  Chelyabinsk,  Rus-
sia.  The  UK  has  no  reactors  which  can  use  plutonium  fuel  and  no  operating
MOX  factory.  How  can  you  explain  that  this  is  a  recycling  program  when  the
UK  has  amassed  about  80  metric  tons  of  civil  weapons-usable  plutonium  and
has no plans to use this material? (For Pu amounts reported to the International
Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA)—see INFCIRC 549, on IAEA web site.)

A1. At this time, there is a mismatch in the ability to process commercial spent fuel
and  the  ability  to  re-use  the  separated  materials  in  reactors,  both  in  Europe  and
elsewhere. As a result, substantial stockpiles of separated materials have been accu-
mulated,  although  that  was  not  the  original  intent.  In  France  and  other  countries,
the  spent  fuel  processing  activity  was  intended  to  be  part  of  an  integrated  system
where  the  recovered  plutonium  would  be  used  in  thermal  and  fast  reactors.  How-
ever,  due  to  shifting  program  emphasis  and  priorities,  the  construction  and  oper-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00151 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

148

ation  of  the  processing  plants  has  proceeded  mostly  as  planned,  while  the  reactor
systems  to  use  the  plutonium  have  not.  A  similar  situation  also  exists  in  the  U.K.
and in Russia, for basically the same reason.

One can ask why the current situation has developed, and the answer is probably
found  in  a  combination  of  factors.  First,  electricity  demand,  and  hence  reactor  con-
struction, did not grow as envisioned, but stagnated instead, driven mainly by large
improvements  in  efficiency  for  a  wide  variety  of  electricity-driven  products,  includ-
ing electronics, appliances, etc., and by a drop in heavy industrial use. Second, oppo-
sition  to  the  use  of  nuclear  power  increased  dramatically  in  the  wake  of  the  Three
Mile  Island  and  Chernobyl  accidents.  This  opposition  exacerbated  the  situation,
leading  to  the  large  mismatch  in  capabilities  that  exist  today.  Other  minor  reasons
can  also  be  cited,  but  the  point  is  that  when  the  plans  were  originally  conceived,
the  systems  were  intended  to  balance,  and  achieve  the  ‘‘recycle  as  they  go’’  condi-
tion.

That being said, it should be noted that France is engaged in recycling the pluto-
nium in those reactors capable of using this material. Newer reactor designs are in-
tended  to  allow  for  increased  use  of  MOX  fuel,  which  should  address  the  stockpile
concern  as  these  reactors  are  constructed  and  brought  into  service  to  replace  reac-
tors being decommissioned. The situation in the U.K. and Russia is different, where
the future direction of nuclear power has still not been decided. Until the time that
these countries decide to adopt plutonium recycling as originally planned, or another
disposition  path  is  taken,  the  accumulated  stockpile  of  separated  plutonium  will
continue  to  exist  with  no  specified  purpose,  and  should  be  considered  as  either  a
resource  for  the  future  or  as  a  separate  waste  stream  for  eventual  disposal.  The
Russian position has been made quite clear many times: they regard separated plu-
tonium  as  a  valuable  energy  resource  and  plan  to  utilize  this  material  in  the  fast
reactors that are planned for deployment in the future.

It is correct that many reactors would need costly modifications to use MOX, and
some cannot be modified to use MOX. But it is also correct to state that many reac-
tors  are  ready  to  use  MOX  with  only  minor  and  no  modifications.  Furthermore,  I
believe  that  the  U.S.  should  move  towards  a  close  fuel  cycle,  where  the  MOX  ap-
proach would be at best of limited relevance; this approach would involve the transi-
tion towards a new generation of fast reactors, with novel fuel types and separations
techniques, that would eliminate a very high fraction of radiotoxic elements.
Q2. France  uses  plutonium  fuel  (MOX)  in  20  out  of  58  reactors,  but  the  stockpile  of
civil plutonium continues to increase with no end in sight. How can this growing
stockpile  be  presented  as  ‘‘recycling’’?  MOX  fuel  produces  only  about  15  percent
of  France’s  nuclear  electricity  and  imposes  about  $1  billion  per  year  in  added
electricity  costs,  according  to  an  official  French  report.  Why  does  Electricite  de
France,  the  state-owned  utility  forced  to  use  MOX  fuel,  place  a  negative  value
on  plutonium  they  must  take  from  the  state-owned  processing  company
(Cogema)?

A2. I am, of course, not able to speak for the French utility industry. As to the ques-
tion of recycling, the fact is that the recovered plutonium is being recycled, but that
the  rate  of  recycling  is  lower  than  the  design  rate  of  production  at  the  processing
plant. As more reactors become available to use the MOX fuel, this mismatch in pro-
duction and demand will diminish, and eventually reverse, gradually consuming the
current stockpile of separated plutonium. This would be consistent with the original
intent of the French planning, but it has not yet been put into place.

The question of the added cost would need to be examined carefully to determine
what  is  included  and  what  is  not  included.  The  negative  value  on  plutonium  com-
pared to standard enriched uranium fuel appears reasonable, as any fuel made from
separated  materials  is  likely  to  cost  more  than  enriched  uranium  fuel  as  long  as
uranium  ore  costs  remain  low—it  is  not  at  all  clear  that  this  situation  will  remain
stable  for  the  foreseeable  future.  Basically,  enrichment  to  the  required  level  is  cur-
rently cheaper than fuel processing, separation, and MOX fabrication. However, this
probably  does  not  account  for  the  changes  that  have  been  made  in  the  resulting
waste  stream.  In  France,  and  in  other  countries,  such  an  accounting  may  be  dif-
ficult,  as  no  waste  disposal  strategy  has  been  determined.  Without  a  strategy  in
place,  one  cannot  place  a  value  on  the  reduction  in  waste  volume  and  toxicity  aris-
ing from spent fuel processing. Depending on the ultimate cost of disposal, the cost
savings from the reduced amount of waste may be sufficient to offset or even exceed
the  additional  costs  of  processing,  or  they  may  not.  It  is  important  to  realize,
though,  that  these  costs  still  only  represent  a  minute  fraction  of  the  cost  of  gener-
ating  nuclear  electricity,  and  when  one  examines  the  value  of  pursuing  a  given
strategy,  such  as  plutonium  recycling,  the  entire  system  must  be  considered,  from
mining to geologic disposal.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00152 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

149

Q3. Japan is in the start-up phase of a massive new $20 billion reprocessing factory
(Rokkasho).  Its  reprocessing  program  is  estimated  to  cost  $166  billion  over  40
years (including construction, operating, and decommissioning costs). Japan has
committed  itself  to  keeping  its  plutonium  supply  and  demand  in  balance  but
Japan already has 40 MT (35 MT in Europe, five MT domestic) supply of pluto-
nium.  How  can  operation  of  Rokkasho  and  failure  to  implement  a  domestic
MOX  program  be  presented  as  balancing  supply  and  demand?  Especially  when
the utilities are wary of the program? Japanese politicians have spoken in recent
years of making a weapon and one has suggested that Japanese commercial plu-
tonium  stocks  could  be  used  to  make  large  numbers  of  weapons.  What  would
this mean for global non-proliferation measures? What would this mean for sta-
bility of the region?

A3. It  is  highly  desirable  to  construct  and  operate  a  reprocessing  plant  with  the
plant being part of an integrated system, where the recovered materials are quickly
re-used  in  nuclear  reactors.  This  is  why  the  need  for  an  integrated  system  is
stressed, and one needs to either implement the entire system, or to not implement
anything.  It  is  surely  the  intent  of  the  Japanese  to  re-use  the  recovered  plutonium
in  their  nuclear  reactors  to  help  increase  the  security  of  this  part  of  their  overall
energy supply, although it would appear that there was not agreement by all parties
involved in the government and industry as to how and when this would be accom-
plished.  As  to  why  the  Japanese  utilities  are  wary  of  the  program,  it  is  difficult  to
say  why  without  explicit  statements  on  their  part.  Presumably  a  great  part  of  this
concern  is  the  uncertainty  in  future  fuel  cycle  costs;  this  is  countered  to  a  degree
by  the  assurance  of  a  domestic  fuel  supply  in  a  world  economy  in  which  the  price
of uranium may increase significantly.

Although  some  Japanese  politicians  have  spoken  about  constructing  a  nuclear
weapon,  I  believe  that  the  context  for  such  comments  is  likely  to  be  in  response  to
what the Japanese perceive as an increasing instability in the region due to the re-
cent actions of China and North Korea. As a result, comments about global non-pro-
liferation  and  the  impact  to  the  stability  of  the  region  are  probably  best  left  to  the
diplomats.

It does need to be noted, however, that the Japanese commercial plutonium stocks
are already ill-suited for weapons use, and is part of the reason that civilian reproc-
essing activities are only marginally related to the issue of non-proliferation. Pluto-
nium  obtained  from  commercial  spent  fuel  with  a  typical  amount  of  irradiation  in
the  reactor  not  only  has  an  isotopic  composition  that  makes  weapon  fabrication
problematic (although not impossible), but storage of this plutonium leads to further
degradation such that the plutonium would need to be refined again before weapons
use could even be contemplated. It is likely that such refining may be necessary for
the  fabrication  of  new  nuclear  fuel  as  MOX,  depending  on  the  storage  time.  This
is  one  reason  why  a  mismatch  between  spent  fuel  processing  rate  and  the  ability
to  use  the  separated  plutonium  is  undesirable,  and  should  be  avoided  if  possible.
Q4. Dr. Finck, in your presentation before the Advanced Fuel Cycle Initiative’s Semi-
Annual  Review  Meeting  in  August  of  2003,  you  stated  that,  ‘‘Expect  that  pro-
posed  dual  tier  fuel  cycle  cannot  be  made  intrinsically  proliferation  resistant.’’
Why  don’t  you  consider  UREX-plus  proliferation-resistant?  What  are  the  issues
here?

A4. I  do  stand  by  my  statement  of  2003.  Nevertheless,  I  never  stated  that  UREX-
plus is not proliferation resistant.

The  use  of  dual  tier  systems  requires  that  relatively  pure  streams  of  Plutonium
and Neptunium be separated from the Spent Nuclear Fuel, as Light Water Reactors
have a limited ability to recycle other materials such as Americium and fission prod-
ucts. That clean separated material can be viewed as a proliferation concern. Never-
theless, the same system can be made proliferation resistant by the use of advanced
safeguards  measures,  which  are  currently  being  vigorously  pursued  in  the  AFCI
program.  Furthermore,  the  single  tier  system,  that  does  not  utilize  recycle  in  ther-
mal  reactors,  but  directly  transmutes  elements  in  fast  reactors,  can  accommodate
much  less  pure  mixtures  of  elements,  and  therefore  presents  interesting  prolifera-
tion resistance attributes. Even in this system, we would insist on the incorporation
of advanced safeguards features in fuel cycle facilities.
Q5. You state in your testimony that nuclear energy could produce process heat that
could  be  used  in  the  production  of  transportation  fuels  such  as  hydrogen.  How-
ever,  you  also  included  synthetic  fuel  in  the  product  slate.  What  synthetic  fuels
would be possibly produced at a nuclear plant?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00153 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

150

A5. I  apologize  if  my  inclusion  of  synthetic  fuels  in  the  product  slate  has  created
some confusion. The application of nuclear power to the production of synthetic fuels
is  to  provide  either  process  heat,  electricity  or  hydrogen,  to  a  plant  that  is  making
synthetic  fuels  from  other  feedstocks  such  as  coal  or  gas.  The  synthetic  fuels  are
basically the same concepts that were heavily investigated in the 1970’s in response
to  the  energy  crisis  at  that  time,  and  include  coal  gasification  and  liquid  synfuels.
Q6. In your statement (p. 1–2) you say that the U.S. needs to take a more comprehen-
sive approach to nuclear waste management and you mention that resource opti-
mization  and  waste  minimization  as  two  objectives  that  must  be  pursued  with
targeted  R&D  to  minimize  their  economic  impact.  With  respect  to  waste  mini-
mization,  what  is  the  potential  for  reducing  the  volume  and/or  heat  contained
in the waste? What are the tradeoffs necessary to achieve maximum waste reduc-
tion?

A6. For the Yucca Mountain repository, the utilization of space in the repository is
constrained  by  the  amount  of  decay  heat  generated  in  the  spent  fuel.  If  this  fuel
is processed, and the actinide elements are removed along with the fission products
cesium and strontium, it is possible to reduce the decay heat of the resulting waste
by  a  factor  in  excess  of  200.  This  can  be  used  to  greatly  increase  the  utilization  of
the Yucca Mountain repository in terms of the amount of space needed to store the
waste resulting from the production of a given amount of energy. At the same time,
a  lower  total  inventory  of  hazardous  materials  is  placed  in  the  repository  as  com-
pared  to  the  current  plan  for  direct  disposal  of  spent  fuel,  postponing  the  need  for
consideration of a second repository until the next century or beyond.

Processing of the spent fuel removes the uranium, which accounts for over 95 per-
cent  of  the  waste  volume.  Removal  of  the  other  actinide  elements  accounts  for  an-
other two percent, while the cesium and strontium would account for about two per-
cent.  As  a  result,  less  than  one  percent  of  the  original  spent  fuel  material  remains
for  disposal.  The  volume  required  to  dispose  of  this  material  depends  on  the  waste
form,  and  is  a  current  area  of  research.  It  is  anticipated  that  about  a  factor  of  50
to  100  reduction  in  waste  content  for  a  given  amount  of  energy  production  can  be
achieved,  perhaps  greater.  This  would  translate  into  an  equivalent  increase  in  the
utilization of space in the Yucca Mountain repository.

There  are  not  any  ‘‘tradeoffs’’  required  to  achieve  these  reductions,  although  all
of  the  removed  materials  need  to  be  treated  in  some  manner  and  in  some  respects
that can be viewed as the tradeoff: any materials that are removed need subsequent
treatment.  The  higher  actinide  elements  can  be  efficiently  recycled  in  nuclear  reac-
tors,  preferably  fast  neutron  reactors,  and  can  be  recycled  as  many  times  as  re-
quired  to  consume  the  more  troublesome  elements.  The  separated  fission  products,
cesium and strontium, can be placed in separate storage for 100–300 years to allow
sufficient decay, and then disposed in the repository with no additional impact. Lest
this sound like an unreasonably long time, it is useful to remember that some spent
fuel has already been in storage for almost 50 years.
Q7. You assert that with a ‘‘significant R&D effort’’ new forms can be developed that
can burn up to 50 percent of the plutonium and neptunium present in the spent
nuclear fuel. What are the R&D challenges to being able to achieve a burn rate
at this level?

A7. These consumption amounts in a single irradiation in a light water reactor can
only  be  achieved  with  the  development  of  what  is  known  as  ‘‘inert  matrix  fuel’’  or
IMF. This fuel consists only of recycled materials, and uses an inert matrix material
for  the  rest  of  the  required  fuel  volume  instead  of  using  additional  natural  or  de-
pleted  uranium.  In  this  way,  further  creation  of  higher  actinide  elements  from  the
uranium is avoided, and the recycled materials provide the only fission sources. The
R&D challenges center on the development of an appropriate inert matrix material,
which  has  become  more  complicated  as  explained  in  the  next  paragraph.  This  ap-
proach was briefly in favor for certain applications, such as the destruction of weap-
ons-grade plutonium, and has been examined in the DOE AFCI program as a poten-
tial approach for recycling the higher actinide elements.

However,  detailed  studies  have  shown  that  the  IMF  approach  does  not  provide
substantial  benefits  either  to  waste  management  or  resource  utilization  by  itself,
but  would  also  need  to  be  recycled  to  provide  the  opportunity  for  greater  benefits.
The major difficulty is in formulating an inert matrix that can be reprocessed easily,
and  is  the  subject  of  some  ongoing  research.  It  should  be  noted,  though,  that  even
if such a fuel form can be developed, the utility of the IMF approach is greatly infe-
rior  to  that  of  the  fast  neutron  reactors.  For  this  reason,  the  IMF  approach  is  not
being actively considered for either the single tier or dual tier strategy. An advanced
LWR  with  MOX-type  fuel  can  already  be  implemented  as  the  first  tier  of  the  dual

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00154 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

151

tier  strategy  with  maximum  overall  benefit,  and  the  IMF  approach  would  not  add
to this benefit.
Q8. The U.S. has entered into an international framework agreement for the develop-
ment of the Generation IV nuclear reactor. Is the reprocessing necessary for this
reactor  design  covered  under  the  agreement?  If  not,  why  not?  What  other  coun-
tries are engaged in reprocessing R&D for the Gen IV reactors?

A8. The  reprocessing  activities  associated  with  the  Gen  IV  reactors  are  the  same
as  are  being  discussed  here,  as  are  the  advanced  reactors  being  considered  in  the
DOE AFCI program for a single tier or dual tier system. All of the fast reactor con-
cepts  that  would  be  part  of  a  two  tier  system  are  represented  in  the  Gen  IV  pro-
gram.

As  for  the  other  countries  that  are  engaged  in  reprocessing  R&D,  virtually  all  of
the members of the Gen IV International Forum are conducting research to one de-
gree or another. The most active members in this area are France and Japan along
with  the  United  States.  We  have  active  technical  collaboration  agreements  in  place
with a number of countries involved in the development of reprocessing technologies
for advanced nuclear reactors.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:31 Dec 08, 2005 Jkt 021711 PO 00000 Frm 00155 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\ENER05\061605\21711 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

